Nebraska, session 109, LB150.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be cited as
the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The State of Nebraska is facing serious issues in its current mental
health system, including a shortage of mental health care professionals and
long travel distances to receive care. These issues have had a negative impact
on those suffering from mental health issues and their communities,
particularly in rural parts of the state;
(2) As a consequence, when an individual experiences a mental health
crisis in public, law enforcement officers are frequently required to respond
and take the individual into emergency protective custody until the individual
can be transported to an available mental health treatment facility. This
places a significant burden on law enforcement agencies, particularly in rural
parts of the state, which is compounded by the shortage of mental health bed
space and long travel distances to facilities;
(3) Addressing these issues is vitally important to the state, and the
state would benefit from innovative solutions aimed at reducing the negative
impact of mental health issues on individuals and law enforcement agencies;
-1-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(4) There is a history of cooperation between rural agencies and
communities that have successfully worked together to meet regional needs
efficiently and cost-effectively; and
(5) There is an opportunity to adapt the existing method of cooperation
and apply it in a way that helps reduce the impact on those suffering from
mental health issues and the law enforcement agencies that interact with them.
Sec. 3. (1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice shall create a regional mental health expansion pilot program to
provide funding to a county law enforcement agency to expand mental health beds
and encourage cooperation between law enforcement agencies to service the
region.
(2) The Legislature intends that the pilot program will demonstrate a
method of regional cooperation among law enforcement agencies to address the
impact of shortages and the long travel distances on those suffering from
mental health issues and law enforcement agencies and that can be replicated
statewide.
(3) The commission shall select one county law enforcement agency for the
pilot program. The selected agency shall:
(a) Have the capacity to add mental health beds, either at an existing
jail facility or elsewhere;
(b) Have a history of cooperation with other law enforcement agencies;
(c) Provide an assessment of the anticipated regional impact of the
additional mental health beds on individuals with mental health issues and law
enforcement agencies; and
(d) Cooperate with other counties or law enforcement agencies through a
memorandum of understanding to ensure the mental health beds provide a regional
benefit.
(4) The Legislature does not intend the Regional Mental Health Expansion
Pilot Program Act to criminalize mental health issues or result in the
incarceration of individuals for mental health issues, and nothing in the act
should be so construed. The purpose of this pilot program is to expand mental
health services provided by law enforcement agencies to individuals temporarily
in custody for mental health issues.
Sec. 4. (1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice shall administer the pilot program and, in addition to the requirements
set out in section 3 of this act, develop grant eligibility, application, and
audit requirements.
(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry
out the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
(3) The commission shall identify grant funding to carry out the Regional
Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 5. The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice
shall coordinate with the Attorney General to carry out the Regional Mental
Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 6. The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice
shall create a pilot program to seek federal funding for collaborative efforts
in emergency response by law enforcement agencies and mental health
professionals.
Sec. 7. Section 18-1724, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
18-1724 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all cities and
villages in this state shall have the power by ordinance to define, regulate,
suppress, and prevent discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed,
religion, ancestry, sex, marital status, national origin, familial status as
defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in section 20-308.01, or age,
or military or veteran status in employment, public accommodation, and housing
and may provide for the enforcement of such ordinances by providing appropriate
penalties for the violation thereof. It shall not be an unlawful employment
practice to refuse employment based on a policy of not employing both spouses
if such policy is equally applied to both sexes.
Sec. 8. Section 20-113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-113 (1) Any incorporated city may enact ordinances and any county may
adopt resolutions which are substantially equivalent to the Age Discrimination
in Employment Act, the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, the Nebraska Fair
Housing Act, and sections 20-126 to 20-143 and 48-1219 to 48-1227 or which are
more comprehensive than such acts and sections in the protection of civil
rights. No such ordinance or resolution shall place a duty or liability on any
person, other than an employer, employment agency, or labor organization, for
acts similar to those prohibited by section 48-1115. Such ordinance or
resolution may include authority for a local agency to seek an award of damages
or other equitable relief on behalf of the complainant by the filing of a
petition in the district court in the county with appropriate jurisdiction. The
local agency shall have within its authority jurisdiction substantially
equivalent to or more comprehensive than the Equal Opportunity Commission or
other enforcement agencies provided under such acts and sections and shall have
authority to order backpay and other equitable relief or to enforce such orders
or relief in the district court with appropriate jurisdiction. Certified copies
of such ordinances or resolutions shall be transmitted to the commission. When
the commission determines that any such city or county has enacted an ordinance
or adopted a resolution that is substantially equivalent to such acts and
sections or is more comprehensive than such acts and sections in the protection
of civil rights and has established a local agency to administer such ordinance
-2-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
or resolution, the commission may thereafter refer all complaints arising in
such city or county to the appropriate local agency. All complaints arising
within a city shall be referred to the appropriate agency in such city when
both the city and the county in which the city is located have established
agencies pursuant to this section. When the commission refers a complaint to a
local agency, it shall take no further action on such complaint if the local
agency proceeds promptly to handle such complaint pursuant to the local
ordinance or resolution. If the commission determines that a local agency is
not handling a complaint with reasonable promptness or that the protection of
the rights of the parties or the interests of justice require such action, the
commission may regain jurisdiction of the complaint and proceed to handle it in
the same manner as other complaints which are not referred to local agencies.
In cases of conflict between this section and section 20-332, for complaints
subject to the Nebraska Fair Housing Act, section 20-332 shall control.
(2)(a) Any club which has been issued a license by the Nebraska Liquor
Control Commission to sell, serve, or dispense alcoholic liquor shall have that
license revoked if the club discriminates because of race, color, religion,
sex, familial status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in
section 20-308.01, or national origin, or military or veteran status in the
sale, serving, or dispensing of alcoholic liquor to any person who is a guest
of a member of such club.
(b) The procedure for revocation shall be as prescribed in sections
53-134.04, 53-1,115, and 53-1,116.
(c) This subsection does not prohibit a club from, on an otherwise
nondiscriminatory basis, limiting admission or service to veterans or
servicemembers or their family members or providing discounts or other benefits
to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 9. Section 20-132, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-132 All persons within this state shall be entitled to a full and equal
enjoyment of any place of public accommodation, as defined in sections 20-132
to 20-143, without discrimination or segregation on the grounds of race, color,
sex, religion, national origin, disability, or ancestry, or military or veteran
status.
Sec. 10. Section 20-134, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-134 (1) Any person who directly or indirectly refuses, withholds from,
denies, or attempts to refuse, withhold, or deny, to any other person any of
the accommodations, advantages, facilities, services, or privileges, or who
segregates any person in a place of public accommodation on the basis of race,
creed, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, or ancestry, or
military or veteran status, shall be guilty of discriminatory practice and
shall be subject to the penalties of sections 20-132 to 20-143.
(2) It is not a discriminatory practice under sections 20-132 to 20-143
for a person or a place of public accommodation to, on an otherwise
nondiscriminatory basis, limit admission or service to veterans or
servicemembers or their family members or provide discounts or other benefits
to veterans or servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 11. Section 20-139, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-139 The Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123, 20-124, and
20-132 to 20-143 shall be administered by the Equal Opportunity Commission,
except that the State Fire Marshal shall administer the act and sections as
they relate to accessibility standards and specifications set forth in sections
81-5,147 and 81-5,148. The county attorneys are granted the authority to
enforce such act and sections 20-123, 20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143 and shall
possess the same powers and duties with respect thereto as the commission. If a
complaint is filed with the county attorney, the commission shall be notified.
Powers granted to and duties imposed upon the commission pursuant to such act
and sections shall be in addition to the provisions of the Nebraska Fair
Employment Practice Act and shall not be construed to amend or restrict those
provisions. In carrying out the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123,
20-124, and 20-132 to 20-143, the commission shall have the power to:
(1) Seek to eliminate and prevent discrimination in places of public
accommodation because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, familial
status as defined in section 20-311, disability as defined in section
20-308.01, or ancestry, or military or veteran status;
(2) Effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132 to 20-143 by conference,
conciliation, and persuasion so that persons may be guaranteed their civil
rights and goodwill may be fostered;
(3) Formulate policies to effectuate the purposes of sections 20-132 to
20-143 and make recommendations to agencies and officers of the state or local
subdivisions of government in aid of such policies and purposes;
(4) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the powers
granted by the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and sections 20-123, 20-124, and
20-132 to 20-143, subject to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure
Act. The commission shall, not later than one hundred eighty days after
September 6, 1991, issue draft rules and regulations to implement subsection
(3) of section 20-336, which regulations may incorporate regulations of the
United States Department of Housing and Urban Development as applicable;
(5) Designate one or more members of the commission or a member of the
commission staff to conduct investigations of any complaint alleging
discrimination because of race, color, sex, religion, national origin, familial
-3-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
status, disability, or ancestry, or military or veteran status, attempt to
resolve such complaint by conference, conciliation, and persuasion, and conduct
such conciliation meetings and conferences as are deemed necessary to resolve a
particular complaint, which meetings shall be held in the county in which the
complaint arose;
(6) Determine that probable cause exists for crediting the allegations of
a complaint;
(7) Determine that a complaint cannot be resolved by conference,
conciliation, or persuasion, such determination to be made only at a meeting
where a quorum is present;
(8) Dismiss a complaint when it is determined there is not probable cause
to credit the allegations;
(9) Hold hearings, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance,
administer oaths, take the testimony of any person under oath, and in
connection therewith require for examination any books or papers relating to
any matter under investigation or in question before the commission; and
(10) Issue publications and the results of studies and research which will
tend to promote goodwill and minimize or eliminate discrimination because of
race, color, sex, religion, national origin, familial status, disability, or
ancestry, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 12. Section 20-317, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-317 Restrictive covenant shall mean any specification limiting the
transfer, rental, or lease of any housing because of race, creed, religion,
color, national origin, sex, disability, familial status, or ancestry, or
military or veteran status.
Sec. 13. Section 20-318, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-318 Except as exempted by section 20-322, it shall be unlawful to:
(1) Refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, refuse
to negotiate for the sale or rental of or otherwise make unavailable or deny,
refuse to show, or refuse to receive and transmit an offer for a dwelling to
any person because of race, color, religion, national origin, disability,
familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status;
(2) Discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or
privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling or in the provision of services or
facilities in connection therewith because of race, color, religion, national
origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status;
(3) Make, print, publish, or cause to be made, printed, or published any
notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of a
dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on
race, color, religion, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or
military or veteran status or an intention to make any such preference,
limitation, or discrimination;
(4) Represent to any person because of race, color, religion, national
origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or veteran status that
any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when such
dwelling is in fact so available;
(5) Cause to be made any written or oral inquiry or record concerning the
race, color, religion, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or
military or veteran status of a person seeking to purchase, rent, or lease any
housing;
(6) Include in any transfer, sale, rental, or lease of housing any
restrictive covenants or honor or exercise or attempt to honor or exercise any
restrictive covenant pertaining to housing;
(7) Discharge or demote an employee or agent or discriminate in the
compensation of such employee or agent because of such employee's or agent's
compliance with the Nebraska Fair Housing Act; and
(8) Induce or attempt to induce, for profit, any person to sell or rent
any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into
the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, religion,
national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or veteran
status.
Sec. 14. Section 20-320, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-320 (1) Except as exempted by section 20-322, it It shall be unlawful
for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in transactions
related to residential real estate to discriminate against any person in making
available such a transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a
transaction because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status,
or national origin, or military or veteran status.
(2) For purposes of this section, transaction related to residential real
estate shall mean any of the following:
(a) The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial
assistance:
(i) For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a
dwelling; or
(ii) Secured by residential real estate; or
(b) The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a person engaged in the
business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into
consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex,
disability, or familial status, or military or veteran status.
-4-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Sec. 15. Section 20-321, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-321 It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership or
participation in any multiple listing service, real estate brokers
organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the
business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against any person
in the terms or conditions of such access, membership, or participation on
account of race, color, religion, national origin, disability, familial status,
or sex, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 16. Section 20-322, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-322 (1) Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Housing Act shall prohibit a
religious organization, association, or society or any nonprofit institution or
organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in conjunction with a
religious organization, association, or society from limiting the sale, rental,
or occupancy of a dwelling which it owns or operates for other than commercial
purposes to persons of the same religion or from giving preferences to such
persons unless membership in such religion is restricted on account of race,
color, national origin, disability, familial status, or sex, or military or
veteran status.
(2) Nothing in the act shall prohibit a private club not in fact open to
the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides
lodgings which it owns or operates for other than commercial purposes, from
limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodging to its members or from giving
preference to its members.
(3) Nothing in the act shall prohibit or limit the right of any person or
his or her authorized representative to refuse to rent a room or rooms in his
or her own home for any reason or for no reason or to change tenants in his or
her own home as often as desired, except that this exception shall not apply to
any person who makes available for rental or occupancy more than four sleeping
rooms to a person or family within his or her own home.
(4)(a) Nothing in the act shall limit the applicability of any reasonable
local restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to
occupy a dwelling, and nothing in the act regarding familial status shall apply
with respect to housing for older persons.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, housing for older persons shall mean
housing:
(i) Provided under any state program that the commission determines is
specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons as defined in the
program;
(ii) Intended for and solely occupied by persons sixty-two years of age or
older; or
(iii) Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person fifty-
five years of age or older per unit. In determining whether housing qualifies
as housing for older persons under this subdivision, the commission shall
develop regulations which require at least the following factors:
(A) The existence of significant facilities and services specifically
designed to meet the physical or social needs of older persons or, if the
provision of such facilities and services is not practicable, that such housing
is necessary to provide important housing opportunities for older persons;
(B) That at least eighty percent of the units are occupied by at least one
person fifty-five years of age or older per unit; and
(C) The publication of and adherence to policies and procedures which
demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons
fifty-five years of age or older.
(c) Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older
persons by reason of:
(i) Persons residing in the housing as of September 6, 1991, who do not
meet the age requirements of subdivision (b)(ii) or (iii) of this subsection if
succeeding occupants of the housing meet the age requirements; or
(ii) Unoccupied units if the units are reserved for occupancy by persons
who meet the age requirements.
(5) Nothing in the act shall prohibit conduct against a person because
such person has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of the
illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in
section 28-401.
(6) Nothing in the act shall prohibit otherwise nondiscriminatory conduct
intended to benefit veterans or servicemembers or their family members, such as
providing housing limited to veterans or servicemembers or their family
members, providing favorable conditions of loans, leases, mortgages, or
contracts, or otherwise offering benefits that are limited to veterans or
servicemembers or their family members.
Sec. 17. Section 20-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
20-325 The commission shall:
(1) Make studies with respect to the nature and extent of discriminatory
housing practices in representative urban, suburban, and rural communities
throughout the state;
(2) Publish and disseminate reports, recommendations, and information
derived from such studies, including an annual report to the Legislature to be
submitted electronically:
(a) Specifying the nature and extent of progress made statewide in
eliminating discriminatory housing practices and furthering the purposes of the
-5-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Nebraska Fair Housing Act, obstacles remaining to achieving equal housing
opportunity, and recommendations for further legislative or executive action;
and
(b) Containing tabulations of the number of instances and the reasons
therefor in the preceding year in which:
(i) Investigations have not been completed as required by subdivision (1)
(b) of section 20-326;
(ii) Determinations have not been made within the time specified in
section 20-333; and
(iii) Hearings have not been commenced or findings and conclusions have
not been made as required by section 20-337;
(3) Cooperate with and render technical assistance to state, local, and
other public or private agencies, organizations, and institutions which are
formulating or carrying on programs to prevent or eliminate discriminatory
housing practices;
(4) Electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature and make
available to the public data on the age, race, color, religion, national
origin, disability, familial status, and sex, and military or veteran status of
persons and households who are applicants for, participants in, or
beneficiaries or potential beneficiaries of programs administered by the
commission. In order to develop the data to be included and made available to
the public under this subdivision, the commission shall, without regard to any
other provision of law, collect such information relating to those
characteristics as the commission determines to be necessary or appropriate;
(5) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, subject to the approval of
the members of the commission, regarding the investigative and conciliation
process that provide for testing standards, fundamental due process, and notice
to the parties of their rights and responsibilities; and
(6) Have authority to enter into agreements with the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development in cooperative agreements under the
Fair Housing Assistance Program. The commission shall further have the
authority to enter into agreements with testing organizations to assist in
investigative activities. The commission shall not enter into any agreements
under which compensation to the testing organization is partially or wholly
based on the number of conciliations, settlements, and reasonable cause
determinations.
Sec. 18. Section 23-2525, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-2525 The county personnel officer shall, with the assistance of two
advisory groups, one of classified employees and one of department heads,
prepare and submit to the personnel policy board proposed personnel rules and
regulations for the classified service. He or she shall give reasonable notice
thereof to the heads of all agencies, departments, county employee
associations, and institutions affected thereby, and they shall be given an
opportunity, upon request, to appear before the board and present their views
thereon. The personnel policy board shall submit the rules and regulations for
adoption or amendment and adoption by resolution of the board of county
commissioners. Amendments thereto shall be made in the same manner. The rules
and regulations shall provide:
(1) For a single integrated classification plan covering all positions in
the county service except those expressly exempt from the County Civil Service
Act, which shall group all positions into defined classes containing a
descriptive class title and a code identifying each class, and which shall be
based on similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed, so that
the same qualifications may reasonably be required and the same schedule of pay
may be equitably applied to all positions in the same class. After the
classification plan has been approved by the personnel policy board, the county
personnel officer shall be responsible for the administration and maintenance
of the plan and for the allocation of each classified position. Any employee
affected by the allocation of a position to a class shall, upon request, be
given a reasonable opportunity to be heard thereon by the personnel policy
board who shall issue an advisory opinion to the personnel officer;
(2) For a compensation plan for all employees in the classified service,
comprising salary schedules, hours of work, premium payments, special
allowances, and fringe benefits, considering the amount of money available, the
prevailing rates of pay in government and private employment, the cost of
living, the level of each class of position in the classification plan, and
other relevant factors. Initial, intervening, and maximum rates of pay for each
class shall be established to provide for steps in salary advancement without
change of duty in recognition of demonstrated quality and length of service.
The compensation plan and amendments thereto shall be adopted in the manner
prescribed for rules and regulations and shall in no way limit the authority of
the board of county commissioners relative to appropriations for salary and
wage expenditures;
(3) For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness of
applicants for the respective positions. Competitive examination shall not be
required for transferred employees transferring from positions in the state or
a political subdivision to positions in the county pursuant to a merger of
services or transferred employees transferring from positions in the state or a
political subdivision to positions in the county due to the assumption of
functions of the state or a political subdivision by the county. The rules and
regulations shall provide for the public announcement of the holding of
examinations and shall authorize the personnel officer to prescribe examination
-6-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
procedures and to place the names of successful candidates on eligible lists in
accordance with their respective ratings. Examinations may be assembled or
unassembled and may include various job-related examining techniques, such as
rating training and experience, written tests, oral interviews, recognition of
professional licensing, performance tests, investigations, and any other
measures of ability to perform the duties of the position. Examinations shall
be scored objectively and employment registers shall be established in the
order of final score. Certification of eligibility for appointment to vacancies
shall be in accordance with a formula which limits selection by the hiring
department from among the highest ranking available and eligible candidates,
but which also permits selective certification under appropriate conditions as
prescribed in the rules and regulations;
(4) For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to
examinations and to record of performance, seniority, and conduct. Vacancies
shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the best interest of
the service, and preference may be given to employees within the department in
which the vacancy occurs;
(5) For the rejection of candidates who fail to comply with reasonable
requirements of the personnel officer in regard to such factors as physical
conditions, training, and experience or who have been guilty of infamous or
disgraceful conduct, who are addicted to alcohol or narcotics, or who have
attempted any deception or fraud in connection with an examination;
(6) For prohibiting Prohibiting disqualification of any person from taking
an examination, from promotion, or from holding a position because of:
(a) Race, national origin, physical disabilities, age, or political or
religious opinions or affiliations;
(b) Sex race, sex, unless it constitutes a bona fide occupational
qualification; , or national origin, physical disabilities, age, political or
religious opinions or affiliations
(c) Military or veteran status, subject to section 91 of this act; , or
(d) Other other factors which have no bearing upon the individual's
fitness to hold the position;
(7) For a period of probation not to exceed one year before appointment or
promotion may be made complete, and during which period a probationer may be
separated from his or her position without the right of appeal or hearing
except as provided in section 23-2531. After a probationer has been separated,
he or she may again be placed on the eligible list at the discretion of the
personnel officer. The rules shall provide that a probationer shall be dropped
from the payroll at the expiration of his or her probationary period if, within
ten days prior thereto, the appointing authority has notified the personnel
officer in writing that the services of the employee have been unsatisfactory;
(8) When an employee has been promoted but fails to satisfactorily perform
the duties of the new position during the probationary period, he or she shall
be returned to a position comparable to that held immediately prior to
promotion at the current salary of such position;
(9) For temporary or seasonal appointments of limited terms of not to
exceed one year;
(10) For part-time appointment where the employee accrues benefits of
full-time employment on a basis proportional to the time worked;
(11) For emergency employment for not more than thirty days with or
without examination, with the consent of the county personnel officer and
department head;
(12) For provisional employment without competitive examination when there
is no appropriate eligible list available. No such provisional employment shall
continue longer than six months, nor shall successive provisional appointments
be allowed;
(13) For transfer from a position in one department to a similar position
in another department involving similar qualifications, duties,
responsibilities, and salary ranges;
(14) For the transfer of employees of the state or a political subdivision
to the county pursuant to a merger of services or due to the assumption of
functions of the state or a political subdivision by the county;
(15) For layoff by reason of lack of funds or work or abolition of the
position, or material change in duties or organization, for the layoff of
nontenured employees first, and for reemployment of permanent employees so laid
off, giving consideration in both layoff and reemployment to performance record
and seniority in service;
(16) For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and
complaints;
(17) For hours of work, holidays, and attendance regulations in the
various classes of positions in the classified service, and for annual, sick,
and special leaves of absence, with or without pay, or at reduced pay;
(18) For the development of employee morale, safety, and training
programs;
(19) For a procedure whereby an appointing authority may suspend, reduce,
demote, or dismiss an employee for misconduct, inefficiency, incompetence,
insubordination, malfeasance, or other unfitness to render effective service
and for the investigation and public hearing of appeals of such suspended,
reduced, demoted, or dismissed employee;
(20) For granting of leave without pay to a permanent employee to accept a
position in the unclassified service, and for his or her return to a position
comparable to that formerly held in the classified service at the conclusion of
such service;
-7-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(21) For regulation covering political activity of employees in the
classified service; and
(22) For other regulations not inconsistent with the County Civil Service
Act and which may be necessary for its effective implementation.
Sec. 19. Section 23-2531, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-2531 (1) Discrimination against any person in recruitment, examination,
appointment, training, promotion, retention, discipline, or any other aspect of
personnel administration because of political or religious opinions or
affiliations or because of race, national origin, or other nonmerit factors
shall be prohibited. Discrimination on the basis of age or sex or physical
disability shall be prohibited unless specific age, sex, or physical
requirements constitute a bona fide occupational qualification necessary to
proper and efficient administration. Subject to section 91 of this act,
discrimination on the basis of military or veteran status shall be prohibited.
The rules and regulations shall provide for appeals in cases of alleged
discrimination to the personnel policy board whose determination shall be
binding upon a finding of discrimination.
(2) No person shall make any false statement, certificate, mark, rating,
or report with regard to any test, certification, or appointment made under the
County Civil Service Act or in any manner commit or attempt to commit any fraud
preventing the impartial execution of the act and the rules and regulations
promulgated pursuant to the act.
(3) No person shall, directly or indirectly, give, render, pay, offer,
solicit, or accept any money, service, or other valuable consideration for or
on account of any appointment, proposed appointment, promotion, or proposed
promotion to, or any advantage in, a position in the classified service.
(4) No employee of the personnel office, examiner, or other person shall
defeat, deceive, or obstruct any person in his or her right to examination,
eligibility, certification, or appointment under the act, or furnish to any
person any special or secret information for the purpose of affecting the
rights or prospects of any persons with respect to employment in the classified
service.
Sec. 20. Section 23-2541, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
23-2541 The personnel policy board, if created, shall, with the assistance
of two advisory groups, one of classified employees and one of department
heads, adopt proposed personnel rules and regulations for the classified
service and provide reasonable notice of proposed rules and regulations to the
heads of all agencies, departments, county employee associations, and
institutions affected thereby. Any person affected by such rules and
regulations shall be given an opportunity, upon request, to appear before the
personnel policy board and present his or her views on the rules and
regulations. The personnel policy board shall submit proposed rules and
regulations or amendments for adoption by the county board. The county board
may consider and adopt only personnel rules and regulations or amendments
proposed by the personnel policy board and may not repeal or revoke a rule or
regulation except upon the recommendation of the personnel policy board.
The rules and regulations or amendments may provide:
(1) For a single integrated classification plan covering all positions in
the county service except those expressly exempt from sections 23-2534 to
23-2544, which shall (a) group all positions into defined classes containing a
descriptive class title and a code identifying each class and (b) be based on
similarity of duties performed and responsibilities assumed, so that the same
qualifications may reasonably be required and the same schedule of pay may be
equitably applied to all positions in the same class. After the classification
plan has been approved by the personnel policy board, the county personnel
officer shall be responsible for the administration and maintenance of the plan
and for the allocation of each classified position. Any employee affected by
the allocation of a position to a class shall, upon request, be given a
reasonable opportunity to be heard on such allocation by the personnel policy
board which shall issue an advisory opinion to the county personnel officer;
(2) For a compensation plan for all employees in the classified service,
comprising salary schedules, attendance regulations, premium payments, special
allowances, and fringe benefits, considering the amount of money available, the
prevailing rates of pay in government and private employment, the cost of
living, the level of each class of position in the classification plan, and
other relevant factors. The compensation plan and amendments to such plan shall
be adopted in the manner prescribed for rules and regulations and shall in no
way limit the authority of the county board relative to appropriations for
salary and wage expenditures;
(3) For open competitive examinations to test the relative fitness of
applicants for the respective positions. The rules and regulations shall
provide for the public announcement of the holding of examinations and shall
authorize the county personnel officer to prescribe examination procedures and
to place the names of successful candidates on eligible lists in accordance
with their respective ratings. Examinations may be assembled or unassembled and
may include various job-related examining techniques, such as rating training
and experience, written tests, oral interviews, recognition of professional
licensing, performance tests, investigations, and any other measures of ability
to perform the duties of the position. Examinations shall be scored objectively
and employment registers shall be established in the order of final score.
Certification of eligibility for appointment to vacancies shall be in
-8-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
accordance with a formula which limits selection by the hiring department from
among the highest ranking available and eligible candidates, but which also
permits selective certification under appropriate conditions as prescribed in
the rules and regulations;
(4) For promotions which shall give appropriate consideration to
examinations and to record of performance, seniority, and conduct. Vacancies
shall be filled by promotion whenever practicable and in the best interest of
the service and preference may be given to employees within the department in
which the vacancy occurs;
(5) For the rejection of candidates who fail to comply with reasonable
requirements of the county personnel officer in regard to such factors as
physical conditions, training, and experience, who have been guilty of infamous
or disgraceful conduct, who are currently abusing alcohol or narcotics, or who
have attempted any deception or fraud in connection with an examination;
(6) For prohibiting disqualification of any person from (a) taking an
examination, (b) promotion, or (c) holding a position, solely because of:
(a) Race race, sex, national origin, physical disabilities, age, political
or religious opinions or affiliations; , or
(b) Military or veteran status, subject to section 91 of this act; or
(c) Other other factors which have no bearing upon the individual's
fitness to hold the position;
(7) For a period of probation, not to exceed one year, before appointment
or promotion may be made complete and during which period a probationer may be
separated from his or her position without the right of appeal or hearing.
After a probationer has been separated, he or she may again be placed on the
eligible list at the discretion of the county personnel officer. The rules and
regulations shall provide that a probationer shall be dropped from the payroll
at the expiration of his or her probationary period if, within ten days prior
thereto, the appointing authority has notified the county personnel officer in
writing that the services of the employee have been unsatisfactory;
(8) For temporary or seasonal appointments of limited terms of not to
exceed one year;
(9) For part-time appointment in which the employee accrues benefits of
full-time employment on a basis proportional to the time worked;
(10) For emergency employment for not more than thirty days with or
without examination with the consent of the county personnel officer and
department head;
(11) For provisional employment without competitive examination when there
is no appropriate eligible list available. Provisional employment shall not
continue longer than six months and successive provisional appointments shall
not be allowed;
(12) For transfer from a position in one department to a similar position
in another department involving similar qualifications, duties,
responsibilities, and salary ranges;
(13) For layoff by reason of lack of funds or work, abolition of the
position, or material change in duties or organization, for the layoff of
nontenured employees first, and for reemployment of permanent employees so laid
off, giving consideration in both layoff and reemployment to performance record
and seniority in service;
(14) For establishment of a plan for resolving employee grievances and
complaints;
(15) For holidays, for attendance regulations in the various classes of
positions in the classified service, and for annual, sick, and special leaves
of absence, with or without pay or at reduced pay;
(16) For the development of employee morale, safety, and training
programs;
(17) For a procedure whereby an appointing authority may suspend, reduce,
demote, or dismiss an employee for misconduct, inefficiency, incompetence,
insubordination, malfeasance, or other unfitness to render effective service
and for the investigation and public hearing of appeals of such suspended,
reduced, demoted, or dismissed employee;
(18) For granting of leave without pay to a permanent employee to accept a
position in the unclassified service and for his or her return to a position
comparable to that formerly held in the classified service at the conclusion of
such service;
(19) For regulation covering political activity of employees in the
classified service; and
(20) For other rules and regulations not inconsistent with sections
23-2534 to 23-2544 and the implementation of personnel policy in the county.
Sec. 21. Section 25-1030.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
25-1030.01 (1) Upon filing an application for determination of liability
of the garnishee, the plaintiff shall give the garnishee and the defendant in
the original action notice of the filing thereof and of the time and place of
trial thereon. Subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the The
notice shall be given within such time and in such manner as the court shall
direct.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Corporate entity means any corporation, limited liability company,
limited liability partnership, or series limited liability company or any other
corporate entity that is required by the statutes of Nebraska to have a
registered agent for service of process in Nebraska; and
(b) Corporate entity does not include any financial institution as
-9-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
described in subsection (6) of section 25-1056.
(3)(a) If the garnishee is a corporate entity, notice under subsection (1)
of this section shall be served upon the location of the corporate entity's
registered agent for service of process in this state.
(b) If service is unable to be accomplished as provided in subdivision (3)
(a) of this section, such notice shall be served in accordance with section
25-509.01.
(4) In a case involving a garnishment served upon a corporate entity
against wages due to a judgment debtor, the corporate entity shall not be
liable as a garnishee under this section unless the plaintiff shows:
(a) That service was made in accordance with subdivision (3)(a) of this
section; or
(b) That service was made in accordance with subdivision (3)(b) of this
section and:
(i) That a copy of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section
was sent to the location of the corporate entity's registered agent;
(ii) That the garnishee requested no such copy be sent to such location;
or
(iii) That the corporate entity does not have a registered agent in this
state.
Sec. 22. Section 25-1056, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
25-1056 (1) In all cases when a judgment has been entered by any court of
record and the judgment creditor or his or her agent or attorney has filed an
affidavit setting forth the amount due on the judgment, interest, and costs in
the office of the clerk of the court where the judgment has been entered and
that he or she has good reason to and does believe that any person,
partnership, limited liability company, or corporation, naming him, her, or it,
has property of and is indebted to the judgment debtor, the clerk shall issue a
summons which shall set forth the amount due on the judgment, interest, and
costs as shown in the affidavit and require such person, partnership, limited
liability company, or corporation, as garnishee, to answer written
interrogatories to be furnished by the plaintiff and to be attached to such
summons respecting the matters set forth in section 25-1026. The summons shall
be returnable within ten days from the date of its issuance and shall require
the garnishee to answer within ten days from the date of service upon him or
her. Except when wages are involved, the garnishee shall hold the property of
every description and the credits of the defendant in his or her possession or
under his or her control at the time of the service of the summons and
interrogatories until the further order of the court. If the only property in
the possession or under the control of the garnishee at the time of the service
of the summons and interrogatories is credits of the defendant and the amount
of such credits is not in dispute by the garnishee, then such garnishee shall
only hold the credits of the defendant in his or her possession or under his or
her control at the time of the service of the summons and interrogatories to
the extent of the amount of the judgment, interest, and costs set forth in the
summons until further order of the court. When wages are involved, the
garnishee shall pay to the employee all disposable earnings exempted from
garnishment by statute, and any disposable earnings remaining after such
payment shall be retained by the garnishee until further order of the court.
Thereafter, the service of the summons and interrogatories and all further
proceedings shall be in all respects the same as is provided for in sections
25-1011 and 25-1026 to 25-1031.01 unless inconsistent with this section.
(2) If it appears from the answer of the garnishee that the judgment
debtor was an employee of the garnishee, that the garnishee otherwise owed
earnings to the judgment debtor when the garnishment order was served, or that
earnings would be owed within sixty days thereafter and there is not a
successful written objection to the order or the answer of the garnishee filed,
on application by the judgment creditor, the court shall order that the
nonexempt earnings, if any, withheld by the garnishee after service of the
order be transferred to the court for delivery to the judgment creditor who is
entitled to such earnings. Except for garnishments in support of a person, the
payments may be made payable to the judgment creditor or assignee and shall be
forwarded to the issuing court to record the judgment payment prior to the
court delivering the payment to the judgment creditor or assignee. The court
shall, upon application of the judgment creditor, further order that the
garnishment is a continuing lien against the nonexempt earnings of the judgment
debtor. An order of continuing lien on nonexempt earnings entered pursuant to
this section shall require the garnishee to continue to withhold the nonexempt
earnings of the judgment debtor for as long as the continuing lien remains in
effect.
Beginning with the pay period during which the writ was served and while
the continuing lien remains in effect, the garnishee shall deliver the
nonexempt earnings to the court from which the garnishment was issued for each
pay period or on a monthly basis if the garnishee so desires and shall deliver
to the judgment debtor his or her exempt earnings for each pay period.
(3) A continuing lien ordered pursuant to this section shall be invalid
and shall have no force and effect upon the occurrence of any of the following:
(a) The underlying judgment is satisfied in full or vacated or expires;
(b) The judgment debtor leaves the garnishee's employ for more than sixty
days;
(c) The judgment creditor releases the garnishment;
(d) The proceedings are stayed by a court of competent jurisdiction,
-10-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
including the United States Bankruptcy Court;
(e) The judgment debtor has not earned any nonexempt earnings for at least
sixty days;
(f) The court orders that the garnishment be quashed; or
(g) Ninety days have expired since service of the writ. The judgment
creditor may extend the lien for a second ninety-day period by filing with the
court a notice of extension during the fifteen days immediately prior to the
expiration of the initial lien, and the continuing lien in favor of the initial
judgment creditor shall continue for a second ninety-day period.
(4)(a) To determine priority, garnishments and liens shall rank according
to time of service.
(b) Garnishments, liens, and wage assignments which are not for the
support of a person shall be inferior to wage assignments for the support of a
person. Garnishments which are not for the support of a person and liens shall
be inferior to garnishments for the support of a person.
(5) Only one order of continuing lien against earnings due the judgment
debtor shall be in effect at one time. If an employee's wages are already being
garnished pursuant to a continuing lien at the time of service of a garnishment
upon an employer, the answer to garnishment interrogatories shall include such
information along with the date of termination of such continuing lien and the
title of the case from which such garnishment is issued. Except as provided in
subsection (4) of this section, a continuing lien obtained pursuant to this
section shall have priority over any subsequent garnishment or wage assignment.
(6)(a) In any case involving service of a garnishment summons on a
financial institution where deposits are received within this state, the
financial institution shall (i) if its main chartered office is located in this
state, designate its main chartered office for the service of summons or (ii)
if its main chartered office is located in another state, designate any one of
its offices or branches or its agent for service of process in this state for
service of summons. The designation of a main chartered office or an office or
branch or the agent for service of process under this subdivision shall be made
by filing a notice of designation with the Department of Banking and Finance,
shall contain the physical address of the main chartered office or the office
or branch or the agent for service of process designated, and shall be
effective upon placement on the department website. The department shall post
the list of such designated main chartered offices and offices or branches or
agents for service of process on its website for access by the public. A
financial institution may modify or revoke a designation made under this
subdivision by filing the modification or revocation with the department. The
modification or revocation shall be effective when the department's website has
been updated to reflect the modification or revocation, except that the
judgment creditor may rely upon the designation that was modified or revoked
during the thirty-day period following the effective date of the modification
or revocation if the summons is timely served upon the financial institution.
The department shall update its website to reflect a filing by a financial
institution pursuant to this subdivision or a modification or revocation filed
by a financial institution pursuant to this subdivision within ten business
days following the filing by the financial institution. The department website
shall reflect the date its online records for each financial institution have
most recently been updated.
(b) If a financial institution where deposits are received has designated
its main chartered office or one of its offices or branches or its agent for
service of process for the service of summons, service made on the main
chartered office or the office or branch or the agent for service of process so
designated shall be valid and effective as to any property or credits of the
defendant in the possession or control of the main chartered office of the
financial institution in this state and any of the financial institution
offices or branches located within this state. If service of summons is not
made on the main chartered office or the office or branch or the agent for
service of process designated by the financial institution, but instead is made
at another office or branch of the financial institution located in Nebraska,
the financial institution, in its discretion, and without violating any
obligation to its customer, may elect to treat the service of summons as valid
and effective as to any property or credits of the defendant in the possession
or control of the main chartered office of the financial institution in this
state and any of the financial institution offices or branches located within
this state. In the absence of such an election, the financial institution shall
file a statement with the interrogatories that the summons was not served at
the financial institution's designated location for receiving service of
summons and, therefore, was not processed, and shall provide the address at
which the financial institution is to receive service of summons.
(c) For purposes of this subsection, financial institution means a bank,
savings bank, building and loan association, savings and loan association, or
credit union whether chartered by the United States, the Department of Banking
and Finance, or a foreign state agency.
(d) The notice of designation, modification, or revocation shall be made
by a financial institution on forms prescribed by the Department of Banking and
Finance department.
(e) The Department of Banking and Finance, any employee of the department,
or any person acting on behalf of the department shall be immune from civil and
criminal liability for any acts or omissions which occur as a result of the
requirements of this subsection.
(7)(a) For purposes of this section:
-11-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(i) Corporate entity means any corporation, limited liability company,
limited liability partnership, or series limited liability company or any other
corporate entity that is required by the statutes of Nebraska to have a
registered agent for service of process in Nebraska; and
(ii) Corporate entity does not include any financial institution described
in subsection (6) of this section.
(b) In any case involving service of a garnishment summons on a corporate
entity against wages due to a judgment debtor from the corporate entity,
service shall be made upon the corporate entity in accordance with section
25-509.01 or in a manner mutually agreed upon by the garnishee and judgment
creditor.
(c) If service is not made upon the corporate entity's registered agent
for service of process in this state, the judgment creditor shall send a copy
of such summons to the location of the corporate entity's registered agent for
service of process in this state unless the corporate entity has requested that
no such copy be sent or no such registered agent exists. Proof of compliance
with this subdivision (7)(c) is not required for a garnishment to continue.
Sec. 23. Section 25-1645, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
25-1645 The Legislature hereby declares that it is the intent and purpose
of the Jury Selection Act to create a jury system which will ensure that:
(1) All persons selected for jury service are selected at random from a
fair cross section of the population of the area served by the court;
(2) All qualified citizens have the opportunity to be considered for jury
service;
(3) All qualified citizens fulfill their obligation to serve as jurors
when summoned for that purpose; and
(4) No citizen is excluded from jury service in this state as a result of
discrimination based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or
economic status, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 24. Section 27-413, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
27-413 For purposes of sections 27-414 and 27-415, offense of sexual
assault means sexual assault under section 28-319 or 28-320, sexual abuse by a
school worker employee under section 28-316.01, sexual assault of a child under
section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, sexual assault by use of an electronic
communication device under section 28-320.02, sexual abuse of an inmate or
parolee under sections 28-322.01 to 28-322.03, sexual abuse of a protected
individual under section 28-322.04, sexual abuse of a detainee under section
28-322.05, an attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the crimes listed in this
section, or the commission of or conviction for a crime in another jurisdiction
that is substantially similar to any crime listed in this section.
Sec. 25. Section 28-105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-105 (1) For purposes of the Nebraska Criminal Code and any statute
passed by the Legislature after the date of passage of the code, felonies are
divided into ten classes which are distinguished from one another by the
following penalties which are authorized upon conviction:
Class I felony Death
Class IA felony Life imprisonment
Class IB felony Maximum—life imprisonment
Minimum—twenty years imprisonment
Class IC felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Mandatory minimum—five years imprisonment
Class ID felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Mandatory minimum—three years imprisonment
Class II felony Maximum—fifty years imprisonment
Minimum—one year imprisonment
Class IIA felony Maximum—twenty years imprisonment
Minimum—none
Class III felony Maximum—four years imprisonment and two years
post-release supervision or
twenty-five thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
-12-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
post-release supervision
Minimum—none for imprisonment and nine months
post-release supervision if imprisonment is imposed
Class IIIA felony Maximum—three years imprisonment
and eighteen months post-release supervision or
ten thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
post-release supervision
Minimum—none for imprisonment and nine months
post-release supervision if imprisonment is imposed
Class IV felony Maximum—two years imprisonment and twelve
months post-release supervision or
ten thousand dollars fine, or both
Minimum—none for imprisonment and none for
post-release supervision
(2) All sentences for maximum terms of imprisonment for one year or more
for felonies shall be served in institutions under the jurisdiction of the
Department of Correctional Services. All sentences for maximum terms of
imprisonment of less than one year shall be served in the county jail.
(3) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority granted in sections
29-2221 and 29-2222 to increase sentences for habitual criminals.
(4) A person convicted of a felony for which a mandatory minimum sentence
is prescribed shall not be eligible for probation.
(5) All sentences of post-release supervision shall be served under the
jurisdiction of the Office of Probation Administration and shall be subject to
conditions imposed pursuant to section 29-2262 and subject to sanctions
authorized pursuant to section 29-2266.02.
(6) Any person who is sentenced to imprisonment for a Class I, IA, IB, IC,
ID, II, or IIA felony and sentenced concurrently or consecutively to
imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony shall not be subject to post-
release supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(7) Any person who is sentenced to imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or
IV felony committed prior to August 30, 2015, and sentenced concurrently or
consecutively to imprisonment for a Class III, IIIA, or IV felony committed on
or after August 30, 2015, shall not be subject to post-release supervision
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(8) The changes made to the penalties for Class III, IIIA, and IV felonies
by Laws 2015, LB605, do not apply to any offense committed prior to August 30,
2015, as provided in section 28-116.
Sec. 26. Section 28-316.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
28-316.01 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Sexual contact has the same meaning as in section 28-318;
(b) Sexual penetration has the same meaning as in section 28-318;
(c) School means a public, private, denominational, or parochial school
approved or accredited by the State Department of Education;
(d) School contract worker means a person nineteen years of age or older
who, as part of such person's employment, is assigned to work at a school and
works in proximity to students of such school, but who is not employed by such
school;
(e) (c) School employee means a person nineteen years of age or older who
is employed by a public, private, denominational, or parochial school approved
or accredited by the State Department of Education; and
(f) School worker means a school contract worker or a school employee; and
(g) (d) Student means a person at least sixteen but not more than nineteen
years of age enrolled in or attending a public, private, denominational, or
parochial school approved or accredited by the State Department of Education,
or who was such a person enrolled in or who attended such a school within
ninety days of any violation of this section.
(2) A person commits the offense of sexual abuse by a school worker
employee if a school worker employee subjects a student in the school to which
such worker employee is assigned for work to sexual penetration or sexual
contact, or engages in a pattern or scheme of conduct to subject a student in
the school to which such worker employee is assigned for work to sexual
penetration or sexual contact. It is not a defense to a charge under this
section that the student consented to such sexual penetration or sexual
-13-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
contact.
(3) Any school worker employee who engages in sexual penetration with a
student is guilty of sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the first
degree. Sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the first degree is a Class
IIA felony.
(4) Any school worker employee who engages in sexual contact with a
student is guilty of sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the second
degree. Sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the second degree is a
Class IIIA felony.
(5) Any school worker employee who engages in a pattern or scheme of
conduct with the intent to subject a student to sexual penetration or sexual
contact is guilty of sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the third
degree. Sexual abuse by a school worker employee in the third degree is a Class
IV felony.
Sec. 27. Section 28-318, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-318 As used in sections 28-317 to 28-322.05, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Actor means a person accused of sexual assault;
(2) Intimate parts means the genital area, groin, inner thighs, buttocks,
or breasts;
(3) Past sexual behavior means sexual behavior other than the sexual
behavior upon which the sexual assault is alleged;
(4) Serious personal injury means great bodily injury or disfigurement,
extreme mental anguish or mental trauma, pregnancy, disease, or loss or
impairment of a sexual or reproductive organ;
(5) Sexual contact means the intentional touching of the victim's sexual
or intimate parts or the intentional touching of the victim's clothing covering
the immediate area of the victim's sexual or intimate parts. Sexual contact
also means the touching by the victim of the actor's sexual or intimate parts
or the clothing covering the immediate area of the actor's sexual or intimate
parts when such touching is intentionally caused by the actor. Sexual contact
includes only such conduct which can be reasonably construed as being for the
purpose of sexual arousal or gratification of either party. Sexual contact also
includes the touching of a child with the actor's sexual or intimate parts on
any part of the child's body for purposes of sexual abuse by a school worker
employee under section 28-316.01 or sexual assault of a child under sections
28-319.01 and 28-320.01;
(6) Sexual penetration means sexual intercourse in its ordinary meaning,
cunnilingus, fellatio, anal intercourse, or any intrusion, however slight, of
any part of the actor's or victim's body or any object manipulated by the actor
into the genital or anal openings of the victim's body which can be reasonably
construed as being for nonmedical, nonhealth, or nonlaw enforcement purposes.
Sexual penetration shall not require emission of semen;
(7) Victim means the person alleging to have been sexually assaulted;
(8) Without consent means:
(a)(i) The victim was compelled to submit due to the use of force or
threat of force or coercion, or (ii) the victim expressed a lack of consent
through words, or (iii) the victim expressed a lack of consent through conduct,
or (iv) the consent, if any was actually given, was the result of the actor's
deception as to the identity of the actor or the nature or purpose of the act
on the part of the actor;
(b) The victim need only resist, either verbally or physically, so as to
make the victim's refusal to consent genuine and real and so as to reasonably
make known to the actor the victim's refusal to consent; and
(c) A victim need not resist verbally or physically where it would be
useless or futile to do so; and
(9) Force or threat of force means (a) the use of physical force which
overcomes the victim's resistance or (b) the threat of physical force, express
or implied, against the victim or a third person that places the victim in fear
of death or in fear of serious personal injury to the victim or a third person
where the victim reasonably believes that the actor has the present or future
ability to execute the threat.
Sec. 28. Section 28-322, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
28-322 For purposes of sections 28-322 to 28-322.03:
(1) Inmate or parolee means any individual confined in a facility operated
by the Department of Correctional Services or a city or county correctional or
jail facility or under parole supervision; and
(2) Person means (a) an individual employed by the Department of
Correctional Services or by the Division of Parole Supervision, including any
individual working in central administration of the department, any individual
working under contract with the department, and any individual, other than an
inmate's spouse, to whom the department has authorized or delegated control
over an inmate or an inmate's activities, (b) an individual employed by a city
or county correctional or jail facility, including any individual working in
central administration of the city or county correctional or jail facility, any
individual working under contract with the city or county correctional or jail
facility, and any individual, other than an inmate's spouse, to whom the city
or county correctional or jail facility has authorized or delegated control
over an inmate or an inmate's activities, and (c) an individual employed by the
Office of Probation Administration who performs official duties within any
facility operated by the Department of Correctional Services or a city or
-14-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
county correctional or jail facility.
Sec. 29. Section 28-519, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-519 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Tamper means to interfere with, displace, remove, damage, disable,
destroy, set fire to, impair, or otherwise interfere with something without
lawful authority or express permission; and
(b) Rail infrastructure means any of the following that are located on
railroad property or that are owned, leased, possessed, operated, or otherwise
used for or in connection with railroad operations: A train, locomotive,
freight or passenger car, or any other on-track vehicle or equipment; any
railroad track or structure; any signaling or communication system or
component; or any station, terminal, depot, or other facility.
(2) (1) A person commits criminal mischief if he or she:
(a) Damages property of another intentionally or recklessly; or
(b) Intentionally tampers with property of another so as to endanger
person or property; or
(c) Intentionally or maliciously causes another to suffer pecuniary loss
by deception or threat.
(3) Criminal mischief is a Class III felony if the actor acts
intentionally or maliciously with the intent to cause a substantial
interruption or impairment of:
(a) Any rail infrastructure;
(b) Any telecommunication or broadband communication service; or
(c) The supply of water, gas, or power.
(4) (2) Criminal mischief is a Class IV felony if the actor intentionally
or maliciously causes pecuniary loss of five thousand dollars or more , or a
substantial interruption or impairment of public communication, transportation,
supply of water, gas, or power, or other public service.
(5) (3) Criminal mischief is a Class I misdemeanor if the actor
intentionally or maliciously causes pecuniary loss of one thousand five hundred
dollars or more but less than five thousand dollars.
(6) (4) Criminal mischief is a Class II misdemeanor if the actor
intentionally or maliciously causes pecuniary loss of five hundred dollars or
more but less than one thousand five hundred dollars.
(7) (5) Criminal mischief is a Class III misdemeanor if the actor
intentionally, maliciously, or recklessly causes pecuniary loss in an amount of
less than five hundred dollars, or if his or her action results in no pecuniary
loss.
Sec. 30. Section 29-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
29-401 Every sheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, security
guard, police officer, or peace officer as defined in subdivision (15) of
section 49-801 shall arrest and detain any person found violating any law of
this state or any legal ordinance of any city or incorporated village until a
legal warrant can be obtained, except that (1) any such law enforcement officer
taking a juvenile under the age of eighteen years into his or her custody for
any violation herein defined shall proceed as set forth in sections 43-248,
43-248.01, 43-250, 43-251, 43-251.01, and 43-253 and (2) the court in which the
juvenile is to appear shall not accept a plea from the juvenile until finding
that the parents of the juvenile have been notified or that reasonable efforts
to notify such parents have been made as provided in section 43-250.
Sec. 31. Section 29-1912, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-1912 (1) When a defendant is charged with a felony or when a defendant
is charged with a misdemeanor or a violation of a city or village ordinance for
which imprisonment is a possible penalty, he or she may request the court where
the case is to be tried, at any time after the filing of the indictment,
information, or complaint, to order the prosecuting attorney to permit the
defendant to inspect and copy or photograph:
(a) The defendant's statement, if any. For purposes of this subdivision,
statement includes any of the following which relate to the investigation of
the underlying charge or charges in the case and which were developed or
received by law enforcement agencies:
(i) Written or recorded statements;
(ii) Written summaries of oral statements; and
(iii) The substance of oral statements;
(b) The defendant's prior criminal record, if any;
(c) The defendant's recorded testimony before a grand jury;
(d) The names and addresses of witnesses on whose evidence the charge is
based;
(e) The results and reports, in any form, of physical or mental
examinations, and of scientific tests, or experiments made in connection with
the particular case, or copies thereof;
(f) Documents, papers, books, accounts, letters, photographs, objects, or
other tangible things of whatsoever kind or nature which could be used as
evidence by the prosecuting authority; and
(g) Reports developed or received by law enforcement agencies when such
reports directly relate to the investigation of the underlying charge or
charges in the case.
(2) The court may issue such an order pursuant to the provisions of this
section. In the exercise of its judicial discretion, the court shall consider,
among other things, whether:
-15-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(a) The request is material to the preparation of the defense;
(b) The request is not made primarily for the purpose of harassing the
prosecution or its witnesses;
(c) The request, if granted, would not unreasonably delay the trial of the
offense and an earlier request by the defendant could not have reasonably been
made;
(d) There is no substantial likelihood that the request, if granted, would
preclude a just determination of the issues at the trial of the offense; or
(e) The request, if granted, would not result in the possibility of bodily
harm to, or coercion of, witnesses.
(3) Whenever the court refuses to grant an order pursuant to the
provisions of this section, it shall render its findings in writing together
with the facts upon which the findings are based.
(4) Whenever the prosecuting attorney believes that the granting of an
order under the provisions of this section will result in the possibility of
bodily harm to witnesses or that witnesses will be coerced, the court may
permit him or her to make such a showing in the form of a written statement to
be inspected by the court alone. The statement shall be sealed and preserved in
the records of the court to be made available to the appellate court in the
event of an appeal by the defendant.
(5) This section is subject to the continuing duty of disclosure under
section 29-1918.
(6) (5) This section does not apply to jailhouse informants as defined in
section 29-4701. Sections 29-4701 to 29-4706 govern jailhouse informants.
Sec. 32. Section 29-1918, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-1918 A party who discovers additional evidence or material before or
during trial must promptly disclose its existence to the other party or the
court if:
(1) The evidence or material is subject to discovery or inspection under
sections 29-1912 to 29-1921; and
(2) The other party previously requested, or the court ordered, the
production of such evidence or material. If, subsequent to compliance with an
order for discovery under the provisions of sections 29-1912 to 29-1921, and
prior to or during trial, a party discovers additional material which the party
would have been under a duty to disclose or produce at the time of such
previous compliance, the party shall promptly notify the other party or the
other party's attorney and the court of the existence of the additional
material. Such notice shall be given at the time of the discovery of such
additional material.
Sec. 33. Section 29-2221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-2221 (1) Whoever has been twice convicted of a crime, sentenced, and
committed to prison, in this or any other state or by the United States or once
in this state and once at least in any other state or by the United States, for
terms of not less than one year each shall, upon conviction of a felony
committed in this state, be deemed to be a habitual criminal and shall be
punished by imprisonment in a Department of Correctional Services adult
correctional facility for a mandatory minimum term of ten years and a maximum
term of not more than sixty years, except that:
(a) If the felony committed is in violation of section 28-303, 28-304,
28-308, 28-313, 28-319, 28-319.01, 28-502, 28-929, or 28-1222, and at least one
of the habitual criminal's prior felony convictions was for a violation of one
of the sections listed in this subdivision or of a similar statute in another
state or of the United States, the mandatory minimum term shall be twenty-five
years and the maximum term not more than sixty years;
(b) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of section
28-306 and at least one of the prior convictions is in violation of subsection
(3) of section 28-306 and the other is in violation of one of the sections set
forth in subdivision (a) of this subsection or if the felony committed is in
violation of one of the sections set forth in subdivision (a) of this
subsection and both of the prior convictions are in violation of subsection (3)
of section 28-306, the mandatory minimum term shall be twenty-five years and
the maximum term not more than sixty years;
(c) If the felony committed is in violation of subsection (3) of section
28-416 or in violation of sections 28-509 to 28-518 and all of the habitual
criminal's prior felony convictions are also violations of such subsection or
sections or of a similar statute in another state or of the United States and
at least one of the prior felony convictions do not involve sexual contact,
sexual penetration, the threat to inflict serious bodily injury or death on
another person, the infliction of serious bodily injury on another person, a
deadly or dangerous weapon, or a firearm, the mandatory minimum term shall be
three years and the maximum term not more than the maximum term for the felony
committed or twenty years , whichever is greater. For this subdivision (1)(c)
to apply, no prior felony conviction may be a violation described in
subdivision (1)(a) of this section; and
(d) If a greater punishment is otherwise provided by statute, the law
creating the greater punishment shall govern.
(2) When punishment of an accused as a habitual criminal is sought, the
facts with reference thereto shall be charged in the indictment or information
which contains the charge of the felony upon which the accused is prosecuted,
but the fact that the accused is charged with being a habitual criminal shall
not be an issue upon the trial of the felony charge and shall not in any manner
-16-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
be disclosed to the jury. If the accused is convicted of a felony, before
sentence is imposed a hearing shall be had before the court alone as to whether
such person has been previously convicted of prior felonies. The court shall
fix a time for the hearing and notice thereof shall be given to the accused at
least three days prior thereto. At the hearing, if the court finds from the
evidence submitted that the accused has been convicted two or more times of
felonies and sentences imposed therefor by the courts of this or any other
state or by the United States, the court shall sentence such person so
convicted as a habitual criminal.
(3) If the person so convicted shows to the satisfaction of the court
before which the conviction was had that he or she was released from
imprisonment upon either of such sentences upon a pardon granted for the reason
that he or she was innocent, such conviction and sentence shall not be
considered as such under this section and section 29-2222.
Sec. 34. Section 29-2246, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-2246 For purposes of the Nebraska Probation Administration Act and
sections 43-2,123.01 and 83-1,102 to 83-1,104, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(1) Association means the Nebraska District Court Judges Association;
(2) Court means a district court, county court, or juvenile court as
defined in section 43-245;
(3) Office means the Office of Probation Administration;
(4) Probation means a sentence under which a person found guilty of a
crime upon verdict or plea or adjudicated delinquent or in need of special
supervision is released by a court subject to conditions imposed by the court
and subject to supervision. Probation includes post-release supervision and
supervision ordered by a court pursuant to a deferred judgment under section
29-2292 or 29-4803;
(5) Probationer means a person sentenced to probation or post-release
supervision;
(6) Probation officer means an employee of the system who supervises
probationers and conducts presentence, predisposition, or other investigations
as may be required by law or directed by a court in which he or she is serving
or performs such other duties as authorized pursuant to section 29-2258, except
unpaid volunteers from the community;
(7) Juvenile probation officer means any probation officer who supervises
probationers of a separate juvenile court;
(8) Juvenile intake probation officer means an employee of the system who
is called upon by a law enforcement officer in accordance with section 43-250
to make a decision regarding the furtherance of a juvenile's detention;
(9) Chief probation officer means the probation officer in charge of a
probation district;
(10) System means the Nebraska Probation System;
(11) Administrator means the probation administrator;
(12) Non-probation-based program or service means a program or service
established within the district, county, or juvenile courts and provided to
individuals not sentenced to probation who have been charged with or convicted
of a crime for the purpose of diverting the individual from incarceration or to
provide treatment for issues related to the individual's criminogenic needs.
Non-probation-based programs or services include, but are not limited to,
problem solving courts established pursuant to section 24-1302 and the
treatment of problems relating to substance abuse, mental health, sex offenses,
or domestic violence;
(13) Post-release supervision means the portion of a split sentence
following a period of incarceration under which a person found guilty of a
crime upon verdict or plea is released by a court subject to conditions imposed
by the court and subject to supervision by the office; and
(14) Rules and regulations means policies and procedures written by the
office and approved by the Supreme Court.
Sec. 35. Section 29-2252, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-2252 The administrator shall:
(1) Supervise and administer the office;
(2) Establish and maintain policies, standards, and procedures for the
system, with the concurrence of the Supreme Court;
(3) Prescribe and furnish such forms for records and reports for the
system as shall be deemed necessary for uniformity, efficiency, and statistical
accuracy;
(4) Establish minimum qualifications for employment as a probation officer
in this state and establish and maintain such additional qualifications as he
or she deems appropriate for appointment to the system. Qualifications for
probation officers shall be established in accordance with subsection (4) of
section 29-2253. An ex-offender released from a penal complex or a county jail
may be appointed to a position of deputy probation or parole officer. Such ex-
offender shall maintain a record free of arrests, except for minor traffic
violations, for one year immediately preceding his or her appointment;
(5) Establish and maintain advanced periodic inservice training
requirements for the system;
(6) Cooperate with all agencies, public or private, which are concerned
with treatment or welfare of persons on probation. All information provided to
the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice for the purpose
of providing access to such information to law enforcement agencies through the
-17-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
state's criminal justice information system shall be provided in a manner that
allows such information to be readily accessible through the main interface of
the system;
(7) Organize and conduct training programs for probation officers.
Training shall include the proper use of a risk and needs assessment, risk-
based supervision strategies, relationship skills, cognitive behavioral
interventions, community-based resources, criminal risk factors, and targeting
criminal risk factors to reduce recidivism and the proper use of a matrix of
administrative sanctions, custodial sanctions, and rewards developed pursuant
to subdivision (18) of this section. All probation officers employed on or
after August 30, 2015, shall complete the training requirements set forth in
this subdivision;
(8) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information concerning
probationers, probation practices, and the operation of the system and provide
the Community Corrections Division of the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice with the information needed to compile the
report required in section 47-624;
(9) Interpret the probation program to the public with a view toward
developing a broad base of public support;
(10) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving the
effectiveness of the system. Subject to the availability of funding, the
administrator shall contract with an independent contractor or academic
institution for evaluation of existing community corrections facilities and
programs operated by the office;
(11) Adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary
or proper for the operation of the office or system. The administrator shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for transitioning individuals on
probation across levels of supervision and discharging them from supervision
consistent with evidence-based practices. The rules and regulations shall
ensure supervision resources are prioritized for individuals who are high risk
to reoffend, require transitioning individuals down levels of supervision
intensity based on assessed risk and months of supervision without a reported
major violation, and establish incentives for earning discharge from
supervision based on compliance;
(12) Transmit a report during each even-numbered year to the Supreme Court
on the operation of the office for the preceding two calendar years which shall
include a historical analysis of probation officer workload, including
participation in non-probation-based programs and services. The report shall be
transmitted by the Supreme Court to the Governor and the Clerk of the
Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically;
(13) Administer the payment by the state of all salaries, travel, and
expenses authorized under section 29-2259 incident to the conduct and
maintenance of the office;
(14) Use the funds provided under section 29-2262.07 to augment
operational or personnel costs associated with the development, implementation,
and evaluation of enhanced probation-based programs and non-probation-based
programs and services in which probation personnel or probation resources are
utilized pursuant to an interlocal agreement authorized by subdivision (16) of
this section and to purchase services to provide such programs aimed at
enhancing adult probationer or non-probation-based program participant
supervision in the community and treatment needs of probationers and non-
probation-based program participants. Enhanced probation-based programs
include, but are not limited to, specialized units of supervision, related
equipment purchases and training, and programs that address a probationer's
vocational, educational, mental health, behavioral, or substance abuse
treatment needs;
(15) Ensure that any risk or needs assessment instrument utilized by the
system be periodically validated;
(16) Have the authority to enter into interlocal agreements in which
probation resources or probation personnel may be utilized in conjunction with
or as part of non-probation-based programs and services. Any such interlocal
agreement shall comply with section 29-2255;
(17) Collaborate with the Community Corrections Division of the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice and the Department of
Correctional Services Division of Parole Supervision to develop rules governing
the participation of parolees in community corrections programs operated by the
Office of Probation Administration;
(18) Develop a matrix of rewards for compliance and positive behaviors and
graduated administrative sanctions and custodial sanctions for use in
responding to and deterring substance abuse violations and technical
violations. As applicable under sections 29-2266.02 and 29-2266.03, custodial
sanctions of up to thirty days in jail shall be designated as the most severe
response to a violation in lieu of revocation and custodial sanctions of up to
three days in jail shall be designated as the second most severe response;
(19) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the creation of
individualized post-release supervision plans, collaboratively with the
Department of Correctional Services and county jails, for probationers
sentenced to post-release supervision; and
(20) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper to
carry out his or her responsibilities.
Each member of the Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of the
report required by subdivision (12) of this section by making a request for it
-18-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
to the administrator.
Sec. 36. Section 29-2261, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-2261 (1) Unless it is impractical to do so, when an offender has been
convicted of a felony other than murder in the first degree, the court shall
not impose sentence without first ordering a presentence investigation of the
offender and according due consideration to a written report of such
investigation. When an offender has been convicted of murder in the first
degree and (a) a jury renders a verdict finding the existence of one or more
aggravating circumstances as provided in section 29-2520 or (b)(i) the
information contains a notice of aggravation as provided in section 29-1603 and
(ii) the offender waives his or her right to a jury determination of the
alleged aggravating circumstances, the court shall not commence the sentencing
determination proceeding as provided in section 29-2521 without first ordering
a presentence investigation of the offender and according due consideration to
a written report of such investigation.
(2) A court may order a presentence investigation in any case, except in
cases in which an offender has been convicted of a Class IIIA misdemeanor, a
Class IV misdemeanor, a Class V misdemeanor, a traffic infraction, or any
corresponding city or village ordinance.
(3) The presentence investigation and report shall include, when
available, an analysis of the circumstances attending the commission of the
crime, the offender's history of delinquency or criminality, physical and
mental condition, family situation and background, economic status, education,
occupation, and personal habits, and any other matters that the probation
officer deems relevant or the court directs to be included. All local and state
police agencies and Department of Correctional Services adult correctional
facilities shall furnish to the probation officer copies of such criminal
records, in any such case referred to the probation officer by the court of
proper jurisdiction, as the probation officer shall require without cost to the
court or the probation officer.
Such investigation shall also include:
(a) Any written statements submitted to the county attorney by a victim;
and
(b) Any written statements submitted to the probation officer by a victim.
(4) If there are no written statements submitted to the probation officer,
he or she shall certify to the court that:
(a) He or she has attempted to contact the victim; and
(b) If he or she has contacted the victim, such officer offered to accept
the written statements of the victim or to reduce such victim's oral statements
to writing.
For purposes of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the term victim
shall be as defined in section 29-119.
(5) Before imposing sentence, the court may order the offender to submit
to psychiatric observation and examination for a period of not exceeding sixty
days or such longer period as the court determines to be necessary for that
purpose. The offender may be remanded for this purpose to any available clinic
or mental hospital, or the court may appoint a qualified psychiatrist to make
the examination. The report of the examination shall be submitted to the court.
(6)(a) Any presentence report, substance abuse evaluation, or psychiatric
examination shall be privileged and shall not be disclosed directly or
indirectly to anyone other than a judge; probation officers to whom an
offender's file is duly transferred; the probation administrator or his or her
designee; alcohol and drug counselors, mental health practitioners,
psychiatrists, and psychologists licensed or certified under the Uniform
Credentialing Act to conduct substance abuse evaluations and treatment; or
others entitled by law to receive such information, including personnel and
mental health professionals for the Nebraska State Patrol specifically assigned
to sex offender registration and community notification for the sole purpose of
using such report, evaluation, or examination for assessing risk and for
community notification of registered sex offenders.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, mental health professional means (i)
a practicing physician licensed to practice medicine in this state under the
Medicine and Surgery Practice Act, (ii) a practicing psychologist licensed to
engage in the practice of psychology in this state as provided in section
38-3111 or as provided under similar provisions of the Psychology
Interjurisdictional Compact, (iii) a practicing mental health professional
licensed or certified in this state as provided in the Mental Health Practice
Act, or (iv) a practicing professional counselor holding a privilege to
practice in Nebraska under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate
Compact.
(7) The court shall permit inspection of the presentence report, substance
abuse evaluation, or psychiatric examination or parts of the report,
evaluation, or examination, as determined by the court, by the prosecuting
attorney and defense counsel. Such inspection shall be by electronic access
only unless the court determines such access is not available to the
prosecuting attorney or defense counsel. The State Court Administrator shall
determine and develop the means of electronic access to such presentence
reports, evaluations, and examinations. Upon application by the prosecuting
attorney or defense counsel, the court may order that addresses, telephone
numbers, and other contact information for victims or witnesses named in the
report, evaluation, or examination be redacted upon a showing by a
preponderance of the evidence that such redaction is warranted in the interests
-19-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
of public safety. The court may permit inspection of the presentence report,
substance abuse evaluation, or psychiatric examination or examination of parts
of the report, evaluation, or examination by any other person having a proper
interest therein whenever the court finds it is in the best interest of a
particular offender. The court may allow fair opportunity for an offender to
provide additional information for the court's consideration.
(8) If an offender is sentenced to imprisonment, a copy of the report of
any presentence investigation, substance abuse evaluation, or psychiatric
examination shall be transmitted immediately to the Department of Correctional
Services. Upon request, the department shall provide a copy of the report to
the Board of Parole , the Division of Parole Supervision, and the Board of
Pardons.
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (6) and (7) of this section, the Supreme
Court or an agent of the Supreme Court acting under the direction and
supervision of the Chief Justice shall have access to psychiatric examinations,
substance abuse evaluations, and presentence investigations and reports for
research purposes. The Supreme Court and its agent shall treat such information
as confidential, and nothing identifying any individual shall be released.
Sec. 37. Section 29-2935, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-2935 For purposes of evaluating the treatment process, the Division of
Parole Supervision, the Department of Correctional Services, the Board of
Parole, and the designated aftercare treatment programs shall allow appropriate
access to data and information as requested by the Department of Health and
Human Services.
Sec. 38. Section 29-4003, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4003 (1)(a) The Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who
on or after January 1, 1997:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of any of the following:
(A) Kidnapping of a minor pursuant to section 28-313, except when the
person is the parent of the minor and was not convicted of any other offense in
this section;
(B) False imprisonment of a minor pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(C) Sexual assault pursuant to section 28-319 or 28-320;
(D) Sexual abuse by a school worker employee pursuant to section
28-316.01;
(E) Sexual assault of a child in the second or third degree pursuant to
section 28-320.01;
(F) Sexual assault of a child in the first degree pursuant to section
28-319.01;
(G) Sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult or senior adult pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) of section 28-386;
(H) Incest of a minor pursuant to section 28-703;
(I) Pandering of a minor pursuant to section 28-802;
(J) Visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct of a child pursuant to
section 28-1463.03 or subdivision (2)(b) or (c) of section 28-1463.05;
(K) Knowingly possessing any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct
which has a child as one of its participants or portrayed observers pursuant to
subsection (1) or (4) of section 28-813.01;
(L) Criminal child enticement pursuant to section 28-311;
(M) Child enticement by means of an electronic communication device
pursuant to section 28-320.02;
(N) Debauching a minor pursuant to section 28-805; or
(O) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or
conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i)(A) through (1)
(a)(i)(N) of this section;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon;
(iii) Is incarcerated in a jail, a penal or correctional facility, or any
other public or private institution or is under probation or parole as a result
of pleading guilty to or being found guilty of a registrable offense under
subdivision (1)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section prior to January 1, 1997; or
(iv) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under
the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or
other jurisdiction of the United States.
(b) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivision (1)(a) of
this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person who on or
after January 1, 2010:
(i)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(i)(B) of this section, has
ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of
the following:
(I) Murder in the first degree pursuant to section 28-303;
(II) Murder in the second degree pursuant to section 28-304;
(III) Manslaughter pursuant to section 28-305;
(IV) Assault in the first degree pursuant to section 28-308;
-20-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(V) Assault in the second degree pursuant to section 28-309;
(VI) Assault in the third degree pursuant to section 28-310;
(VII) Stalking pursuant to section 28-311.03;
(VIII) Violation of section 28-311.08 requiring registration under the act
pursuant to subsection (6) of section 28-311.08;
(IX) Kidnapping pursuant to section 28-313;
(X) False imprisonment pursuant to section 28-314 or 28-315;
(XI) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the first degree pursuant to
section 28-322.02;
(XII) Sexual abuse of an inmate or parolee in the second degree pursuant
to section 28-322.03;
(XIII) Sexual abuse of a protected individual pursuant to section
28-322.04;
(XIV) Incest pursuant to section 28-703;
(XV) Child abuse pursuant to subdivision (1)(d) or (e) of section 28-707;
(XVI) Enticement by electronic communication device pursuant to section
28-833; or
(XVII) Attempt, solicitation, aiding or abetting, being an accessory, or
conspiracy to commit an offense listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I) through
(1)(b)(i)(A)(XVI) of this section.
(B) In order for the Sex Offender Registration Act to apply to the
offenses listed in subdivisions (1)(b)(i)(A)(I), (II), (III), (IV), (V), (VI),
(VII), (IX), and (X) of this section, a court shall have found that evidence of
sexual penetration or sexual contact, as those terms are defined in section
28-318, was present in the record, which shall include consideration of the
factual basis for a plea-based conviction and information contained in the
presentence report;
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(b)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon; or
(iii) Enters the state and is required to register as a sex offender under
the laws of another village, town, city, state, territory, commonwealth, or
other jurisdiction of the United States.
(c) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a) and
(b) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any person
who on or after January 1, 2020:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of sexual abuse of a detainee under section 28-322.05; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(c)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon.
(d) In addition to the registrable offenses under subdivisions (1)(a),
(b), and (c) of this section, the Sex Offender Registration Act applies to any
person who on or after January 1, 2023:
(i) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found guilty
of human trafficking under subsection (1) or (2) of section 28-831, and the
court determines either by notification of sex offender registration
responsibilities or notation in the sentencing order that the human trafficking
was sex trafficking or sex trafficking of a minor and not solely labor
trafficking or labor trafficking of a minor; or
(ii) Has ever pled guilty to, pled nolo contendere to, or been found
guilty of any offense that is substantially equivalent to a registrable offense
under subdivision (1)(d)(i) of this section by any village, town, city, state,
territory, commonwealth, or other jurisdiction of the United States, by the
United States Government, by court-martial or other military tribunal, or by a
foreign jurisdiction, notwithstanding a procedure comparable in effect to that
described under section 29-2264 or any other procedure to nullify a conviction
other than by pardon.
(2) A person appealing a conviction of a registrable offense under this
section shall be required to comply with the act during the appeals process.
Sec. 39. Section 29-4019, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4019 (1) When sentencing a person convicted of an offense which
requires lifetime community supervision upon release pursuant to section
83-174.03, the sentencing court shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the defendant that he or she shall be
subject to lifetime community supervision by the Department of Correctional
Services Division of Parole Supervision upon release from incarceration or
civil commitment. The written notice shall inform the defendant (i) that he or
she shall be subject to lifetime community supervision by the department
division upon release and that the department division shall conduct a risk
assessment and evaluation to determine the conditions of community supervision
which will minimize, in the least restrictive manner that is compatible with
-21-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
public safety, the risk of the defendant committing additional offenses, (ii)
that a violation of any of the conditions of community supervision imposed by
the department division may result in the revision of existing conditions, the
addition of new conditions, a recommendation that civil commitment proceedings
should be instituted, or criminal prosecution, and (iii) of his or her right to
challenge the determination of the conditions of community supervision by the
department division and the right to a periodic review of the conditions of
community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03 to determine if the
conditions are still necessary to protect the public;
(b) Require the defendant to read and sign a form stating that the duty of
the defendant to comply with the conditions of community supervision and his or
her rights to challenge the conditions of community supervision imposed by the
department division has been explained; and
(c) Retain a copy of the written notification signed by the defendant.
(2) Prior to the release of a person serving a sentence for an offense
requiring lifetime community supervision by the Division of Parole Supervision
pursuant to section 83-174.03, the Department of Correctional Services, the
Department of Health and Human Services, or a city or county correctional or
jail facility shall:
(a) Provide written notice to the person that he or she shall be subject
to lifetime community supervision by the Department of Correctional Services
division upon release from incarceration. The written notice shall inform the
person (i) that he or she shall be subject to lifetime community supervision by
the department division upon release and that the department division shall
conduct a risk assessment and evaluation of the defendant to determine the
conditions of community supervision which will minimize, in the least
restrictive manner that is compatible with public safety, the risk of the
person committing additional offenses, (ii) that a violation of any of the
conditions of community supervision imposed by the department division may
result in the revision of existing conditions, the addition of new conditions,
a recommendation that civil commitment proceedings should be instituted, or
criminal prosecution, and (iii) of his or her right to challenge the
determination of the conditions of community supervision by the department
division and the right to a periodic review of the conditions of community
supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03 to determine if the conditions are
still necessary to protect the public;
(b) Require the defendant to read and sign a form stating that the duty of
the defendant to comply with the conditions of community supervision and his or
her right to challenge the conditions of community supervision imposed by the
department division has been explained; and
(c) Retain a copy of the written notification signed by the person.
Sec. 40. Sections 29-4801 to 29-4807 apply on and after July 1, 2027.
Sec. 41. Section 29-4803, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4803 (1) The probation administrator shall create a veteran justice
program as provided in sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 and subject to the Supreme
Court's rules. The program shall be available in every district court and
county court. A veteran justice program shall not supersede, alter, or
otherwise interfere with the establishment, functioning, participation, or
operation of a problem solving court established pursuant to section 24-1302.
(2) A veteran justice program shall be operated by use of deferred
judgments as provided in this section.
(3) Upon a finding of guilt for which a judgment of conviction may be
rendered, a defendant that is eligible to participate in a veteran justice
program may request the court defer the entry of judgment of conviction under
this section. Upon such request, the court shall provide notice to any victim
of the offense of the request and provide an opportunity for the victim to
provide a statement for consideration by the court. After giving the prosecutor
and defendant the opportunity to be heard, the court may defer the entry of a
judgment of conviction and the imposition of a sentence and place the defendant
on probation, upon conditions as the court may require under sections 29-2262
and 29-4804. If the court defers the entry of judgment, the court shall provide
notice to victims of the offense.
(4)(a) Whenever a court considers a request to defer judgment under this
section, the court shall consider the following:
(i) The factors set forth in subsections (2) and (3) of section 29-2260
and section 29-4802;
(ii) The supervision, treatment, and other programming options available
in the community; and
(iii) Any other information the court deems relevant.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (4)(c) of this section, there shall
be a presumption that a veteran eligible under section 29-4802 shall be allowed
to participate in a veteran justice program. The presumption shall only be
overcome by a judicial finding, based on an individualized assessment of the
veteran and consideration of the factors set forth in subdivisions (4)(a)(i),
(ii), and (iii) of this section, that entry of judgment of conviction should
not be deferred. The fact that a veteran has previously absconded from or
violated pretrial release, probation, parole, supervised release, post-release
supervision, or another form of court-ordered supervision, including a
violation arising from commission of a new offense or an offense committed
while previously participating in a veteran justice program, is not, standing
alone, a sufficient basis to overcome the presumption.
(c) The presumption provided for in subdivision (4)(b) of this section
-22-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
does not apply to a veteran charged with:
(i) A violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197, or a city or village
ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197, following a
previous conviction for a violation of any such section or ordinance; or
(ii) An offense that resulted in serious bodily injury to another person.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections 29-2293 and
29-2294, the supervision of a defendant on probation pursuant to a deferred
judgment shall be governed by the Nebraska Probation Administration Act and
sections 29-2270 to 29-2273.
(6) After a hearing providing the prosecutor and defendant an opportunity
to be heard and upon a finding that a defendant has violated a condition of his
or her probation, the court may enter any order authorized by section 29-2268
or pronounce judgment and impose such new sentence as might have been
originally imposed for the offense for which the defendant was convicted.
(7) Upon satisfactory completion of the conditions of probation and the
payment or waiver of all administrative and programming fees assessed under
section 29-2293, the defendant or prosecutor may file a motion to withdraw any
plea entered by the defendant and to dismiss the action without entry of
judgment. The court shall not grant such motion until a victim of the offense
has received notice and the opportunity to be heard, as required by subsection
(4) of section 29-4804.
(8) Sections 29-4802 to 29-4804 apply to offenses committed on or after
July 1, 2027 2025. For purposes of this subsection, an offense shall be deemed
to have been committed prior to July 1, 2027 2025, if any element of the
offense occurred prior to such date.
Sec. 42. Section 29-4807, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
29-4807 (1) The State Court Administrator shall compile information on the
number of veterans receiving, successfully completing, declining, and denied
participation in a veteran justice program and the sentencing mitigation
described in section 29-4805.
(2) The State Court Administrator shall track outcomes among veterans who
participate in a veteran justice program, including completion status,
recidivism, and housing and employment status.
(3) Data collected under this section shall be disaggregated by race,
ethnicity, gender, age, military discharge characterization, and the offense
involved.
(4) On or before July 1, 2028 2026, and on or before each July 1
thereafter, the State Court Administrator shall electronically submit a report
to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature. The report shall contain de-
identified data collected pursuant to this section and shall analyze the
outcomes, successes, and areas for improvement of the veteran justice programs
and the sentencing mitigation described in section 29-4805.
Sec. 43. Section 32-221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
32-221 (1) The election commissioner shall appoint precinct and district
inspectors, judges of election, and clerks of election to assist the election
commissioner in conducting elections on election day. In counties with a
population of less than four hundred thousand inhabitants as determined by the
most recent federal decennial census, judges and clerks of election and
inspectors shall be appointed at least thirty days prior to the statewide
primary election, shall hold office for terms of two years or until their
successors are appointed and qualified for the next statewide primary election,
and shall serve at all elections in the county during their terms of office. In
counties with a population of four hundred thousand or more inhabitants as
determined by the most recent federal decennial census, judges and clerks of
election shall be appointed at least thirty days prior to the first election
for which appointments are necessary and shall serve for at least four
elections.
(2) Judges and clerks of election may be selected at random from a cross
section of the population of the county. All qualified citizens shall have the
opportunity to be considered for service. All qualified citizens shall fulfill
their obligation to serve as judges or clerks of election as prescribed by the
election commissioner. No citizen shall be excluded from service as a result of
discrimination based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or
economic status, or military or veteran status. No citizen shall be excluded
from service unless excused by reason of ill health or other good and
sufficient reason.
(3) All persons appointed shall be of good repute and character, be able
to read and write the English language, and except as otherwise provided in
subsections (4), (5), and (6) of section 32-223, be registered voters in the
county. No candidate at an election shall be appointed as a judge or clerk of
election or inspector for such election other than a candidate for delegate to
a county, state, or national political party convention.
(4) If a vacancy occurs in the office of judge or clerk of election or
inspector, the election commissioner shall fill such vacancy in accordance with
section 32-223. If any judge or clerk of election or inspector fails to appear
at the hour appointed for the opening of the polls, the remaining officers
shall notify the election commissioner, select a registered voter to serve in
place of the absent officer if so directed by the election commissioner, and
proceed to conduct the election. If the election commissioner finds that a
judge or clerk of election or inspector does not possess all the qualifications
prescribed in this section or if any judge or clerk of election or inspector is
-23-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
guilty of neglecting the duties of the office or of any official misconduct,
the election commissioner shall remove the person and fill the vacancy.
Sec. 44. Section 32-230, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
32-230 (1) As provided in subsection (4) of this section, the precinct
committeeman and committeewoman of each political party shall appoint a
receiving board consisting of three judges of election and two clerks of
election. The chairperson of the county central committee of each political
party shall send the names of the appointments to the county clerk no later
than February 1 prior to the primary election.
(2) If no names are submitted by the chairperson, the county clerk shall
appoint judges or clerks of election from the appropriate political party.
Judges and clerks of election may be selected at random from a cross section of
the population of the county. All qualified citizens shall have the opportunity
to be considered for service. All qualified citizens shall fulfill their
obligation to serve as judges or clerks of election as prescribed by the county
clerk. No citizen shall be excluded from service as a result of discrimination
based upon race, color, religion, sex, national origin, or economic status, or
military or veteran status. No citizen shall be excluded from service unless
excused by reason of ill health or other good and sufficient reason.
(3) The county clerk may allow persons serving on a receiving board to
serve for part of the time the polls are open and appoint other persons to
serve on the same receiving board for the remainder of the time the polls are
open.
(4) In each precinct at any one time, one judge and one clerk of election
shall be appointed from the political party casting the highest number of votes
in the county for Governor or for President of the United States in the
immediately preceding general election, one judge and one clerk shall be
appointed from the political party casting the next highest number of votes in
the county for Governor or for President of the United States in the
immediately preceding general election, and one judge shall be appointed from
the political party casting the third highest number of votes in the county for
Governor or for President of the United States in the immediately preceding
general election. If the political party casting the third highest number of
votes cast less than ten percent of the total vote cast in the county at the
immediately preceding general election, the political party casting the highest
number of votes at the immediately preceding general election shall be entitled
to two judges and one clerk.
(5) The county clerk may appoint registered voters to serve in case of a
vacancy among any of the judges or clerks of election or in addition to the
judges and clerks in any precinct when necessary to meet any situation that
requires additional judges and clerks. Such appointees may include registered
voters unaffiliated with any political party. Such appointees shall serve at
subsequent or special elections as determined by the county clerk.
(6) The county clerk may appoint an elector residing outside the county as
a precinct inspector, district inspector, judge of election, or clerk of
election if the elector resides in a county which conducts all elections by
mail pursuant to section 32-960.
(7) If authorized by the Secretary of State and registered voters of the
county are unavailable, the county clerk may appoint an elector residing
outside the county as a precinct inspector, district inspector, judge of
election, or clerk of election.
(8) The county clerk may appoint a person who is at least sixteen years
old but is not eligible to register to vote as a clerk of election. Such clerk
of election shall meet the requirements of subsection (1) of section 32-231,
except that such clerk shall not be required to be a registered voter. No more
than one clerk of election appointed under this subsection shall serve at any
precinct. A clerk of election appointed under this subsection shall be
considered a registered voter who is not affiliated with a political party for
purposes of this section.
Sec. 45. Section 39-210, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
39-210 To qualify to appear on a tourist-oriented directional sign panel,
an activity shall be licensed and approved by the state and local agencies if
required by law and be open to the public at least eight hours per day, five
days per week, including Saturdays or Sundays, during the normal season of the
activity, except that if the activity is a winery, the winery shall be open at
least twenty hours per week. The activity, before qualifying to appear on a
sign panel, shall provide to the Department of Transportation assurance of its
conformity with all applicable laws relating to discrimination based on race,
creed, color, sex, national origin, ancestry, political affiliation, or
religion, or military or veteran status. If the activity violates any of such
laws, it shall lose its eligibility to appear on a tourist-oriented directional
sign panel. In addition, the qualifying activity shall be required to remove
any advertising device which was unlawfully erected or which is in violation of
section 39-202, 39-203, 39-204, 39-205, 39-206, 39-215, 39-216, or 39-220, any
rule or regulation of the department, or any federal rule or regulation
relating to tourist-oriented directional sign panels. The tourist-oriented
directional sign panels shall conform to the requirements of the Federal
Beautification Act and the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices as adopted
pursuant to section 60-6,118.
Sec. 46. Section 2, Legislative Bill 80, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025, is amended to read:
-24-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Protection Orders Act:
(1) Abuse has the same meaning as in section 42-903;
(2) Course of conduct has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(3) Family or household members has the same meaning as in section 42-903;
(4) Harass has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(5) Household pet means any animal maintained for companionship or
pleasure but does not include any animal kept primarily for commercial purposes
or for consumption or any livestock animal as defined in section 54-902;
(6) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town marshal in
incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in unincorporated areas,
and the Nebraska State Patrol; and
(7) Sexual assault offense means:
(a) Conduct amounting to sexual assault under section 28-319 or 28-320,
sexual abuse by a school worker employee under section 28-316.01, sexual
assault of a child under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, a violation of section
28-311.08, or an attempt to commit any of such offenses; or
(b) Subjecting or attempting to subject another person to sexual contact
or sexual penetration without such person's consent, as such terms are defined
in section 28-318.
Sec. 47. Section 43-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-1401 (1) For purposes of sections 43-1401 to 43-1418:
(a) Except as provided in sections 43-1411 and 43-1414, child means (1)
Child shall mean a child under the age of eighteen years born out of wedlock;
(b) (2) Child born out of wedlock means shall mean a child whose parents
were not married to each other at the time of its birth, except that a child
shall not be considered as born out of wedlock if the its parents were married
at the time of the child's its conception but divorced at the time of its
birth. The definition of legitimacy or illegitimacy for other purposes shall
not be affected by the provisions of such sections 43-1401 to 43-1418; and
(c) (3) Support includes shall include reasonable education.
(2) The changes made to this section by this legislative bill apply to
actions under sections 43-1401 to 43-1418 that are pending on the operative
date of this section and to cases filed on or after such date.
Sec. 48. Section 43-1411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
43-1411 (1) A civil proceeding to establish the paternity of a child may
be instituted, in the court of the district where the child is domiciled or
found or, for cases under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, where the
alleged father is domiciled, by:
(a) The mother or the alleged father of such child, or a person who has
reason to believe he is the biological father of the child, either during
pregnancy or within four years after the child's birth, unless:
(i) A valid consent or relinquishment has been made pursuant to sections
43-104.08 to 43-104.24 or section 43-105 for purposes of adoption; or
(ii) A county court or separate juvenile court has jurisdiction over the
custody of the child or jurisdiction over an adoption matter with respect to
such child pursuant to sections 43-101 to 43-116; or
(b) The guardian or next friend of such child or the state, either during
pregnancy or within eighteen years after the child's birth.
(2) Summons shall issue and be served as in other civil proceedings,
except that such summons may be directed to the sheriff of any county in the
state and may be served in any county.
(3)(a) (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who has
reason to believe he is claiming to be the biological father of a child over
which the juvenile court already has jurisdiction may file a complaint to
intervene in such juvenile proceeding to institute an action to establish the
paternity of the child. The complaint to intervene shall be accompanied by an
affidavit under oath that the complainant affiant believes he is the biological
father of the juvenile. No filing fee shall be charged for filing the complaint
and affidavit.
(b) Upon filing of the complaint and affidavit, the juvenile court may
shall enter an order pursuant to section 43-1414 to require genetic testing and
to require the juvenile to be made available for genetic testing. The costs of
genetic testing shall be paid by the complainant intervenor, the county, or the
state at the discretion of the juvenile court.
(c) This subsection does not authorize intervention by a person whose
parental rights to such child have been terminated by the order of any court of
competent jurisdiction.
(4) For purposes of this section, child means a person under the age of
eighteen years, regardless of whether the person was born out of wedlock.
(5) The changes made to this section by this legislative bill apply to
actions under sections 43-1401 to 43-1418 that are pending on the operative
date of this section and to cases filed on or after such date.
Sec. 49. Section 43-1414, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
43-1414 (1)(a) (1) In any proceeding to establish paternity, the court
may, on its own motion, or shall, on a timely request of a party, after notice
and hearing, require the child, the mother, and the alleged father to submit to
genetic testing to be performed on blood or any other appropriate genetic
testing material. Failure to comply with such requirement for genetic testing
shall constitute contempt and may be dealt with in the same manner as other
contempts. If genetic testing is required, the court shall direct that
-25-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
inherited characteristics be determined by appropriate testing procedures and
shall appoint an expert in genetic testing and qualified as an examiner of
genetic markers to analyze and interpret the results and to report to the
court. The court shall determine the number of experts required.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, child means a person under the age of
eighteen years, regardless of whether the person was born out of wedlock.
(2) In any proceeding to establish paternity, the Department of Health and
Human Services, county attorneys, and authorized attorneys have the authority
to require the child, the mother, and the alleged father to submit to genetic
testing to be performed on blood or any other appropriate genetic testing
material. All genetic testing shall be performed by a laboratory accredited by
the College of American Pathologists or any other national accrediting body or
public agency which has requirements that are substantially equivalent to or
more comprehensive than those of the college.
(3) Except as authorized under sections 43-1414 to 43-1418, a person shall
not disclose information obtained from genetic paternity testing that is done
pursuant to such sections.
(4) If an alleged father who is tested as part of an action under such
sections is found to be the child's father, the testing laboratory shall retain
the genetic testing material of the alleged father, mother, and child for no
longer than the period of years prescribed by the national standards under
which the laboratory is accredited. If a man is found not to be the child's
father, the testing laboratory shall destroy the man's genetic testing material
in the presence of a witness after such material is used in the paternity
action. The witness may be an individual who is a party to the destruction of
the genetic testing material. After the man's genetic testing material is
destroyed, the testing laboratory shall make and keep a written record of the
destruction and have the individual who witnessed the destruction sign the
record. The testing laboratory shall also expunge its records regarding the
genetic paternity testing performed on the genetic testing material in
accordance with the national standards under which the laboratory is
accredited. The testing laboratory shall retain the genetic testing material of
the mother and child for no longer than the period of years prescribed by the
national standards under which the laboratory is accredited. After a testing
laboratory destroys an individual's genetic testing material as provided in
this subsection, it shall notify the adult individual, or the parent or legal
guardian of a minor individual, by certified mail that the genetic testing
material was destroyed.
(5) A testing laboratory is required to protect the confidentiality of
genetic testing material, except as required for a paternity determination. The
court and its officers shall not use or disclose genetic testing material for a
purpose other than the paternity determination.
(6) A person shall not buy, sell, transfer, or offer genetic testing
material obtained under sections 43-1414 to 43-1418.
(7) A testing laboratory shall annually have an independent audit
verifying the contracting laboratory's compliance with this section. The audit
shall not disclose the names of, or otherwise identify, the test subjects
required to submit to testing during the previous year. The testing laboratory
shall forward the audit to the department.
(8) Any person convicted of violating this section shall be guilty of a
Class IV misdemeanor for the first offense and a Class III misdemeanor for the
second or subsequent offense.
(9) For purposes of sections 43-1414 to 43-1418, an expert in genetic
testing means a person who has formal doctoral training or postdoctoral
training in human genetics.
(10) The changes made to this section by this legislative bill apply to
actions under sections 43-1401 to 43-1418 that are pending on the operative
date of this section and to cases filed on or after such date.
Sec. 50. Section 93, Legislative Bill 474, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 93. (1) A licensee shall not refuse to enter into a loan or impose
finance charges or other terms or conditions of credit more onerous than those
regularly extended by that licensee to borrowers of similar economic
backgrounds because of the age, color, creed, national origin, political
affiliation, race, religion, sex, marital status, or disability, or military or
veteran status of the borrower or because the borrower receives public
assistance, social security benefits, pension benefits, or the like.
(2) No licensee shall conduct the business of making loans under the
Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act within any office, room, or place of
business in which any other business is solicited or engaged in, or in
association or conjunction with any other business, if the director finds that
the other business is of such nature that the conducting of such other business
tends to conceal evasion of the act or of the rules and regulations adopted and
promulgated under the act. In such case, the director shall order such licensee
in writing to cease and desist from such conduct.
(3) No licensee shall, directly or indirectly, require a borrower as a
condition of granting a loan to such borrower to reaffirm or otherwise obligate
the borrower to pay a former debt to the licensee which has been discharged in
bankruptcy proceedings.
(4) Any person who makes a false statement to secure a loan is guilty of a
Class III misdemeanor. The punishment shall not be exacted, however, when such
a loan is made after the licensee is aware of the falsity of the statement.
(5) No licensee or other person subject to the Nebraska Installment Loan
-26-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
and Sales Act shall advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, or
broadcast or cause or permit to be advertised, printed, displayed, published,
distributed, or broadcast in any manner whatsoever any false, misleading, or
deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or
conditions for the lending of money, credit, goods, or things in action. The
director may order any licensee to cease and desist from any conduct which he
or she finds to be a violation of this section. The director may require that
rates of charge, if stated by a licensee, be stated fully and clearly in such
manner as the director deems necessary to prevent misunderstanding by
prospective borrowers.
(6) No loan, made outside this state, in the amount or of the value of
three thousand dollars or less, for which a greater rate of interest,
consideration, or charges than is permitted by section 45-350 has been charged,
contracted for, or received, shall be enforced in this state. Every person
participating in such loan in this state is subject to the Nebraska Installment
Loan and Sales Act, except that the act shall not apply to loans legally made
in any state under and in accordance with a regulatory small loan law similar
in principle to such act.
(7) In connection with the collection of any loan, a licensee may not:
(a) Use or threaten to use violence;
(b) Use obscene or profane language;
(c) Cause a telephone to ring or engage a person in telephone conversation
at times known to be inconvenient to the borrower;
(d) Falsely represent the character, amount, or legal status of any debt;
(e) Falsely represent that an individual is an attorney when he or she is
not;
(f) Falsely represent that nonpayment of any debt will result in the
arrest or imprisonment of the borrower or any member of the borrower's
household;
(g) Threaten to take any action that the licensee knows cannot legally be
taken at the time the threat is made;
(h) Falsely represent that the borrower committed any crime when the
borrower did not;
(i) Communicate or threaten to communicate to any person credit
information which is known to be false;
(j) Use or distribute any written communication which falsely represents
that it is a document authorized, issued, or approved by any court, official,
or agency of the United States or any state;
(k) Charge or collect any fees, charges, or expenses, incidental to the
collection of any loan, unless such amount is expressly authorized by the loan
agreement or permitted by law;
(l) Accept from any person a check or other payment instrument postdated
by more than five days unless such person is notified in writing of the
licensee's intent to deposit such check or instrument not more than ten nor
less than three business days prior to such deposit;
(m) Solicit any postdated check or other postdated payment instrument for
the purpose of threatening or instituting criminal prosecution;
(n) Deposit or threaten to deposit any postdated check prior to the date
on such check;
(o) Cause charges to be made to any person for communications by
concealment of the true purpose of the communication, including, but not
limited to, collect telephone calls and telegram fees;
(p) Communicate with a borrower regarding a debt by postcard; or
(q) Communicate with a borrower at the borrower's place of employment if
the licensee has received actual notice that the borrower's employer prohibits
the borrower from receiving such communication.
Sec. 51. Section 45-1303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
45-1303 (1) The Medical Debt Relief Program is established for the purpose
of discharging medical debt of eligible residents by contracting with a medical
debt relief coordinator as described in subsection (3) of this section. The
State Treasurer shall administer the program.
(2) Money appropriated to the State Treasurer or otherwise contributed for
the program shall be used exclusively for the program, including contracting
with a medical debt relief coordinator and providing money to be used by the
medical debt relief coordinator to discharge medical debt of eligible
residents. Money used in contracting with a medical debt relief coordinator may
also be used for the payment of services provided by the medical debt relief
coordinator to discharge medical debt of eligible residents based on a budget
approved by the State Treasurer.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall enter into a contract with a medical debt
relief coordinator to purchase and discharge medical debt owed by eligible
residents with money allocated for the program.
(b) The State Treasurer shall implement a competitive bidding process to
determine which medical debt relief coordinator to use, unless the State
Treasurer determines that only a single medical debt relief coordinator has the
capacity and willingness to carry out the duties specified in the Medical Debt
Relief Act.
(c) In contracting with the State Treasurer, a medical debt relief
coordinator shall adhere to the following:
(i) The medical debt relief coordinator shall review the medical debt
accounts of each health care provider willing to donate or sell medical debt
accounts in this state;
-27-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(ii) The medical debt relief coordinator may negotiate for and elect to
buy the dischargeable medical debt from a health care provider that identifies
the accounts described in subdivision (3)(c)(i) of this section as a bad debt
expense and agrees to sell the debt for less than the original value;
(iii) After the purchase and discharge of medical debt from a health care
provider, the medical debt relief coordinator shall notify all eligible
residents whose medical debt has been discharged under the program, in a manner
approved by the State Treasurer, that they no longer have specified medical
debt owed to the relevant health care provider;
(iv) A medical debt relief coordinator shall make its best efforts to
ensure parity and equity in the purchasing and discharging of medical debt to
ensure that all eligible residents have an equal opportunity of receiving
medical debt relief regardless of their geographical location or their race,
color, religion, sex, disability, age, or national origin, or military or
veteran status;
(v) A medical debt relief coordinator shall report to the State Treasurer
summary statistics regarding eligible residents whose medical debt has been
discharged; and
(vi) A medical debt relief coordinator may not attempt to seek payment
from an eligible resident for medical debt purchased by the medical debt relief
coordinator.
(d) A medical debt relief coordinator shall continue to fulfill its
contractual obligations to the State Treasurer until all money contracted to
the medical debt relief coordinator is exhausted, regardless of whether money
allocated to the program has been exhausted.
(e) If a medical debt relief coordinator attempts to seek payment from an
eligible resident for medical debt purchased by the medical debt relief
coordinator or fails to carry out the responsibilities described in its
contract with the State Treasurer, the medical debt relief coordinator shall be
considered in breach of contract and the contract provisions that apply in the
case of a breach of contract shall apply.
(f) Health care providers that are willing to sell medical debt to the
medical debt relief coordinator shall provide necessary information to, and
otherwise coordinate with, the medical debt relief coordinator as needed to
carry out the purposes of the Medical Debt Relief Act.
Sec. 52. Section 47-624, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-624 The division shall:
(1) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration , the Division
of Parole Supervision, and the Department of Correctional Services to develop
and implement a plan to establish statewide operation and use of a continuum of
community correctional facilities and programs;
(2) Develop, in consultation with the probation administrator and the
Director of Correctional Supervision and Services of the Division of Parole
Supervision, standards for the use of community correctional facilities and
programs by the Nebraska Probation System and the parole system;
(3) Collaborate with the Office of Probation Administration , the Division
of Parole Supervision, and the Department of Correctional Services on the
development of additional reporting centers as set forth in section 47-624.01;
(4) Analyze and promote the consistent use of offender risk assessment
tools;
(5) Educate the courts, the Board of Parole, criminal justice system
stakeholders, and the general public about the availability, use, and benefits
of community correctional facilities and programs;
(6) Enter into and administer contracts, if necessary, to carry out the
purposes of the Community Corrections Act;
(7) In order to ensure adequate funding for substance abuse treatment
programs, consult with the probation administrator and the Director of
Correctional Supervision and Services of the Division of Parole Supervision and
develop or assist with the development of programs as provided in subdivision
(14) of section 29-2252 and subdivision (20) (8) of section 83-173 83-1,102;
(8) Study substance abuse and mental health treatment services in and
related to the criminal justice system, recommend improvements, and evaluate
the implementation of improvements;
(9) Research and evaluate existing community correctional facilities and
programs, within the limits of available funding;
(10) Develop standardized definitions of outcome measures for community
correctional facilities and programs, including, but not limited to,
recidivism, employment, and substance abuse;
(11) Report annually to the Legislature and the Governor on the
development and performance of community correctional facilities and programs.
The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. The
report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(a) A description of community correctional facilities and programs
currently serving offenders in Nebraska, which includes the following
information:
(i) The target population and geographic area served by each facility or
program, eligibility requirements, and the total number of offenders utilizing
the facility or program over the past year;
(ii) Services, programs, assessments, case management, supervision, and
tools provided for offenders at the facility, in the program, or under the
supervision of a governmental agency in any capacity;
(iii) The costs of operating the facility or program and the cost per
-28-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
offender; and
(iv) The funding sources for the facility or program;
(b) The progress made in expanding community correctional facilities and
programs statewide and an analysis of the need for additional community
corrections services;
(c) An analysis of the impact community correctional facilities and
programs have on the number of offenders incarcerated within the Department of
Correctional Services; and
(d) The recidivism rates and outcome data for probationers, parolees, and
problem-solving-court clients participating in community corrections programs;
(12) Grant funds to entities including local governmental agencies,
nonprofit organizations, and behavioral health services which will support the
intent of the Community Corrections Act act;
(13) Manage all offender data acquired by the division in a confidential
manner and develop procedures to ensure that identifiable information is not
released;
(14) Establish and administer grants, projects, and programs for the
operation of the division; and
(15) Perform such other duties as may be necessary to carry out the policy
of the state established in the act.
Sec. 53. Section 47-624.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
47-624.01 (1) The division shall collaborate with the Office of Probation
Administration , the Division of Parole Supervision, and the Department of
Correctional Services in developing a plan for the implementation and funding
of reporting centers in Nebraska.
(2) The plan shall include recommended locations for at least one
reporting center in each district court judicial district that currently lacks
such a center and shall prioritize the recommendations for additional reporting
centers based upon need.
(3) The plan shall also identify and prioritize the need for expansion of
reporting centers in those district court judicial districts which currently
have a reporting center but have an unmet need for additional reporting center
services due to capacity, distance, or demographic factors.
Sec. 54. Section 47-627, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-627 The director shall develop and maintain a uniform crime data
analysis system in Nebraska which shall include, but need not be limited to,
the number of offenses, arrests, charges, probation admissions, probation
violations, probation discharges, participants in specialized community
corrections programs, admissions to and discharges from problem-solving courts,
admissions to and discharges from the Department of Correctional Services,
parole reviews, parole hearings, releases on parole, parole violations, and
parole discharges. The data shall be categorized by statutory crime. The data
shall be collected from the Board of Parole, the State Court Administrator, the
Department of Correctional Services, the Division of Parole Supervision, the
Office of Probation Administration, the Nebraska State Patrol, counties, local
law enforcement, and any other entity associated with criminal justice. The
division and the Supreme Court shall have access to such data to implement the
Community Corrections Act.
Sec. 55. Section 47-629, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-629 (1) The Board of Parole may parole an offender to a community
correctional facility or program pursuant to guidelines developed by the
division.
(2) The Department of Correctional Services and the Division of Parole
Supervision shall utilize community correctional facilities and programs as
appropriate.
Sec. 56. Section 47-903, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-903 For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System Act, the following definitions apply:
(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of a program,
an office, or a division of the department or administration of a private
agency;
(2) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(3) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(4) Division of Parole Supervision means the division created pursuant to
section 83-1,100;
(4) (5) Inspector General means the Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System appointed under section 47-904;
(5) (6) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal right
to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with
performance of an official duty;
(6) (7) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;
(7) (8) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that a
person may lawfully do;
(8) (9) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an
investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an
investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or slow;
(9) (10) Office means the office of Inspector General of the Nebraska
Correctional System and includes the Inspector General and other employees of
the office;
-29-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(10) (11) Private agency means an entity that contracts with the
department or contracts to provide services to another entity that contracts
with the department; and
(11) (12) Record means any recording in written, audio, electronic
transmission, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft,
memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, or message, and
includes, but is not limited to, medical records, mental health records, case
files, clinical records, financial records, and administrative records.
Sec. 57. Section 47-908, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-908 All employees of the department , all employees of the Division of
Parole Supervision, and all owners, operators, managers, supervisors, and
employees of private agencies shall cooperate with the office. Cooperation
includes, but is not limited to, the following:
(1) Provision of full access to and production of records and information.
Providing access to and producing records and information for the office is not
a violation of confidentiality provisions under any statute, rule, or
regulation if done in good faith for purposes of an investigation under the
Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act;
(2) Fair and honest disclosure of records and information reasonably
requested by the office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(3) Encouraging employees to fully comply with reasonable requests of the
office in the course of an investigation under the act;
(4) Prohibition of retaliation by owners, operators, or managers against
employees for providing records or information or filing or otherwise making a
complaint to the office;
(5) Not requiring employees to gain supervisory approval prior to filing a
complaint with or providing records or information to the office;
(6) Provision of complete and truthful answers to questions posed by the
office in the course of an investigation; and
(7) Not willfully interfering with or obstructing the investigation.
Sec. 58. Section 47-919, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
47-919 The department Division of Parole Supervision shall provide the
Public Counsel and the Inspector General with direct computer access to all
computerized records, reports, and documents maintained in connection with
administration of the Nebraska parole system, except that access for the Public
Counsel and the Inspector General to a parolee's medical or mental health
records shall be subject to the parolee's consent.
Sec. 59. Section 47-1102, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1102 (1) The Legislature finds that studies have shown that post-prison
outcomes tend to be better for committed offenders who participate in work
release programs prior to discharge from custody. Specifically, findings
indicate that committed offenders who participated in work release programs had
a higher likelihood of obtaining post-release employment within the first
calendar quarter after release and also had a significantly lower rate of
recidivism than committed offenders who did not participate in work release
programs prior to discharge from custody. In addition, studies indicate that
committed offenders who participated in privately operated work release
programs were significantly more likely to become employed after release.
(2) In light of these findings, and in order to give the Board of Parole
and the Department of Correctional Services additional options for the
placement of committed offenders, it is the intent of the Legislature:
(a) To increase the number of committed offenders in the Nebraska
correctional system who are exposed to work release prior to discharge from
custody; and
(b) To do so in settings that also offer therapy, programming, treatment,
vocational training, and educational classes.
(3) To achieve these goals, the purpose of the Community Work Release and
Reentry Centers Act is to empower the Division of Parole Supervision and the
Department of Correctional Services to contract with private providers to
establish community work release and reentry centers at various locations
throughout the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 60. Section 47-1103, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1103 For purposes of the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers
Act:
(1) Advisory board means the Reentry Continuity Advisory Board established
in section 47-1117;
(2) Board means the Board of Parole;
(3) Committed offender has the same meaning as in section 83-170;
(4) Community work release and reentry center or center means a
residential home, halfway house, or other facility operated by a private
provider pursuant to an agreement in writing either with the division or the
department for providing housing and supervision of committed offenders placed
in the center by the department division for work release and for vocational
training, education, programming, or behavioral health or mental health
treatment;
(5) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(6) Division means the Division of Parole Supervision;
(6) (7) Individualized release plan means a detailed written plan
outlining a committed offender's future vocational goals, training, employment,
-30-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
and needed treatment services following the committed offender's release from a
community work release and reentry center;
(7) (8) Private provider means a partnership, corporation, association,
joint venture, organization, or similar entity which is operated on a nonprofit
basis and which, under a contract with either the division or the department,
has agreed to operate a community work release and reentry center pursuant to
the act;
(8) (9) Probation administration means the Office of Probation
Administration;
(9) (10) Reentering person means an individual who is subject to
supervision by the board division or probation administration, not including
juvenile probation, or who was recently in the custody of the department or a
county jail and was released with no supervision;
(10) (11) Reentry housing means temporary housing for reentering persons,
generally in the first year following a period of incarceration; and
(11)(a) (12)(a) Reentry housing facility means a facility which is owned
or operated by a private organization, whether nonprofit or for-profit, that
receives direct payment from the board, division, probation administration, or
department to provide reentry housing.
(b) Reentry housing facility includes, but is not limited to, a community
work release and reentry center.
(c) Reentry housing facility does not include a health care facility as
defined in section 71-413.
Sec. 61. Section 47-1104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1104 (1) The department division may place a parole-eligible committed
offender at a community work release and reentry center as provided in the
Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
(2) Any parole-eligible committed offender placed at a community work
release and reentry center pursuant to the act:
(a) Shall be under the continuing jurisdiction and authority of the
department and board as if the committed offender was selected for release on
ordinary parole status as provided for in section 83-192; and
(b) May be subsequently released by the board on ordinary parole status as
provided for in section 83-192.
(3) The department may place a committed offender whose sentence includes
a term of post-release supervision and who is within three years of his or her
release date at a community work release and reentry center as provided in the
act. Any such committed offender placed at a center shall be under the
continuing jurisdiction and authority of the department.
Sec. 62. Section 47-1105, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1105 (1) The division and the department may exercise all powers and
perform all duties necessary and proper for carrying out their responsibilities
under the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
(2) The division and the department may use designated funds provided by
the Legislature to enter into agreements with private providers for the
development and operation of community work release and reentry centers to be
established at various locations throughout the state. Any such agreement shall
require a private provider to:
(a) Establish a contract with public or private employers to provide
employment for committed offenders placed at the center;
(b) Assist any committed offender placed at the center to obtain and
maintain employment in the community;
(c) Provide vocational training, education, programming, and treatment for
issues related to the criminogenic needs of any committed offender placed at
the center; and
(d) Otherwise direct and supervise the activities and behavior of any
committed offender placed at the center as provided in the act.
(3) In an agreement under this section, the division or the department may
include contractual requirements that obligate the private provider to offer to
any committed offender placed at the center:
(a) Specialized educational or vocational training; and
(b) Other programming that will address the mental health, behavioral
health, or substance abuse treatment needs of such committed offender.
(4) An agreement under this section shall require the community work
release and reentry center to establish programs, rules, and enforcement
systems:
(a) Regarding the behavior of committed offenders;
(b) To ensure that committed offenders seek and retain continuous
employment;
(c) For the treatment of committed offenders for substance abuse;
(d) To ensure that committed offenders only leave the center for purposes
of work or for other specified and approved activities, including, but not
limited to, job interviews, medical appointments, treatment, and outings to
visit family;
(e) To ensure that committed offenders consistently participate in all
necessary therapy, programming, treatment, vocational training, and educational
classes; and
(f) To ensure that committed offenders maintain their scheduled work
hours.
Sec. 63. Section 47-1106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
-31-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
47-1106 The division and the department shall set standards for the
appropriate staffing levels of community work release and reentry centers. The
division and the department shall require each center to:
(1) Be under the supervision and control of a designated center director
approved by the division or the department;
(2) Be adequately staffed twenty-four hours per day, including on weekends
and holidays; and
(3) Assign an individual counselor to each committed offender assigned to
the center.
Sec. 64. Section 47-1107, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1107 (1) The division and the department shall require each community
work release and reentry center to establish an individualized release plan for
each committed offender assigned to the center. The staff of a center shall
assist the division and the department in making reasonable advance
preparations for the release of such committed offenders.
(2) If a parole-eligible committed offender is released from a center, the
offender shall be subject to parole conditions set by the board and under the
supervision of a district parole officer assigned by the division pursuant to
section 83-1,104. The individualized release plan for a parole-eligible
committed offender shall be developed in coordination with the assigned
district parole officer.
(3) If a committed offender whose sentence includes a term of post-release
supervision is released from a center, the offender shall be subject to the
conditions of his or her order of post-release supervision and under the
supervision of a district probation officer. The individualized release plan
for such an offender shall be developed in coordination with the assigned
district probation officer.
Sec. 65. Section 47-1108, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1108 (1) The division and the department shall set requirements for the
maintenance of the individual records of committed offenders assigned to a
community work release and reentry center.
(2) The division and the department shall require each community work
release and reentry center to make periodic reports to the division and the
department on the performance of each committed offender assigned to the
center.
Sec. 66. Section 47-1109, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1109 The division and the department shall establish an internal system
for assessing the achievements of community work release and reentry centers
and the effectiveness of the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act as
a whole. The division and the department shall develop and maintain measurable
goals and objectives for such assessment.
Sec. 67. Section 47-1110, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1110 (1) The department division shall designate a parole officer to
monitor the performance of each parole-eligible committed offender who is
assigned to a community work release and reentry center. The designated parole
officer shall be required to periodically report to the department division on
the progress of the committed offender.
(2) The department shall designate a correctional officer to monitor the
performance of each committed offender who is assigned to a community work
release and reentry center under subsection (3) of section 47-1104. The
designated correctional officer shall be required to periodically report to the
department on the progress of the committed offender.
Sec. 68. Section 47-1111, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1111 The division and the department shall develop an internal program
to conduct annual reviews of the performance of each community work release and
reentry center. A senior staff person of the division and the department shall
visit each center at least twice each year.
Sec. 69. Section 47-1113, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1113 The division and the department may allow a community work release
and reentry center to have access to all of the records, documents, and reports
in the custody of the division or the department, other than presentence
investigation reports, that relate to any committed offender who is assigned to
the center.
Sec. 70. Section 47-1114, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1114 (1) By July 1, 2026, the division and the department shall develop
a strategic plan and procedure to allow private providers to bid on agreements
to establish community work release and reentry centers pursuant to the
Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate one million dollars
from the General Fund to carry out the Community Work Release and Reentry
Centers Act.
Sec. 71. Section 47-1115, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1115 (1) The department, with the assistance of the board, shall
establish a program to encourage the development of reentry housing, coordinate
the provisions of reentry services, and provide standards for reentry housing.
-32-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Through this program, the department shall:
(a) Establish minimum standards for reentry housing facilities, including
requirements related to health and safety, insurance, evaluations, and
inspections, with input from the advisory committee;
(b) Monitor compliance with these minimum standards and investigate
suspected violations;
(c) Coordinate evaluations of reentry housing facilities based on living
conditions, staffing, programming, and other criteria;
(d) Communicate with relevant agencies regarding evaluation results and
compliance with minimum standards;
(e) Facilitate communication between the department, division, board,
probation administration, and reentry housing facilities regarding reentering
persons in need of housing and the availability of housing to meet such needs;
(f) Engage in regular discussions with entities which organize and
prioritize housing services for people experiencing homelessness or at risk of
homelessness in Nebraska;
(g) Track data on costs, utilization, and outcomes for reentry housing
within the state and use this data to determine trends and project future needs
and costs; and
(h) Electronically submit an annual report to the Legislature, the Supreme
Court, and the Governor which describes the status of housing for reentering
persons in Nebraska. The report shall include details on housing-related
expenditures, characteristics of reentry housing facilities and other places
which provide housing for reentering persons, characteristics of the
individuals receiving financial assistance for housing, and recommendations for
improving the quality and availability of housing for reentering persons in the
state.
(2) The department and board may use available funds to encourage
development of quality, safe reentry housing and to assist existing reentry
housing facilities in making improvements for the benefit of reentering persons
and public safety.
Sec. 72. Section 47-1116, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1116 (1) Reentry housing facilities shall cooperate with investigations
and evaluations conducted pursuant to the Community Work Release and Reentry
Centers Act and shall provide the department, board, division, probation
administration, and the Office of Public Counsel with reasonable access to
facilities and records related to the provision of reentry housing.
(2) The department or board may request the State Fire Marshal to
investigate any reentry housing facility for fire safety under section 81-502.
The State Fire Marshal shall assess a fee for such inspection under section
81-505.01 payable by the facility. The State Fire Marshal may delegate the
authority to make such inspections to qualified local fire prevention personnel
under section 81-502.
(3) The department or board may request a county, city, or village to
inspect any reentry housing facility for the purpose of administering or
enforcing the state building code or an applicable local building or
construction code enacted pursuant to the Building Construction Act, if the
county, city, or village has taken on the responsibility of code enforcement. A
county, city, or village may assess fees for such an inspection under section
71-6406.
(4) The department or board shall promptly notify a reentry housing
facility and relevant agencies if there is reason to believe conditions in the
facility present an imminent threat to the health or safety of reentering
persons residing at the facility.
(5) The department shall work with the board, division, probation
administration, and the advisory board to establish a speedy process by which
reentry housing facilities may contest the findings of any investigation or
evaluation pursuant to the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
Sec. 73. Section 47-1117, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1117 (1) The Reentry Continuity Advisory Board is created. The board
shall include the following members:
(a) The Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System;
(b) The Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee;
(c) The chairperson of the Board of Parole or his or her designee;
(d) The probation administrator or his or her designee; and
(e) Five additional members to be appointed by the Governor. Such members
shall include:
(i) An individual with experience in reentry and restorative justice
service delivery;
(ii) A victims' rights representative;
(iii) A formerly incarcerated individual;
(iv) An individual with expertise in mental or behavioral health; and
(v) An individual with experience in public policy.
(2) The advisory board shall select a chairperson from among its members.
(3) The advisory board shall identify areas for improving continuity and
collaboration among the department, the division, the board, probation
administration, and any other relevant criminal justice entities and offer
advice on practices that will enhance the continuity of reentry services and
reentry housing for individuals in the criminal justice system.
(4) The advisory board shall:
(a) Conduct regular meetings;
-33-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(b) Provide advice and assistance to the department and board relating to
reentry housing in Nebraska;
(c) Promote the interests of reentering persons and their families;
(d) Promote public safety through effective reintegration into the
community;
(e) Provide input on the process of evaluating reentry housing facilities;
(f) Engage with neighborhood groups and other stakeholders;
(g) Provide reports as requested by the department and board; and
(h) Engage in other activities as requested by the department and board.
(5) The advisory board shall convene at least quarterly. The members
described in subdivisions (1)(b), (c), and (d) of this section shall attend
each meeting of the advisory board and share and present information relevant
to the mission of the advisory board.
(6) The department, division, board, and probation administration shall
provide information requested by the advisory board related to its mission.
This shall include, but is not limited to, information regarding:
(a) The use of evidence-based risk assessments and evidence-based
programming;
(b) Participation in rehabilitation and education programs;
(c) Treatment and programming offered, including vocational training,
substance abuse treatment, cognitive-behavioral therapy, and mental health
counseling;
(d) Population and demographic data;
(e) Use of and need for transitional housing and reentry housing;
(f) Identified gaps in services;
(g) Recidivism;
(h) Institutional conduct; and
(i) Post-release and reentry planning and services;
(7) The advisory board shall conduct periodic evaluations of the
effectiveness of the collaborative efforts and reentry programs offered by the
department, division, board, probation administration, and other criminal
justice agencies. Such evaluation shall be accomplished using an integrated
reentry and rehabilitation framework, which shall include an examination of:
(a) The extent to which agencies are conducting comprehensive assessments
of criminal justice-involved individuals' needs and risks, including education,
employment, housing, mental health, substance abuse, and family support;
(b) Whether the agencies are providing individualized reentry planning
tailored to the specific needs and circumstances of such individuals, with a
focus on addressing criminogenic factors and promoting positive behavioral
change;
(c) Whether such individuals have access to evidence-based interventions,
programs, and services both during and following incarceration, including
education, vocational training, mental health treatment, substance abuse
counseling, and life skills development; and
(d) The extent of collaboration and coordination between the department,
parole, probation, other criminal justice agencies, community-based
organizations, and other stakeholders.
(8) The advisory board shall assist probation administration and , the
department , and the division in implementing performance metrics for staff as
provided in sections 29-2243 and 83-171.01. The advisory board shall regularly
review such agencies' implementation and use of such performance metrics and
offer updated guidance to ensure that such metrics are aligned with best
practices, stakeholder input, and the evolving goals and priorities of the
criminal justice system.
(9) On or before October 1, 2025, and on or before each October 1
thereafter, the advisory board shall electronically submit a report to the
Judiciary Committee of the Legislature. The report shall include data regarding
baselines, goals, efforts undertaken to achieve such goals, and action steps
outlined to meet such goals and set objectives. The report shall detail the
outcomes of parole decisions, reentry efforts, recidivism rates, and any
challenges encountered. The report shall provide stakeholders with a clear
understanding of the progress made, challenges faced, and strategies employed
throughout the reporting period.
Sec. 74. Section 47-1119, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
47-1119 The department , division, and board may adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out the Community Work Release and Reentry
Centers Act.
Sec. 75. Section 48-215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-215 It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation, engaged
to any extent whatsoever in the State of Nebraska in the production,
manufacture, or distribution of military or naval material, equipment, or
supplies for the State of Nebraska or the government of the United States, to
refuse to employ any person in any capacity, if such said person is a citizen
and is qualified, on account of the race, color, creed, religion, or national
origin, or military or veteran status of such said person.
Sec. 76. Section 48-628.13, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-628.13 Good cause for voluntarily leaving employment shall include, but
not be limited to, the following reasons:
(1) An individual has made all reasonable efforts to preserve the
employment but voluntarily leaves his or her work for the necessary purpose of
-34-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
escaping abuse at the place of employment or abuse as defined in section 42-903
between household members;
(2) An individual left his or her employment voluntarily due to a bona
fide non-work-connected illness or injury that prevented him or her from
continuing the employment or from continuing the employment without undue risk
of harm to the individual;
(3) An individual left his or her employment to accompany his or her
spouse to the spouse's employment in a different city or new military duty
station;
(4) An individual left his or her employment because his or her employer
required the employee to relocate;
(5)(a) An individual is a construction worker and left his or her
employment voluntarily for the purpose of accepting previously secured insured
work in the construction industry if the commissioner finds that:
(i)(A) The quit occurred within thirty days immediately prior to the
established termination date of the job which the individual voluntarily
leaves, (B) the specific starting date of the new job is prior to the
established termination date of the job which the worker quits, (C) the new job
offered employment for a longer period of time than remained available on the
job which the construction worker voluntarily quit, and (D) the worker had
worked at least twenty days or more at the new job after the established
termination date of the previous job unless the new job was terminated by a
contract cancellation; or
(ii)(A) The construction worksite of the job which the worker quit was
more than fifty miles from his or her place of residence, (B) the new
construction job was fifty or more miles closer to his or her residence than
the job which he or she quit, and (C) the worker actually worked twenty days or
more at the new job unless the new job was terminated by a contract
cancellation.
(b) The provisions of this subdivision (5) shall not apply if the
individual is separated from the new job under conditions resulting in a
disqualification from benefits under section 48-628.10 or 48-628.12;
(6) An individual accepted a voluntary layoff to avoid bumping another
worker;
(7) An individual left his or her employment as a result of being directed
to perform an illegal act;
(8) An individual left his or her employment because of unlawful
discrimination or workplace harassment on the basis of race, sex, or age, or
military or veteran status;
(9) An individual left his or her employment because of unsafe working
conditions;
(10) An individual left his or her employment to attend school;
(11) An individual has made all reasonable efforts to preserve employment
but voluntarily leaves employment for the purpose of caring for a family member
with a serious health condition. For purposes of this subdivision:
(a) Family member means:
(i) A biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal ward
of the individual or the individual's spouse or a person to whom the individual
or the individual's spouse stood in loco parentis when such person was a minor
child, regardless of the age or dependency status of such child, stepchild,
legal ward, or person;
(ii) A biological, adoptive, or foster parent, a stepparent, or a legal
guardian of the individual or the individual's spouse or a person who stood in
loco parentis to the individual or the individual's spouse when the individual
or the individual's spouse was a minor child;
(iii) The individual's spouse; or
(iv) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether of a biological,
foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of the individual or the individual's
spouse; and
(b) Serious health condition has the same meaning as in 29 U.S.C. 2611, as
such section existed on January 1, 2021; or
(12) Equity and good conscience demand a finding of good cause.
Sec. 77. Section 48-1125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1125 Sections 48-1102 to 48-1126 and sections 77, 78, and 91 of this
act 48-1101 to 48-1125 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Fair
Employment Practice Act.
Sec. 78. Section 48-1101, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1101 (1) It is the policy of this state to foster the employment of all
employable persons in the state on the basis of merit regardless of their race,
color, religion, sex, disability, or national origin, or military or veteran
status and to safeguard their right to obtain and hold employment without
discrimination because of their race, color, religion, sex, disability, or
national origin, or military or veteran status. Denying equal opportunity for
employment because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, or national
origin, or military or veteran status is contrary to the principles of freedom
and is a burden on the objectives of the public policy of this state.
(2) Except for the veterans preference provided for in sections 48-225 to
48-231, the The policy of this state does not require any person to employ an
applicant for employment because of his or her race, color, religion, sex,
disability, or national origin, or military or veteran status, and the policy
of this state does not require any employer, employment agency, labor
-35-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
organization, or joint labor-management committee to grant preferential
treatment to any individual or to any group because of race, color, religion,
sex, disability, or national origin, or military or veteran status.
(3) It is the public policy of this state that all people in Nebraska,
both with and without disabilities, shall have the right and opportunity to
enjoy the benefits of living, working, and recreating within this state. It is
the intent of the Legislature that state and local governments, Nebraska
businesses, Nebraska labor organizations, and Nebraskans with disabilities
understand their rights and responsibilities under the law regarding employment
discrimination and the prevention of discrimination on the basis of disability.
Sec. 79. Section 48-1104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1104 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer:
(1) To fail or refuse to hire, to discharge, or to harass any individual,
or otherwise to discriminate against any individual with respect to
compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, because of such
individual's race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or
national origin, or military or veteran status; or
(2) To limit, advertise, solicit, segregate, or classify employees in any
way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment
opportunities or otherwise adversely affect such individual's status as an
employee, because of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 80. Section 48-1105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1105 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employment
agency to:
(1) Fail fail or refuse to refer for employment, or otherwise to
discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status;
or
(2) Classify to classify or refer for employment any individual on the
basis of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national
origin, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 81. Section 48-1106, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1106 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for a labor
organization:
(1) To exclude or to expel from its membership, or otherwise to
discriminate against, any individual because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status;
(2) To limit, segregate, or classify its membership, or to classify or
fail or refuse to refer for employment any individual, in any way which would
deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment opportunities, or would
limit such employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect such
individual's status as an employee or as an applicant for employment, because
of such individual's race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or
national origin, or military or veteran status; or
(3) To cause or attempt to cause an employer to discriminate against an
individual in violation of this section.
Sec. 82. Section 48-1107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1107 It shall be an unlawful employment practice for any employer,
labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling
apprenticeship or other training or retraining, including on-the-job training
programs, to discriminate against any individual because of race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status, in admission to, or employment in, any program established to
provide apprenticeship or other training.
Sec. 83. Section 48-1108, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1108 Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Fair
Employment Practice Act:
(1) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to
hire and employ employees, for an employment agency to classify or refer for
employment any individual, for a labor organization to classify its membership
or to classify or refer for employment any individual, or for an employer,
labor organization, or joint labor-management committee controlling
apprenticeship or other training or retraining programs to admit or employ any
individual in any such program on the basis of religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status in those
certain instances when religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national
origin, or military or veteran status is a bona fide occupational qualification
reasonably necessary to the normal operation of that particular business or
enterprise;
(2) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for a school, college,
university, or other educational institution or institution of learning to hire
and employ employees of a particular religion if such school, college,
university, or other educational institution or institution of learning is, in
whole or in substantial part, owned, supported, controlled, or managed by a
particular religion or by a particular religious corporation, association, or
society or if the curriculum of such school, college, university, or other
educational institution of learning is directed toward the propagation of a
-36-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
particular religion;
(3) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to
enact any bona fide health and safety standard that regulates characteristics
associated with race if the employer demonstrates that:
(a) Without the implementation of such standard, it is reasonably certain
that the health and safety of the applicant, employee, or other materially
connected person will be impaired;
(b) The standard is adopted for nondiscriminatory reasons;
(c) The standard is applied equally; and
(d) The employer has engaged in good faith efforts to reasonably
accommodate the applicant or employee; and
(4) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for the Nebraska State
Patrol, a county sheriff, a city or village police department, or any other law
enforcement agency in this state or the Nebraska National Guard to impose its
own dress and grooming standards.
Sec. 84. Section 48-1111, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1111 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Fair Employment
Practice Act, it shall not be an unlawful employment practice for an employer
to apply different standards of compensation, or different terms, conditions,
or privileges of employment pursuant to a bona fide seniority or merit system
or a system which measures earnings by quantity or quality of production or to
employees who work in different locations, if such differences are not the
result of an intention to discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status,
nor shall it be an unlawful employment practice for an employer to give and to
act upon the results of any professionally developed ability test if such test,
its administration, or action upon the results is not designed, intended, or
used to discriminate because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital
status, or national origin, or military or veteran status.
(2) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice for a covered entity
to deny privileges of employment to an individual with a disability when the
qualification standards, tests, or selection criteria that screen out or tend
to screen out or otherwise deny a job or benefit to an individual with a
disability:
(a) Have been shown to be job-related and consistent with business
necessity and such performance cannot be accomplished by reasonable
accommodation, as required by the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and the
federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990; or
(b) Include a requirement that an individual shall not pose a direct
threat, involving a significant risk to the health or safety of other
individuals in the workplace, that cannot be eliminated by reasonable
accommodation.
(3) It shall not be an unlawful employment practice to refuse employment
based on a policy of not employing both husband and wife if such policy is
equally applied to both sexes.
(4) (2) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Fair Employment
Practice Act, women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical
conditions shall be treated the same for all employment-related purposes,
including receipt of employee benefits, as other persons not so affected but
similar in their ability or inability to work, and nothing in this section
shall be interpreted to provide otherwise.
(5) This section shall not require an employer to provide employee
benefits for abortion except when medical complications have arisen from an
abortion.
(6) Nothing in this section shall preclude an employer from providing
employee benefits for abortion under fringe benefit programs or otherwise
affect bargaining agreements in regard to abortion.
Sec. 85. Section 48-1113, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1113 Nothing in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act shall be
interpreted to require any employer, employment agency, labor organization, or
joint labor-management committee subject to the act to grant preferential
treatment to any individual or to any group because of the race, color,
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status of such individual or group on account of an imbalance which may
exist with respect to the total number or percentage of persons of any race,
color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status employed by any employer, referred or classified for
employment by any employment agency or labor organization, admitted to
membership or classified by any labor organization, or admitted to, or employed
in, any apprenticeship or other training program, in comparison with the total
number or percentage of persons of such race, color, religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status in any
community, section, or other area, or in the available work force in any
community, section, or other area.
Sec. 86. Section 48-1115, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1115 Except as provided in section 91 of this act and except for the
veterans preference provided for in sections 48-225 to 48-231 or section
48-238, it It shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer, labor
organization, or employment agency to print or publish or cause to be printed
or published any notice or advertisement relating to employment by such an
-37-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
employer or membership in or any classification or referral for employment by
such a labor organization, or relating to any classification or referral for
employment by such an employment agency, indicating any preference, limitation,
specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status,
except that such a notice or advertisement may indicate a preference,
limitation, specification or discrimination based on religion, sex, disability,
marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status when
religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or
veteran status is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.
Sec. 87. Section 48-1117, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1117 The commission shall have the following powers and duties:
(1) To receive, investigate, and pass upon charges of unlawful employment
practices anywhere in the state;
(2) To hold hearings, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance,
administer oaths, and take the testimony of any person under oath and, in
connection therewith, to require the production for examination of any books
and papers relevant to any allegation of unlawful employment practice pending
before the commission. The commission may make rules as to the issuance of
subpoenas, subject to the approval by a constitutional majority of the elected
members of the Legislature;
(3) To cooperate with the federal government and with local agencies to
effectuate the purposes of the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act, including
the sharing of information possessed by the commission on a case that has also
been filed with the federal government or local agencies if both the employer
and complainant have been notified of the filing;
(4) To attempt to eliminate unfair employment practices by means of
conference, mediation, conciliation, arbitration, and persuasion;
(5) To require that every employer, employment agency, and labor
organization subject to the act shall (a) make and keep such records relevant
to the determinations of whether unlawful employment practices have been or are
being committed, (b) preserve such records for such periods, and (c) make such
reports therefrom, as the commission shall prescribe by regulation or order,
after public hearing, as reasonable, necessary, or appropriate for the
enforcement of the act or the regulations or orders thereunder. The commission
shall, by regulation, require each employer, labor organization, and joint
labor-management committee subject to the act which controls an apprenticeship
or other training program to maintain such records as are reasonably necessary
to carry out the purposes of the act, including, but not limited to, a list of
applicants who wish to participate in such program, including the chronological
order in which such applications were received, and to furnish to the
commission, upon request, a detailed description of the manner in which persons
are selected to participate in the apprenticeship or other training program.
Any employer, employment agency, labor organization, or joint labor-management
committee which believes that the application to it of any regulation or order
issued under this section would result in undue hardship may either apply to
the commission for an exemption from the application of such regulation or
order or bring a civil action in the district court for the district where such
records are kept. If the commission or the court, as the case may be, finds
that the application of the regulation or order to the employer, employment
agency, or labor organization in question would impose an undue hardship, the
commission or the court, as the case may be, may grant appropriate relief;
(6) To report, not less than once every two years, to the Clerk of the
Legislature and the Governor, on the hearings it has conducted and the
decisions it has rendered, the other work performed by it to carry out the
purposes of the act, and to make recommendations for such further legislation
concerning abuses and discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, marital status, or national origin, or military or veteran status,
as may be desirable. The report shall also include the number of complaints
filed under the act alleging a violation of subdivision (2) of section
48-1107.01 and the resolution of such complaints. The report submitted to the
Clerk of the Legislature shall be submitted electronically. Each member of the
Legislature shall receive an electronic copy of the report required by this
subdivision by making a request for it to the chairperson of the commission;
and
(7) To adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out
the duties prescribed in the act.
Sec. 88. Section 48-1119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1119 (1) In case of failure to eliminate any unlawful employment
practice by informal methods of conference, conciliation, persuasion,
mediation, or arbitration, the commission may order a public hearing. If such
hearing is ordered, the commission shall cause to be issued and served a
written notice, together with a copy of the complaint, requiring the person,
employer, labor organization, or employment agency named in the complaint,
hereinafter referred to as respondent, to answer such charges at a hearing
before the commission at a time and place which shall be specified in such
notice. Such hearing shall be within the county where the alleged unlawful
employment practice occurred. The complainant shall be a party to the
proceeding, and in the discretion of the commission any other person whose
testimony has a bearing on the matter may be allowed to intervene therein. Both
the complainant and the respondent, in addition to the commission, may
-38-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
introduce witnesses at the hearing. The respondent may file a verified answer
to the allegations of the complaint and may appear at such hearing in person
and with or without counsel. Testimony or other evidence may be introduced by
either party. All evidence shall be under oath and a record thereof shall be
made and preserved. Such proceedings shall, so far as practicable, be conducted
in accordance with the rules of evidence applicable in the district courts of
the State of Nebraska, and shall be of public record.
(2) No person shall be excused from testifying or from producing any book,
document, paper, or account in any investigation, or inquiry by, or hearing
before the commission when ordered to do so, upon the ground that the testimony
or evidence, book, document, paper, or account required of such person may tend
to incriminate such person in or subject such person to penalty or forfeiture;
but no person shall be prosecuted, punished, or subjected to any forfeiture or
penalty for or on account of any act, transaction, matter, or thing concerning
which such person shall have been compelled under oath to testify or produce
documentary evidence, except that no person so testifying shall be exempt from
prosecution or punishment for any perjury committed by such person in his or
her testimony. Such immunity shall extend only to a natural person who, in
obedience to a subpoena, gives testimony under oath or produces evidence,
documentary or otherwise, under oath. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed as precluding any person from claiming any right or privilege
available to such person under the Fifth Amendment fifth amendment to the
Constitution of the United States.
(3) After the conclusion of the hearing, the commission shall, within ten
days of the receipt of the transcript or the receipt of the recommendations
from the hearing officer, make and file its findings of fact and conclusions of
law and make and enter an appropriate order. The hearing officer need not refer
to the page and line numbers of the transcript when making his or her
recommendation to the commission. Such findings of fact and conclusions of law
shall be in sufficient detail to enable a court on appeal to determine the
controverted questions presented by the proceedings and whether proper weight
was given to the evidence. If the commission determines that the respondent has
intentionally engaged in or is intentionally engaging in any unlawful
employment practice, it shall issue and cause to be served on such respondent
an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such unlawful
employment practice and order such other affirmative action as may be
appropriate which may include, but shall not be limited to, reinstatement or
hiring of employees, with or without backpay. Backpay liability shall not
accrue from a date more than two years prior to the filing of the charge with
the commission. Interim earnings or amounts earnable with reasonable diligence
by the person or persons discriminated against shall operate to reduce the
backpay otherwise allowable.
(4) A complainant who has suffered physical, emotional, or financial harm
as a result of a violation of section 48-1104 or 48-1114 may, at any stage of
the proceedings prior to dismissal, file an action directly in the district
court of the county where such alleged violation occurred. If the complainant
files a district court action on the charge, the complainant shall provide
written notice of such filing to the commission, and such notification shall
immediately terminate all proceedings before the commission. The district court
shall file and try such case as any other civil action, and any successful
complainant shall be entitled to appropriate relief, including temporary or
permanent injunctive relief, general and special damages, reasonable attorney's
fees, and costs.
(5) No order of the commission shall require the admission or
reinstatement of an individual as a member of a labor organization or the
hiring, reinstatement, or promotion of an individual as an employee, or the
payment to him or her of any backpay, if such individual was refused admission,
suspended, or expelled, or was refused employment or advancement or was
suspended or discharged for any reason other than discrimination on account of
race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, or national origin, or
military or veteran status or in violation of section 48-1114. If the
commission finds that a respondent has not engaged in any unfair employment
practice, it shall within thirty days state its findings of fact and
conclusions of law. A copy of any order shall be served upon the person against
whom it runs or his or her attorney and notice thereof shall be given to the
other parties to the proceedings or their attorneys. Such order shall take
effect twenty days after service thereof unless otherwise provided and shall
continue in force either for a period which may be designated therein or until
changed or revoked by the commission.
(6) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, until a
transcript of the record of the proceedings is filed in the district court as
provided in section 48-1120, the commission may, at any time upon reasonable
notice and in such a manner it shall deem proper, modify or set aside, in whole
or in part, any finding or order made by it.
Sec. 89. Section 48-1122, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1122 Every contract to which the state or any of its political
subdivisions is a party shall contain a provision requiring the contractor and
his or her subcontractors not to discriminate against any employee or applicant
for employment, to be employed in the performance of such contract, with
respect to his or her hire, tenure, terms, conditions, or privileges of
employment, because of his or her race, color, religion, sex, disability, or
national origin, or military or veteran status.
-39-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Sec. 90. Section 48-1124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
48-1124 Nothing contained in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act
shall be deemed to repeal any of the provisions of the civil rights law, any
other law of this state, or any municipal ordinance relating to discrimination
because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, disability, or national origin,
or military or veteran status.
Sec. 91. The inclusion of military or veteran status as a protected class
in the Nebraska Fair Employment Practice Act and sections 23-2525, 23-2531, and
23-2541:
(1) Is not intended to duplicate or mirror the protections offered by the
federal Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, 38
U.S.C. 4301 et seq.;
(2) Does not require an employer or other covered entity to treat a
servicemember who is absent from work differently than an individual who is not
a servicemember;
(3) Does not prohibit the granting of special benefits to veterans or
servicemembers on an otherwise nondiscriminatory basis; and
(4) Does not prohibit veterans' preference programs.
Sec. 92. Section 49-801, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
49-801 Unless the context is shown to intend otherwise, words and phrases
in the statutes of Nebraska hereafter enacted are used in the following sense:
(1) Acquire when used in connection with a grant of power or property
right to any person includes shall include the purchase, grant, gift, devise,
bequest, and obtaining by eminent domain;
(2) Action includes shall include any proceeding in any court of this
state;
(3) Attorney means shall mean attorney at law;
(4) Company includes shall include any corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, joint-stock company, joint venture, or association;
(5) Domestic when applied to corporations means shall mean all those
created by authority of this state;
(6) Federal refers shall refer to the United States;
(7) Foreign when applied to corporations includes shall include all those
created by authority other than that of this state;
(8) Grantee includes shall include every person to whom any estate or
interest passes in or by any conveyance;
(9) Grantor includes shall include every person from or by whom any estate
or interest passes in or by any conveyance;
(10) Inhabitant shall be construed to mean a resident in the particular
locality in reference to which that word is used;
(11) Land or real estate includes shall include lands, tenements, and
hereditaments and all rights thereto and interest therein other than a chattel
interest;
(12) Magistrate includes shall include judge of the county court and clerk
magistrate;
(13) Military or veteran status means a person:
(a) Is serving active duty service in the armed forces of the United
States, including any reserve component or the National Guard;
(b) Has served on such active duty and was discharged or otherwise
separated with a characterization of honorable or general (under honorable
conditions); or
(c) Is a dependent, as defined in 50 U.S.C. 3911, of a person described in
subdivision (13)(a) or (b) of this section;
(14) (13) Month means shall mean calendar month;
(15) (14) Oath includes shall include affirmation in all cases in which an
affirmation may be substituted for an oath;
(16) (15) Peace officer includes shall include sheriffs, coroners,
jailers, marshals, police officers, state highway patrol officers, members of
the National Guard on active service by direction of the Governor during
periods of emergency, and all other persons with similar authority to make
arrests;
(17) (16) Person includes shall include bodies politic and corporate,
societies, communities, the public generally, individuals, partnerships,
limited liability companies, joint-stock companies, and associations;
(18) (17) Personal estate includes shall include money, goods, chattels,
claims, and evidences of debt;
(19) (18) Process means shall mean a summons, subpoena, or notice to
appear issued out of a court in the course of judicial proceedings;
(20) (19) Service animal has shall have the same meaning as in 28 C.F.R.
36.104, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2008;
(21) (20) State when applied to different states of the United States
shall be construed to extend to and include the District of Columbia and the
several territories organized by Congress;
(22) (21) Sworn includes shall include affirmed in all cases in which an
affirmation may be substituted for an oath;
(23) (22) The United States includes shall include territories, outlying
possessions, and the District of Columbia;
(24) (23) Violate includes shall include failure to comply with;
(25) (24) Writ shall signify an order or citation in writing issued in the
name of the state out of a court or by a judicial officer; and
(26) (25) Year means shall mean calendar year.
-40-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Sec. 93. Section 51-211, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
51-211 (1) The library board may erect, lease, or occupy an appropriate
building for the use of a library, appoint a suitable librarian and assistants,
fix the compensation of such appointees, and remove such appointees at the
pleasure of the board. The governing body of the county, city, or village in
which the library is located shall approve any personnel administrative or
compensation policy or procedure before implementation of such policy or
procedure by the library board.
(2) The library board may establish rules and regulations for the
government of such library as may be deemed necessary for its preservation and
to maintain its usefulness and efficiency. The library board may fix and
impose, by general rules, penalties and forfeitures for trespasses upon or
injury to the library grounds, rooms, books, or other property, for failure to
return any book, or for violation of any bylaw, rule, or regulation and fix and
impose reasonable fees, not to exceed the library's actual cost, for nonbasic
services. The board shall have and exercise such power as may be necessary to
carry out the spirit and intent of sections 51-201 to 51-219 in establishing
and maintaining a public library and reading room.
(3) The public library shall make its basic services available without
charge to all residents of the political subdivision which supplies its tax
support.
(4) No service shall be denied to any person because of race, sex,
religion, age, color, national origin, ancestry, physical handicap, or marital
status, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 94. Section 58-216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-216 Low-income or moderate-income person shall mean any person
irrespective of race, religion, creed, national origin, or sex, or military or
veteran status determined by the authority to be eligible for such assistance
as is made available by the Nebraska Investment Finance Authority Act on
account of insufficient personal or family income, taking into consideration
without limiting the generality thereof such factors as:
(1) The amount of income of such person available for housing needs;
(2) Size of family;
(3) Cost and condition of housing available;
(4) Whether such person is elderly, infirm, or disabled;
(5) The ability of such person to compete successfully in the normal
private housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is
providing sanitary, safe, and uncrowded housing; and
(6) Existing federal guidelines or standards for determining low income
and moderate income.
Sec. 95. Section 58-808, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-808 Private health care institution means any private not-for-profit
corporation or institution that (1) is licensed under the Health Care Facility
Licensure Act, (2) is described in section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue
Code and is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, (3) is located within this state and is not owned or
controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality,
district, or municipality thereof, and (4) does not violate any Nebraska or
federal law against discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, national
origin, ancestry, age, gender, or handicap, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 96. Section 58-809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
58-809 Private institution of higher education means a not-for-profit
educational institution located within this state which is not owned or
controlled by the state or any political subdivision, agency, instrumentality,
district, or municipality thereof, which is authorized by law to provide a
program of education beyond the high school level, and which:
(1) Admits as regular students only individuals having a certificate of
graduation from a high school or the recognized equivalent of such a
certificate;
(2) Provides an educational program for which it awards a bachelor's
degree; provides an educational program, admission into which is conditioned
upon the prior attainment of a bachelor's degree or its equivalent, for which
it awards a postgraduate degree; provides a program of not less than two years
in length which is acceptable for full credit toward a bachelor's degree; or
offers a two-year program in engineering, mathematics, or the physical or
biological sciences which is designed to prepare the student to work as a
technician and at a semiprofessional level in engineering, research, medicine,
or other technological fields which require the understanding and application
of basic engineering, scientific, or mathematical principles or knowledge;
(3) Is accredited by an accrediting agency or association or, if not so
accredited, is an institution whose credits are accepted, on transfer, by not
less than three institutions which are so accredited, for credit on the same
basis as if transferred from an institution so accredited; and
(4) Has a student admissions policy that does not violate any other
Nebraska or federal law against discrimination on the basis of race, color,
creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, or handicap, or military or
veteran status.
Sec. 97. Section 58-810, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
-41-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
58-810 Private social services institution means any private not-for-
profit corporation or institution that (1) provides health, safety, and welfare
assistance, including emergency, social, housing, and related support services,
to members of the general public in the state, (2) is described in section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is exempt from federal income
taxation under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, (3) is located
within this state and is not owned or controlled by the state or any political
subdivision, agency, instrumentality, district, or municipality thereof, and
(4) does not violate any Nebraska or federal law against discrimination on the
basis of race, color, creed, national origin, ancestry, age, gender, or
handicap, or military or veteran status.
Sec. 98. Section 68-1605, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-1605 (1) The department shall use the funds in the Homeless Shelter
Assistance Trust Fund to finance grants for projects or programs that provide
for persons or families with special housing needs.
(2) Projects and programs to which funds shall be provided include
eligible community, neighborhood-based, housing-assistance organizations,
institutions, associations, and societies or corporations that:
(a) Are exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01;
(b) Do not discriminate on the basis of age, religion, sex, race, color,
or national origin, or military or veteran status. This subdivision does not
prohibit otherwise nondiscriminatory conduct designed to benefit veterans or
servicemembers or their family members, such as providing housing limited to
veterans or servicemembers or their family members, or otherwise offering
benefits that are limited to veterans or servicemembers or their family
members;
(c) Provide residential housing for at least eight hours of every twenty-
four-hour period; and
(d) Operate a drug-free premises.
(3) The department shall establish an advisory committee consisting of
individuals and groups involved with housing issues, in particular those
pertaining to persons or families with special housing needs, to advise and
assist the department in establishing criteria, priorities, and guidelines for
eligibility requirements, application requirements and dates, public
notification, and monitoring and shall assist the department in adopting and
promulgating rules and regulations for providing grants from the fund.
(4) An application submitted by an organization representing a number of
eligible applicants may be considered even though the representing organization
may itself not qualify under this section.
(5) In making grants pursuant to the Homeless Shelter Assistance Trust
Fund Act, the department shall consider, but not be limited to, the following
factors:
(a) The number of night-lodging units provided by the applicant as
measured by the number of persons housed per night;
(b) Participation by the applicant in community planning processes and
activities aimed at preventing and alleviating homelessness;
(c) Other verifiable units of service provided by the applicant; and
(d) The geographic distribution of funds.
Sec. 99. Section 69-2403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
69-2403 (1) Except as provided in this section and section 69-2409, a
person shall not:
(a) Purchase purchase, lease, rent, or receive transfer of a handgun until
he or she has obtained a certificate in accordance with section 69-2404; or .
Except as provided in this section and section 69-2409, a person shall not sell
(b) Sell, lease, rent, or transfer a handgun to a person who has not
obtained a certificate.
(2) The certificate shall not be required if:
(a) The person acquiring the handgun is a licensed firearms dealer under
federal law;
(b) The handgun is an antique handgun;
(c) The person acquiring the handgun is authorized to do so on behalf of a
law enforcement agency;
(d) The transfer is a temporary transfer of a handgun and the transferee
remains (i) in the line of sight of the transferor or (ii) within the premises
of an established shooting facility;
(e) The transfer is between a person and his or her spouse, sibling,
parent, child, aunt, uncle, niece, nephew, or grandparent;
(f) The person acquiring the handgun is a holder of a valid permit under
the Concealed Handgun Permit Act; or
(g) The person acquiring the handgun is a peace officer as defined in
section 69-2429.
Sec. 100. Section 69-2409.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2409.01 (1)(a) (1) For purposes of criminal history record information
checks relating to firearms or explosives sections 69-2401 to 69-2425, the
Nebraska State Patrol shall be furnished with only such information as may be
necessary for the purposes sole purpose of determining whether an individual
is:
(i) Qualified to receive a permit to carry a concealed handgun under
section 69-2433; or
-42-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(ii) Disqualified disqualified from purchasing or possessing firearms or
explosives a handgun pursuant to state or federal law or is subject to the
disability provisions of 18 U.S.C. 922(d)(4) and (g)(4).
(b) Such information shall be furnished by the Department of Health and
Human Services. The clerks of the various courts shall furnish to the
Department of Health and Human Services and Nebraska State Patrol, as soon as
practicable but within thirty days after a court order is issued, in a form and
manner prescribed by the Department of Health and Human Services or the
Nebraska State Patrol, as applicable an order of commitment or discharge is
issued or after removal of firearm-related disabilities pursuant to section
71-963, all information necessary to set up and maintain the database required
by this section. The clerks of the various courts shall furnish This
information shall include (a) information regarding those persons who:
(i) Are disqualified from purchasing or possessing firearms or explosives
pursuant to state or federal law, including, but not limited to, 18 U.S.C.
922(d)(4) and (g)(4);
(ii) Are are currently receiving mental health treatment pursuant to a
commitment order of a mental health board or who have been discharged; ,
(iii) Have (b) information regarding those persons who have been committed
to treatment pursuant to section 29-3702; , and
(iv) Meet the definition of adjudicated as a mental defective or committed
to a mental institution pursuant to 27 C.F.R. 478.11, including individuals
found not responsible by reason of insanity, found not competent to stand
trial, found to lack the mental capacity to manage their own affairs, or
otherwise found by a court to be not competent; and
(v) Have (c) information regarding those persons who have had firearm-
related disabilities removed pursuant to section 71-963.
(c) The mental health board shall notify the Department of Health and
Human Services and the Nebraska State Patrol when an individual's firearm-
related such disabilities have been removed pursuant to section 71-963.
(d) The department Department of Health and Human Services shall also
maintain in the database information provided by the clerks of the various
courts pursuant to this section and a listing of persons committed to treatment
pursuant to section 29-3702.
(e) To ensure the accuracy of the database, any information maintained or
disclosed under this subsection shall be updated, corrected, modified, or
removed, as appropriate, and as soon as practicable, from any database that the
state or federal government maintains and makes available to the National
Instant Criminal Background Check System. The procedures for furnishing the
information shall guarantee that no information is released beyond what is
necessary for purposes of this section.
(2) In order to comply with sections 69-2401 and 69-2403 to 69-2408 and
this section, the Nebraska State Patrol shall provide to the chief of police or
sheriff of an applicant's place of residence or a licensee in the process of a
criminal history record check pursuant to section 69-2411 only the information
regarding whether or not the applicant is disqualified from purchasing or
possessing a handgun.
(3) Any person, agency, or mental health board participating in good faith
in the reporting or disclosure of records and communications under this section
is immune from any liability, civil, criminal, or otherwise, that might result
by reason of the action.
(4) Any person who intentionally causes the Nebraska State Patrol to
request information pursuant to this section without reasonable belief that the
named individual has submitted a written application under section 69-2404 or
69-2430 or is otherwise subject to a criminal history record information check
pursuant to law has completed a consent form under section 69-2410 shall be
guilty of a Class II misdemeanor in addition to other civil or criminal
liability under state or federal law.
(5) The Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and Human
Services shall report electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature on a
biannual basis the following information about the database: (a) The number of
total records of persons unable to purchase or possess firearms because of
disqualification or disability shared with the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System; (b) the number of shared records by category of such
persons; (c) the change in number of total shared records and change in number
of records by category from the previous six months; (d) the number of records
existing but not able to be shared with the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System because the record was incomplete and unable to be
accepted by the National Instant Criminal Background Check System; and (e) the
number of hours or days, if any, during which the database was unable to share
records with the National Instant Criminal Background Check System and the
reason for such inability. The report shall also be published on the websites
of the Nebraska State Patrol and the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 101. Section 69-2410, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2410 No importer, manufacturer, or dealer licensed pursuant to 18
U.S.C. 923 shall sell or deliver any handgun to another person other than a
licensed importer, manufacturer, dealer, or collector until he or she has:
(1) (1)(a) Inspected a valid certificate issued to such person pursuant to
sections 69-2401, 69-2403 to 69-2408, and 69-2409.01; and
(2) (b) Inspected a valid identification containing a photograph of such
person which appropriately and completely identifies such person. ; or
(2)(a) Obtained a completed consent form from the potential buyer or
-43-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
transferee, which form shall be established by the Nebraska State Patrol and
provided by the licensed importer, manufacturer, or dealer. The form shall
include the name, address, date of birth, gender, race, and country of
citizenship of such potential buyer or transferee. If the potential buyer or
transferee is not a United States citizen, the completed consent form shall
contain the potential buyer's or transferee's place of birth and his or her
alien or admission number;
(b) Inspected a valid identification containing a photograph of the
potential buyer or transferee which appropriately and completely identifies
such person;
(c) Requested by toll-free telephone call or other electromagnetic
communication that the Nebraska State Patrol conduct a criminal history record
check; and
(d) Received a unique approval number for such inquiry from the Nebraska
State Patrol indicating the date and number on the consent form.
Sec. 102. Section 69-2420, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
69-2420 Any person who, in connection with the purchase, transfer, or
attempted purchase of a handgun pursuant to section sections 69-2410 to
69-2423, knowingly and intentionally makes any materially false oral or written
statement or knowingly and intentionally furnishes any false identification
intended or likely to deceive the licensee shall be guilty of a Class IV
felony.
Sec. 103. Section 71-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-901 Sections 71-901 to 71-964 and sections 106 and 107 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act.
Sec. 104. Section 71-903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-903 For purposes of the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 71-904 to
71-914.02 and sections 106 and 107 of this act shall apply.
Sec. 105. Section 71-904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-904 Administrator means the administrator or other chief administrative
officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail, or Department of
Correctional Services facility or his or her designee.
Sec. 106. Dangerous sex offender has the same meaning as in section
83-174.01.
Sec. 107. Videoconferencing means conducting or participating in a
hearing or evaluation electronically or telephonically with audiovisual
interaction among the participants.
Sec. 108. Section 71-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-915 (1) The presiding judge in each district court judicial district
shall create at least one but not more than three mental health boards in such
district and shall appoint sufficient members and alternate members to such
boards. Members and alternate members of a mental health board shall be
appointed for four-year terms. The presiding judge may remove members and
alternate members of the board at his or her discretion. Vacancies shall be
filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the original
appointment. Members of the mental health board shall have the same immunity as
judges of the district court.
(2) Each mental health board shall consist of an attorney licensed to
practice law in this state and any two of the following but not more than one
from each category: A physician, a psychologist, a psychiatric nurse, a
licensed clinical social worker or a licensed independent clinical social
worker, a licensed independent mental health practitioner who is not a social
worker, or a layperson with a demonstrated interest in mental health and
substance dependency issues. The attorney shall be chairperson of the board.
Members and alternate members of a mental health board shall take and subscribe
an oath to support the United States Constitution and the Constitution of
Nebraska and to faithfully discharge the duties of the office according to law.
(3) The mental health board shall have the power to issue subpoenas, to
administer oaths, and to do any act necessary and proper for the board to carry
out its duties. No mental health board hearing shall be conducted unless three
members or alternate members are present and able to vote. Any action taken at
any mental health board hearing shall be by majority vote. Upon the agreement
of all parties, any hearing before the mental health board may be conducted by
videoconferencing.
(4) The mental health board shall prepare and file an annual inventory
statement with the county board of its county of all county personal property
in its custody or possession. Members of the mental health board shall be
compensated and shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses by
the county or counties being served by such board. Compensation shall be at an
hourly rate to be determined by the presiding judge of the district court,
except that such compensation shall not be less than fifty dollars for each
hearing of the board. Members shall also be reimbursed for their actual and
necessary expenses, not including charges for meals. Mileage shall be
determined pursuant to section 23-1112.
Sec. 109. Section 71-919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-919 (1)(a) A law enforcement officer may take a person into emergency
-44-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
protective custody, cause him or her to be taken into emergency protective
custody, or continue his or her custody if he or she is already in custody if
the officer has probable cause to believe:
(i) Such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
and that the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1) of section
83-174.01 is likely to occur before mental health board proceedings under the
Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act may be
initiated to obtain custody of the person; or
(ii) For a person domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, that such
person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender under tribal
law and that harm comparable to that described in section 71-908 or subdivision
(1) of section 83-174.01 or the equivalent under tribal law is likely to occur
before mental health proceedings under tribal law may be initiated to obtain
custody of the person.
(b) Such person shall be admitted to an appropriate and available medical
facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility as provided in
subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section, each
county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside
the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective
custody of persons from such county in such facilities.
(ii) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for whom
emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the tribe shall
make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside the tribe for
such purpose and shall make arrangements for payment of the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such tribe in such facilities.
(d) A mental health professional who has probable cause to believe that a
person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender may cause such
person to be taken into custody and shall have a limited privilege to hold such
person until a law enforcement officer or other authorized person arrives to
take custody of such person.
(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection, convicted sex offender means a
person with a prior conviction for an offense listed in section 29-4003.
(b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this section
who is not a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to an appropriate and
available medical facility, except that such person may instead be admitted to
a jail or other facility with an available mental health bed under the Regional
Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act until an appropriate medical facility
is available unless such person has a prior conviction for a sex offense listed
in section 29-4003.
(c) (b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who is not a convicted sex offender has a prior conviction for a sex
offense listed in section 29-4003 shall be admitted to a jail or Department of
Correctional Services facility unless a medical or psychiatric emergency exists
for which treatment at a medical facility is required. The person in emergency
protective custody shall remain at the medical facility until the medical or
psychiatric emergency has passed and it is safe to transport such person, at
which time the person shall be transferred to an available jail or Department
of Correctional Services facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, upon
admission to a facility or jail of a person taken into emergency protective
custody by a law enforcement officer under this section, such officer shall
execute a written certificate prescribed and provided by the Department of
Health and Human Services. The certificate shall allege the officer's belief
that the person in custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex
offender and shall contain a summary of the person's behavior supporting such
allegations. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the
county attorney.
(b) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken
into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under tribal
law, upon admission to a facility or jail, such officer shall execute written
documentation in a format provided by the tribe. At a minimum, such
documentation shall clearly identify the subject, identify the relevant tribe,
allege the officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and
dangerous or a dangerous sex offender under tribal law, and contain a summary
of the subject's behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such
documentation shall be immediately forwarded to the appropriate tribal
prosecutor or tribal official.
(4)(a) (4) The administrator of the facility or jail shall have such
person evaluated by a mental health professional as soon as reasonably possible
but not later than thirty-six hours after admission. The mental health
professional shall not be the mental health professional who causes such person
to be taken into custody under this section and shall not be a member or
alternate member of the mental health board that will preside over any hearing
under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment
Act with respect to such person. Upon the agreement of all parties, the
evaluation may be conducted by videoconferencing if the mental health
professional thinks it appropriate under the circumstances.
(b) A person shall be released from emergency protective custody after
completion of such evaluation unless the mental health professional determines,
in his or her clinical opinion, that such person is mentally ill and dangerous
or a dangerous sex offender. In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian
country who is taken into emergency protective custody under tribal law, the
-45-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
mental health professional shall notify an appropriate tribal prosecutor or
official of such release.
Sec. 110. Section 71-920, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-920 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a mental
health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for emergency
protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such person is
mentally ill and dangerous shall execute a written certificate as provided in
subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four hours after the
completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately
forwarded to the county attorney.
(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the following
information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel, guardian
or conservator, and next-of-kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other care or
treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge of the
subject's mental illness or substance dependence who may be called as a witness
at a mental health board hearing with respect to the subject, if known;
(e) The name and address of the medical facility or jail in which the
subject is being held for emergency protective custody and evaluation;
(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health
professional;
(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he or
she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for emergency
protective custody and evaluation; and
(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that, in his
or her clinical opinion, the subject is mentally ill and dangerous and the
clinical basis for such opinion.
(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken
into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under tribal
law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of such person,
determines that such person is mentally ill and dangerous shall execute
appropriate written documentation in a format provided by the tribe not later
than twenty-four hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such
certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the person designated by the
tribe.
Sec. 111. Section 71-922, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-922 (1) Mental health board proceedings shall be deemed to have
commenced upon the earlier of (a) the filing of a petition under section 71-921
or (b) notification by the county attorney to the law enforcement officer who
took the subject into emergency protective custody under section 71-920 or the
administrator of the treatment center or medical facility or jail having charge
of the subject of his or her intention to file such petition. The county
attorney shall file such petition as soon as reasonably practicable after such
notification.
(2) A petition filed by the county attorney under section 71-921 may
contain a request for the emergency protective custody and evaluation of the
subject prior to commencement of a mental health board hearing pursuant to such
petition with respect to the subject. Upon receipt of such request and upon a
finding of probable cause to believe that the subject is mentally ill and
dangerous as alleged in the petition, the court or chairperson of the mental
health board may issue a warrant directing the sheriff to take custody of the
subject. If the subject is already in emergency protective custody under a
certificate filed under section 71-919, a copy of such certificate shall be
filed with the petition. The subject in such custody shall be held in the
nearest appropriate and available medical facility and shall not be placed in a
jail or other correctional facility except as required or authorized by
subsection (2) of section 71-919. Each county shall make arrangements with
appropriate medical facilities inside or outside the county for such purpose
and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from such
county in such facilities.
(3) The petition and all subsequent pleadings and filings in the case
shall be entitled In the Interest of ........, Alleged to be Mentally Ill and
Dangerous. The county attorney may dismiss the petition at any time prior to
the commencement of the hearing of the mental health board under section
71-924, and upon such motion by the county attorney, the mental health board
shall dismiss the petition.
Sec. 112. Section 71-924, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-924 (1) A hearing shall be held by the mental health board to determine
whether there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject is mentally ill
and dangerous as alleged in the petition.
(2) At the commencement of the hearing, the board shall inquire whether
the subject has received a copy of the petition and list of rights accorded him
or her by sections 71-943 to 71-960 and whether he or she has read and
understood them. The board shall explain to the subject any part of the
petition or list of rights which he or she has not read or understood. The
board shall inquire of the subject whether he or she admits or denies the
allegations of the petition. If the subject admits the allegations, the board
-46-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
shall proceed to enter a treatment order pursuant to section 71-925. If the
subject denies the allegations of the petition, the board shall proceed with a
hearing on the merits of the petition.
(3) Upon the agreement of all parties, a hearing before the mental health
board under this section may be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 113. Section 71-926, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-926 (1) At the conclusion of a mental health board hearing under
section 71-924 and prior to the entry of a treatment order by the board under
section 71-925, the board may (a) order that the subject be retained in custody
until the entry of such order and the subject may be admitted for treatment
pursuant to such order or (b) order the subject released from custody under
such conditions as the board deems necessary and appropriate to prevent the
harm described in section 71-908 and to assure the subject's appearance at a
later disposition hearing by the board. A subject shall be retained in custody
under this section at the nearest appropriate and available medical facility
and shall not be placed in a jail or other correctional facility except as
required or authorized by subsection (2) of section 71-919. Each county shall
make arrangements with appropriate medical facilities inside or outside the
county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective
custody of persons from such county in such facilities.
(2) A subject who has been ordered to receive inpatient or outpatient
treatment by a mental health board may be provided treatment while being
retained in emergency protective custody and pending admission of the subject
for treatment pursuant to such order.
(3)(a) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under
tribal law, at the conclusion of a mental health hearing under tribal law and
prior to entry of a treatment order by the tribal court, the tribal court may
order that the subject be:
(i) Retained in custody until entry of such order and the subject may be
admitted for treatment pursuant to such order; or
(ii) Released from custody under such conditions as the tribal court deems
necessary and appropriate to prevent harm comparable to that described in
section 71-908 or the equivalent under tribal law and to assure the subject's
appearance at a later disposition hearing. A subject shall be retained in
custody under this section at the nearest appropriate and available medical
facility and shall not be placed in a jail or other correctional facility
except as required or authorized by subsection (2) of section 71-919.
(b) Each tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate medical facilities
inside or outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for
payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from such
tribe in such facilities.
(c) A subject who has been ordered to receive inpatient or outpatient
treatment pursuant to tribal law may be provided treatment while being retained
in emergency protective custody and pending admission of the subject for
treatment pursuant to such order.
Sec. 114. Section 71-939, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-939 (1)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment facility
or program for persons with mental illness or substance dependence pursuant to
an order of a court or mental health board is absent without authorization from
such treatment facility or program, the administrator or program director of
such treatment facility or program shall immediately notify the Nebraska State
Patrol and the court or clerk of the mental health board of the judicial
district from which such person was committed.
(b) The clerk shall issue the warrant of the board directed to the sheriff
of the county for the arrest and detention of such person. Such warrant may be
executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(2)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment facility or
program for persons with mental illness or substance dependence pursuant to an
order of a tribal court as provided in section 71-964 is absent without
authorization from such treatment facility or program, the administrator or
program director of such treatment facility or program shall immediately notify
the Nebraska State Patrol and the appropriate tribal prosecutor or official.
(b) The appropriate tribal official may issue a warrant directed to a
peace officer or sheriff of any county for the arrest and detention of such
person. Such warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(3) The notification required by subdivision (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this
section shall include the person's name and description and a determination by
a psychiatrist, clinical director, administrator, or program director as to
whether the person is believed to be currently dangerous to others.
(4) Pending the issuance of such warrant, any peace officer may seize and
detain such person when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that
the person is reported to be absent without authorization as described in this
section. Such person shall be returned to the treatment facility or program or
shall be taken to a facility or jail as described in section 71-919 until he or
she can be returned to such treatment facility or program.
Sec. 115. Section 71-941, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-941 (1) A person arrested upon a warrant pursuant to section 71-940
shall not be delivered to a demanding state until he or she is notified of the
demand for his or her surrender and has had an opportunity to apply for a writ
-47-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
of habeas corpus. If an application is filed, notice of the time and place for
hearing on the writ shall be given to the county attorney of the county where
the arrest was made. The person arrested shall have the right to counsel and
the right to have counsel appointed for him or her if the person is indigent.
Pending the determination of the court upon the application for the writ, the
person detained shall be maintained in a suitable facility or jail as described
in section 71-919 or a hospital for persons with mental illness.
(2) At a hearing on a writ of habeas corpus, the State of Nebraska shall
show that there is probable cause to believe that (a) such person is absent
without authorization from a treatment facility or program for persons with
mental illness or substance dependence to which he or she was committed located
in the demanding state, (b) the demanding state has reason to believe that such
person is currently dangerous to himself, herself, or others, and (c) the
demanding state is willing to accept the person back for further treatment.
Sec. 116. Section 71-951, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-951 All mental health board hearings under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act shall be closed to the public except at the request of the
subject and shall be held in a courtroom or at any convenient and suitable
place designated by the mental health board. The board shall have the right to
conduct the proceeding where the subject is currently residing if the subject
is unable to travel. Upon the agreement of all parties, any hearing before the
mental health board may be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 117. Section 71-952, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-952 A subject shall appear personally or by videoconferencing and be
afforded the opportunity to testify in his or her own behalf and to present
witnesses and tangible evidence in defending against the petition at the
hearing.
Sec. 118. Section 71-954, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-954 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a A
subject shall have the right at a hearing held under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act to confront and cross-examine
adverse witnesses and evidence equivalent to the rights of confrontation
granted by Amendments VI and XIV of the United States Constitution and Article
I, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(2) This section does not prohibit a mental health board from conducting a
hearing using videoconferencing.
Sec. 119. Section 71-958, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-958 Any qualified mental health professional, upon being authorized by
the administrator of the treatment facility or jail having custody of the
subject, may provide appropriate medical treatment for the subject while in
custody, except that a subject shall not be subjected to such quantities of
medication or other treatment within such period of time prior to any hearing
held under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender
Commitment Act or, for a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and
committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964, a hearing held under the
equivalent tribal law, as will substantially impair his or her ability to
assist in his or her defense at such hearing.
Sec. 120. Section 71-961, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-961 (1) All records kept on any subject shall remain confidential
except as otherwise provided by law. Such records shall be accessible to (a)
the subject, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
(b) the subject's legal counsel, (c) the subject's guardian or conservator, if
any, (d) the mental health board having jurisdiction over the subject, (e)
persons authorized by an order of a judge or court, (f) persons authorized by
written permission of the subject, (g) agents or employees of the Department of
Health and Human Services upon delivery of a subpoena from the department in
connection with a licensing or licensure investigation by the department, (h)
individuals authorized to receive notice of the release of a sex offender
pursuant to section 83-174, (i) the Nebraska State Patrol or the department
pursuant to section 69-2409.01, (j) the Department of Correctional Services
Division of Parole Supervision if the subject meets the requirements for
lifetime community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03, and (k) any
tribal court having jurisdiction over a subject who is domiciled in Indian
country and committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964.
(2) Upon application by the county attorney or by the administrator of the
treatment facility where the subject is in custody and upon a showing of good
cause therefor, a judge of the district court of the county where the mental
health board proceedings were held or of the county where the treatment
facility is located may order that the records not be made available to the
subject if, in the judgment of the court, the availability of such records to
the subject will adversely affect his or her mental illness or personality
disorder and the treatment thereof.
(3) When a subject is absent without authorization from a treatment
facility or program described in section 71-939 or 71-1223 and is considered to
be dangerous to others, the subject's name and description and a statement that
the subject is believed to be considered dangerous to others may be disclosed
in order to aid in the subject's apprehension and to warn the public of such
danger.
-48-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Sec. 121. Section 71-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1203 For purposes of the Sex Offender Commitment Act:
(1) The definitions found in sections 71-904.02, 71-905, 71-906, 71-907,
71-910, 71-911, 71-914.01, 71-914.02, and 83-174.01 and sections 106 and 107 of
this act apply;
(2) Administrator means the administrator or other chief administrative
officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail, or Department of
Correctional Services facility or his or her designee;
(3) Outpatient treatment means treatment ordered by a mental health board
directing a subject to comply with specified outpatient treatment requirements,
including, but not limited to, (a) taking prescribed medication, (b) reporting
to a mental health professional or treatment facility for treatment or for
monitoring of the subject's condition, or (c) participating in individual or
group therapy or educational, rehabilitation, residential, or vocational
programs;
(4)(a) Subject means any person concerning whom (i) a certificate has been
filed under section 71-1204, (ii) a certificate has been filed under section
71-919 and such person is held pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of section
71-919, or (iii) a petition has been filed under the Sex Offender Commitment
Act.
(b) Subject also includes a person who is a member of a tribe or eligible
for membership in a tribe, who is domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska,
and concerning whom sex offender involuntary commitment or emergency protective
custody proceedings have been initiated under tribal law.
(c) Subject does not include any person under eighteen years of age unless
such person is an emancipated minor; and
(5) Treatment facility means a facility which provides services for
persons who are dangerous sex offenders.
Sec. 122. Section 71-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1204 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a mental
health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for emergency
protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such person is a
dangerous sex offender shall execute a written certificate as provided in
subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four hours after the
completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately
forwarded to the county attorney.
(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the following
information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel, guardian
or conservator, and next of kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other care or
treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge of the
subject's mental illness or personality disorder who may be called as a witness
at a mental health board hearing with respect to the subject, if known;
(e) The name and address of the medical facility or jail in which the
subject is being held for emergency protective custody and evaluation;
(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health
professional;
(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he or
she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for emergency
protective custody and evaluation; and
(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that, in his
or her clinical opinion, the subject is a dangerous sex offender and the
clinical basis for such opinion.
(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is taken
into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer under tribal
law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of such person,
determines that such person is a dangerous sex offender shall execute
appropriate written documentation in a format provided by the tribe not later
than twenty-four hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such
certificate shall be immediately forwarded to the person designated by the
tribe.
Sec. 123. Section 71-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1206 (1) Mental health board proceedings shall be deemed to have
commenced upon the earlier of (a) the filing of a petition under section
71-1205 or (b) notification by the county attorney to the law enforcement
officer who took the subject into emergency protective custody under section
71-919 or the administrator of the treatment facility or jail having charge of
the subject of the intention of the county attorney to file such petition. The
county attorney shall file such petition as soon as reasonably practicable
after such notification.
(2) A petition filed by the county attorney under section 71-1205 may
contain a request for the emergency protective custody and evaluation of the
subject prior to commencement of a mental health board hearing pursuant to such
petition with respect to the subject. Upon receipt of such request and upon a
finding of probable cause to believe that the subject is a dangerous sex
offender as alleged in the petition, the court or chairperson of the mental
health board may issue a warrant directing the sheriff to take custody of the
-49-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
subject. If the subject is already in emergency protective custody under a
certificate filed under section 71-919, a copy of such certificate shall be
filed with the petition. The subject in such custody, including pursuant to
tribal law as provided in section 71-1226.01, shall be held in an appropriate
and available medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services
facility. A dangerous sex offender shall not be admitted to a medical facility
for emergency protective custody unless a medical or psychiatric emergency
exists requiring treatment not available at a jail or correctional facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section, each
county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside
the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective
custody of persons from such county in such facilities.
(b) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for whom
emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the tribe shall
make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or outside the tribe for
such purpose and shall make arrangements for the payment of the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such tribe in such facilities.
(4) The petition and all subsequent pleadings and filings in the case
shall be entitled In the Interest of . . . . . , Alleged to be a Dangerous Sex
Offender. The county attorney may dismiss the petition at any time prior to the
commencement of the hearing of the mental health board under section 71-1208,
and upon such motion by the county attorney, the mental health board shall
dismiss the petition.
Sec. 124. Section 71-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1208 (1) A hearing shall be held by the mental health board to
determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject is a
dangerous sex offender as alleged in the petition.
(2) At the commencement of the hearing, the board shall inquire whether
the subject has received a copy of the petition and list of rights accorded him
or her by sections 71-943 to 71-960 and whether he or she has read and
understood them. The board shall explain to the subject any part of the
petition or list of rights which he or she has not read or understood. The
board shall inquire of the subject whether he or she admits or denies the
allegations of the petition. If the subject admits the allegations, the board
shall proceed to enter a treatment order pursuant to section 71-1209. If the
subject denies the allegations of the petition, the board shall proceed with a
hearing on the merits of the petition.
(3) Upon the agreement of all parties, a hearing before the mental health
board under this section may be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 125. Section 71-1223, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1223 (1)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment
facility or program for dangerous sex offenders pursuant to an order of a court
or mental health board is absent without authorization from such treatment
facility or program, the administrator or program director of such treatment
facility or program shall immediately notify the Nebraska State Patrol and the
court or clerk of the mental health board of the judicial district from which
such person was committed.
(b) The clerk shall issue the warrant of the board directed to the sheriff
of the county for the arrest and detention of such person. Such warrant may be
executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(2)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment facility or
program for persons with mental illness pursuant to an order of a tribal court
as provided in section 71-1226.01 is absent without authorization from such
treatment facility or program, the administrator or program director of such
treatment facility or program shall immediately notify the Nebraska State
Patrol and the appropriate tribal prosecutor or official.
(b) The appropriate tribal official may issue a warrant directed to a
peace officer or sheriff of any county for the arrest and detention of such
person. Such warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(3) The notification required by subdivision (1)(a) or (2)(a) of this
section shall include the person's name and description and a determination by
a psychiatrist, clinical director, administrator, or program director as to
whether the person is believed to be currently dangerous to others.
(4) Pending the issuance of such warrant, any peace officer may seize and
detain such person when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that
the person is reported to be absent without authorization as described in this
section. Such person shall be returned to the treatment facility or program or
shall be taken to a facility or jail as described in section 71-919 until he or
she can be returned to such treatment facility or program.
Sec. 126. Section 71-3426, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-3426 (1) A lead organization may establish a local team for the lead
organization's jurisdiction or for a group of cities, counties, or districts,
pursuant to an agreement between multiple lead organizations. If multiple lead
organizations decide to form a local team, only one shall fulfill the role of
lead organization. The lead organization shall select the members of the local
team.
(2) A local team shall consist of the core members that may include one or
more members from the following backgrounds:
(a) Officials from the lead organization or from another local public
health department or such officials' designees;
-50-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(b) Behavioral health providers or officials;
(c) Law enforcement personnel;
(d) Representatives of jails or detention centers;
(e) The coroner or the coroner's designee;
(f) Health care providers who specialize in the prevention, diagnosis, and
treatment of substance use disorders;
(g) Mental health providers who specialize in substance use disorders;
(h) Representatives of emergency medical services providers in the county;
(i) The Director of Children and Family Services of the Division of
Children and Family Services of the Department of Health and Human Services or
the director's designee; and
(j) Representatives from the Board of Parole, the Office of Probation
Administration, the Department of Correctional Services Division of Parole
Supervision, or the Community Corrections Division of the Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.
(3) A local team may also include, either as permanent or temporary
members:
(a) A local school superintendent or the superintendent's designee;
(b) A representative of a local hospital;
(c) A health care provider who specializes in emergency medicine;
(d) A health care provider who specializes in pain management;
(e) A pharmacist with a background in prescription drug misuse and
diversion;
(f) A substance use disorder treatment provider from a licensed substance
use disorder treatment program;
(g) A poison control center representative;
(h) A mental health provider who is a generalist;
(i) A prescription drug monitoring program administrator or such
administrator's designee;
(j) A representative from a harm reduction provider;
(k) A recovery coach, peer support worker, or other representative of the
recovery community;
(l) A representative from the local drug court; and
(m) Any other individual necessary for the work of the local team.
(4) The lead organization shall select a chairperson for the local team.
The chairperson shall be an official of the lead organization or such
official's designee. The chairperson shall:
(a) Solicit and recruit members and appoint replacement members to fill
vacancies that may arise on the team. In carrying out this responsibility, the
chairperson shall, at a minimum, attempt to appoint at least one member from
each of the backgrounds or positions described in subsection (2) of this
section;
(b) Facilitate local team meetings and implement the protocols and
procedures of the local team;
(c) Request and collect the records and information needed for the local
team's case review. The chairperson shall remove all personal identifying
information from any records or information prior to providing it to the local
team;
(d) Gather, store, and distribute the necessary records and information
for reviews conducted by the team. The chairperson shall carry out such duties
in compliance with all local, state, and federal confidentiality laws and
regulations;
(e) Ensure that team members receive timely notification of upcoming
meetings;
(f) Ensure the team fulfills the requirements of section 71-3427 to
publish an annual report, including recommendations to prevent future drug
overdose deaths;
(g) Ensure that all members of the local team and all guest observers and
participants sign confidentiality forms as required under section 71-3433;
(h) Oversee compliance with the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act and the
protocols developed by the team;
(i) Serve as a liaison for the local team; and
(j) Perform such other duties as the team deems appropriate.
(5) Members of the local team shall not receive compensation for their
services as team members.
Sec. 127. Section 71-3430, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-3430 (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, on
written request of the lead organization, and as necessary to carry out the
purpose and duties of the local team, the lead organization shall be provided
with the following information:
(a) Nonprivileged information and records regarding the physical health,
mental health, and treatment for any substance use disorder maintained by a
health care provider, substance use disorder treatment provider, hospital, or
health system for an individual whose death is being reviewed by the local
team; and
(b) Information and records maintained by a state or local government
agency or entity, including, but not limited to, death investigative
information, coroner investigative information, law enforcement investigative
information, emergency medical services reports, fire department records,
prosecutorial records, parole and probation information and records, court
records, school records, and information and records of a social services
agency, including the department, if the agency or entity provided services to
-51-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
an individual whose death is being reviewed by the local team.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the following
persons shall comply with a records request by the lead organization made
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) A coroner;
(b) A fire department;
(c) A health system;
(d) A hospital;
(e) A law enforcement agency;
(f) A local or state governmental agency, including, but not limited to,
the department, local public health authorities, the Attorney General, county
attorneys, public defenders, the Commission on Public Advocacy, the Department
of Correctional Services, and the Office of Probation Administration , and the
Division of Parole Supervision;
(g) A mental health provider;
(h) A health care provider;
(i) A substance use disorder treatment provider;
(j) A school, including a public or private elementary, secondary, or
postsecondary institution;
(k) An emergency medical services provider;
(l) A social services provider; and
(m) Any other person who is in possession of records pertinent to the
local team's investigation of an overdose fatality.
(3) A person subject to a records request by a lead organization under
subsection (1) of this section may charge the lead organization a reasonable
fee for the service of duplicating any records requested by the lead
organization, not to exceed the actual cost of duplication.
(4)(a) Compliance with any records request under this section is subject
to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996,
Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder; 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2;
42 C.F.R. part 2; and the Child Protection and Family Safety Act.
(b) The department is not required to comply with a records request under
subsection (2) of this section to the extent the information requested:
(i) Was obtained by the prescription drug monitoring program created under
section 71-2454;
(ii) Is covered by section 68-313; or
(iii) Is covered by 42 C.F.R. 431.300 et seq.
(c) The disclosure or redisclosure of a medical record developed in
connection with the provision of substance abuse treatment services, without
the authorization of a person in interest, is subject to any limitations that
exist under the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
1996, Public Law 104-191, and regulations promulgated thereunder; 42 U.S.C.
290dd-2; and 42 C.F.R. part 2.
(5) Information requested by the lead organization shall be provided
within thirty calendar days after receipt of the written request, unless an
extension is granted by the chairperson. Written request includes a request
submitted via email or facsimile transmission.
(6)(a) A county attorney or the Attorney General may, upon request by a
lead organization, issue subpoenas to compel production of any of the records
and information specified in this section.
(b) Any willful failure to comply with such a subpoena may be certified by
the county attorney or Attorney General to the district court for enforcement
or punishment for contempt of court.
Sec. 128. Section 75-325, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
75-325 (1) Every transportation network company shall:
(a) Provide the commission with its email address and customer service
telephone number;
(b) Display for the passenger either a picture of the driver's personal
vehicle and a picture of the driver or the license plate number of the driver's
personal vehicle on the online-enabled application or platform that a
transportation network company uses to connect drivers and passengers;
(c) Maintain an agent for service of process in Nebraska;
(d) Maintain accurate and up-to-date records of all drivers providing
services on behalf of the transportation network company, including the vehicle
identification number for all personal vehicles to be operated in connection
with the transportation network company;
(e)(i) Implement, enforce, and maintain a zero-tolerance policy on the use
of drugs or alcohol applicable to any driver providing service for the
transportation network company that prohibits a driver from using any amount of
drugs or alcohol while the driver is providing service, (ii) provide a copy of
the policy to the commission promptly upon adoption, and (iii) provide a copy
of any revision to the policy promptly upon adoption;
(f) Implement an anti-discrimination policy that prohibits discrimination
by any driver providing service for the company on the basis of race, national
origin, religion, gender, physical or mental disability, medical condition,
marital status, or age, or military or veteran status and file the policy with
the commission;
(g) Maintain a website that provides a customer service telephone number
or email address of the transportation network company and that provides the
telephone number and email address of the commission;
(h) Establish a driver training program designed to ensure that each
driver safely operates his or her personal vehicle prior to the driver being
-52-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
able to offer services on the transportation network company's online-enabled
application or platform;
(i) Maintain records required under sections 75-301 to 75-343 to be
collected by the transportation network company, including records regarding
participating drivers; and
(j) Cooperate with the commission and any employees, investigators, or
duly authorized agents of the commission in the investigation of complaints
received by the commission from the public or in investigations initiated by
the commission.
(2) A transportation network company shall not allow a driver to provide
service if the company finds the driver to be in violation of its zero-
tolerance policy required pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) of this section or if
the driver has not successfully completed driver training pursuant to
subdivision (1)(h) of this section. The transportation network company shall
provide on its website and its online-enabled application or platform notice of
the zero-tolerance policy and the procedures to report a complaint about a
driver with whom the passenger was matched when the passenger reasonably
suspects the driver was under the influence of drugs or alcohol during the
course of the prearranged ride. Upon receiving a complaint, a transportation
network company shall immediately suspend the driver against whom the complaint
was issued and conduct an investigation of the alleged violation. The
suspension shall last for the duration of the investigation.
(3) If the commission has reasonable cause to believe a transportation
network company is not enforcing the zero-tolerance policy filed with the
commission, the commission shall investigate and, after notice and hearing, may
enter an order requiring the transportation network company to enforce such
policy, which may include suspension of the participating driver.
Sec. 129. Section 76-1495, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1495 A landlord may not:
(1) Deny rental on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national
origin, or military or veteran status;
(2) Require any person, as a precondition to renting, leasing, or
otherwise occupying or removing from a mobile home space in a mobile home park,
to pay an entrance or exit fee of any kind unless for services actually
rendered or pursuant to a written agreement. A landlord may restrict the
movement of mobile homes to reasonable hours and may require that all work in
connection with the removal or installation of a mobile home, including, but
not limited to, the hookup or disconnection of utilities, be done in a good and
workmanlike manner;
(3) Deny any resident of a mobile home park the right to sell that
person's mobile home at a price of his or her own choosing. The tenant shall,
prior to selling the mobile home, give notice to the landlord, including, but
not limited to, the name of the prospective purchaser. Unless otherwise agreed
in writing, the landlord may reserve the right to approve or disapprove the
prospective purchaser of the mobile home as a tenant within ten days after
receiving notice of the intended sale. Any disapproval shall be in writing and
shall be delivered to such tenant pursuant to section 76-1474. The landlord
shall not unreasonably refuse or restrict the sale by a tenant of a mobile home
located in his or her mobile home park, but the landlord may consider the size,
ages, and composition of the prospective purchaser's family in determining if
the mobile home purchaser may leave the home in the park. The landlord may
also, in order to upgrade the quality of the mobile home park, prescribe
reasonable requirements governing the age, physical appearance, size, or
quality of the mobile home. In the event of a sale to a third party or mutual
termination of the rental agreement, the landlord may within ten days after
receiving written notice of the pending sale or mutual termination require that
any mobile home that is no longer appropriate for the mobile home park or that
is in disrepair be repaired to the landlord's satisfaction or removed from the
park within sixty days. The landlord shall specify in writing the reasons for
disapproval of the mobile home;
(4) Exact a commission or fee with respect to the price realized by the
tenant selling the mobile home, unless the park owner or operator has acted as
agent for the mobile home owner pursuant to a written agreement; or
(5) Require a tenant to furnish permanent improvements which cannot be
removed by the tenant without damage to the mobile home or mobile home space at
the expiration of the rental agreement.
Sec. 130. Section 81-885.24, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-885.24 The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall, upon the
sworn complaint in writing of any person, investigate the actions of any
broker, associate broker, salesperson, or subdivider, may censure the licensee
or certificate holder, revoke or suspend any license or certificate issued
under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act, or enter into consent orders, and,
alone or in combination with such disciplinary actions, may impose a civil fine
on a licensee pursuant to section 81-885.10, whenever the license or
certificate has been obtained by false or fraudulent representation or the
licensee or certificate holder has been found guilty of any of the following
unfair trade practices:
(1) Refusing because of religion, race, color, national origin, ethnic
group, sex, familial status, or disability, or military or veteran status to
show, sell, or rent any real estate for sale or rent to prospective purchasers
or renters;
-53-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(2) Intentionally using advertising which is misleading or inaccurate in
any material particular or in any way misrepresents any property, terms,
values, policies, or services of the business conducted;
(3) Failing to account for and remit any money coming into his or her
possession belonging to others;
(4) Commingling the money or other property of his or her principals with
his or her own;
(5) Failing to maintain and deposit in a separate trust account all money
received by a broker acting in such capacity, or as escrow agent or the
temporary custodian of the funds of others, in a real estate transaction unless
all parties having an interest in the funds have agreed otherwise in writing;
(6) Accepting, giving, or charging any form of undisclosed compensation,
consideration, rebate, or direct profit on expenditures made for a principal;
(7) Representing or attempting to represent a real estate broker, other
than the employer, without the express knowledge and consent of the employer;
(8) Accepting any form of compensation or consideration by an associate
broker or salesperson from anyone other than his or her employing broker
without the consent of his or her employing broker;
(9) Acting in the dual capacity of agent and undisclosed principal in any
transaction;
(10) Guaranteeing or authorizing any person to guarantee future profits
which may result from the resale of real property;
(11) Placing a sign on any property offering it for sale or rent without
the written consent of the owner or his or her authorized agent;
(12) Offering real estate for sale or lease without the knowledge and
consent of the owner or his or her authorized agent or on terms other than
those authorized by the owner or his or her authorized agent;
(13) Inducing any party to a contract of sale or lease to break such
contract for the purpose of substituting, in lieu thereof, a new contract with
another principal;
(14) Negotiating a sale, exchange, listing, or lease of real estate
directly with an owner or lessor if he or she knows that such owner has a
written outstanding listing contract in connection with such property granting
an exclusive agency or an exclusive right to sell to another broker or
negotiating directly with an owner to withdraw from or break such a listing
contract for the purpose of substituting, in lieu thereof, a new listing
contract;
(15) Discussing or soliciting a discussion of, with an owner of a property
which is exclusively listed with another broker, the terms upon which the
broker would accept a future listing upon the expiration of the present listing
unless the owner initiates the discussion;
(16) Violating any provision of sections 76-2401 to 76-2430;
(17) Soliciting, selling, or offering for sale real estate by offering
free lots or conducting lotteries for the purpose of influencing a purchaser or
prospective purchaser of real estate;
(18) Providing any form of compensation or consideration to any person for
performing the services of a broker, associate broker, or salesperson who has
not first secured his or her license under the Nebraska Real Estate License Act
unless such person is (a) a nonresident who is licensed in his or her resident
regulatory jurisdiction or (b) a citizen and resident of a foreign country
which does not license persons conducting the activities of a broker and such
person provides reasonable written evidence to the Nebraska broker that he or
she is a resident citizen of that foreign country, is not a resident of this
country, and conducts the activities of a broker in that foreign country;
(19) Failing to include a fixed date of expiration in any written listing
agreement and failing to leave a copy of the agreement with the principal;
(20) Failing to deliver within a reasonable time a completed and dated
copy of any purchase agreement or offer to buy or sell real estate to the
purchaser and to the seller;
(21) Failing by a broker to deliver to the seller in every real estate
transaction, at the time the transaction is consummated, a complete, detailed
closing statement showing all of the receipts and disbursements handled by such
broker for the seller, failing to deliver to the buyer a complete statement
showing all money received in the transaction from such buyer and how and for
what the same was disbursed, and failing to retain true copies of such
statements in his or her files;
(22) Making any substantial misrepresentations;
(23) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge
of all parties for whom he or she acts;
(24) Failing by an associate broker or salesperson to place, as soon after
receipt as practicable, in the custody of his or her employing broker any
deposit money or other money or funds entrusted to him or her by any person
dealing with him or her as the representative of his or her licensed broker;
(25) Filing a listing contract or any document or instrument purporting to
create a lien based on a listing contract for the purpose of casting a cloud
upon the title to real estate when no valid claim under the listing contract
exists;
(26) Violating any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the
commission in the interest of the public and consistent with the Nebraska Real
Estate License Act;
(27) Failing by a subdivider, after the original certificate has been
issued, to comply with all of the requirements of the Nebraska Real Estate
License Act;
-54-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(28) Conviction of a felony or entering a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere to a felony charge by a broker or salesperson;
(29) Demonstrating negligence, incompetency, or unworthiness to act as a
broker, associate broker, or salesperson, whether of the same or of a different
character as otherwise specified in this section;
(30) Inducing or attempting to induce a person to transfer an interest in
real property, whether or not for monetary gain, or discouraging another person
from purchasing real property, by representing that (a) a change has occurred
or will or may occur in the composition with respect to religion, race, color,
national origin, ethnic group, sex, familial status, or disability of the
owners or occupants in the block, neighborhood, or area or (b) such change will
or may result in the lowering of property values, an increase in criminal or
antisocial behavior, or a decline in the quality of schools in the block,
neighborhood, or area;
(31) Failing by a team leader to provide a current list of all team
members to his or her designated broker;
(32) Failing by a designated broker to maintain a record of all team
leaders and team members working under him or her;
(33) Utilizing advertising which does not prominently display the name
under which the designated broker does business as filed with the commission;
(34) Utilizing team advertising or a team name suggesting the team is an
independent real estate brokerage;
(35) Charging or collecting, as part or all of his or her compensation or
consideration, any part of the earnest money or other money paid to him or her
or the entity under which he or she does business in connection with any real
estate transaction until the transaction has been consummated or terminated.
However, a payment for goods or services rendered by a third party on behalf of
the client shall not be considered compensation or consideration if such
payment does not include any profit, compensation, or payment for services
rendered by the broker and the broker retains a record of the payment to the
third party for such goods or services;
(36) Failing to provide a copy of section 81-885.04 or written
instructions explaining the provisions of the exemption from licensure as set
forth in subdivision (9) of section 81-885.04 to any unlicensed person who
assists in procuring a potential client or customer as defined in sections
76-2407 and 76-2409, respectively, for the purpose of the listing, sale,
purchase, exchange, renting, leasing, or optioning of any real estate; or
(37) Offering or entering into a right-to-list home sale agreement.
Sec. 131. Section 81-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1401 For purposes of sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1) Class I railroad means a rail carrier classified as Class I pursuant
to 49 C.F.R. part 1201 1-1;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(3) Council means the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council;
(4) Director means the director of the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center;
(5) Felony means a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term of more
than one year or a crime committed outside of Nebraska which would be
punishable by imprisonment for a term of more than one year if committed in
Nebraska;
(6) Handgun means any firearm with a barrel less than sixteen inches in
length or any firearm designed to be held and fired by the use of a single
hand;
(7) Law enforcement agency means the police department or the town marshal
in incorporated municipalities, the office of sheriff in unincorporated areas,
the Nebraska State Patrol, and Class I railroad police departments;
(8)(a) Law enforcement officer means any person who has successfully
completed an entry-level law enforcement certification from a training academy
and who is responsible for the prevention or detection of crime or the
enforcement of the penal, traffic, or highway laws of the state or any
political subdivision of the state for more than one hundred hours per year and
is authorized by law to make arrests and includes, but is not limited to:
(i) A full-time or part-time member of the Nebraska State Patrol;
(ii) A county sheriff;
(iii) A full-time or part-time employee of a county sheriff's office;
(iv) A full-time or part-time employee of a municipal or village police
agency;
(v) A full-time or part-time Game and Parks Commission conservation
officer;
(vi) A full-time or part-time deputy state sheriff;
(vii) A full-time employee of an organized and paid fire department of any
city of the metropolitan class who is an authorized arson investigator and
whose duties consist of determining the cause, origin, and circumstances of
fires or explosions while on duty in the course of an investigation;
(viii) A member of a law enforcement reserve force appointed in accordance
with section 81-1438; or
(ix) A full-time Class I railroad police officer;
(b) Law enforcement officer includes a noncertified conditional officer;
(c) Law enforcement officer does not include employees of the Department
of Correctional Services, probation officers under the Nebraska Probation
-55-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
System, parole officers appointed by the Director of Correctional Supervision
and Services of the Division of Parole Supervision, or employees of the
Department of Revenue under section 77-366; and
(d) Except for a noncertified conditional officer, a law enforcement
officer shall possess a valid law enforcement officer certificate or diploma,
as established by the council, in order to be vested with the authority of this
section;
(9) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as in
section 28-1206;
(10) Noncertified conditional officer means a person appointed pursuant to
subsection (6) of section 81-1414;
(11) Serious misconduct means improper or illegal actions taken by a law
enforcement officer that have a rational connection with the person's fitness
or capacity to serve as a law enforcement officer and includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor crime of domestic violence;
(b) Fabrication of evidence;
(c) Repeated substantiated allegations of the use of excessive force;
(d) Acceptance of a bribe;
(e) Commission of fraud or perjury; or
(f) Sexual assault;
(12) Training academy means:
(a) The training center; or
(b) Another council-approved law enforcement training facility which:
(i) Offers certification training that meets or exceeds the certification
training curriculum of the training center; and
(ii) Is operated and maintained by a law enforcement agency or by multiple
law enforcement agencies pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act;
(13) Training center means the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training Center;
and
(14) Training school means a public or private institution of higher
education, including the University of Nebraska, the Nebraska state colleges,
and the community colleges of this state, that offers training in a council-
approved pre-certification course.
Sec. 132. Section 83-170, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-170 As used in the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Board means the Board of Parole;
(2) Committed offender means any person who, under any provision of law,
is sentenced or committed to a facility operated by the department or is
sentenced or committed to the department other than a person adjudged to be as
described in subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or (4) of section 43-247 by a
juvenile court;
(3) Department means the Department of Correctional Services;
(4) Director means the Director of Correctional Services;
(5) Director of Supervision and Services means the Director of Supervision
and Services appointed pursuant to section 83-1,101;
(5) (6) Facility means any prison, reformatory, training school, reception
center, community guidance center, group home, or other institution operated by
the department;
(6) (7) Good time means any reduction of sentence granted pursuant to
sections 83-1,107 and 83-1,108;
(7) (8) Maximum term means the maximum sentence provided by law or the
maximum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is shorter;
(8) (9) Minimum term means the minimum sentence provided by law or the
minimum sentence imposed by a court, whichever is longer;
(9) (10) Pardon authority means the power to remit fines and forfeitures
and to grant respites, reprieves, pardons, or commutations;
(10) (11) Parole term means the time from release on parole to the
completion of the maximum term, reduced by good time;
(11) (12) Person committed to the department means any person sentenced or
committed to a facility within the department;
(12) (13) Restrictive housing means conditions of confinement that provide
limited contact with other offenders, strictly controlled movement while out of
cell, and out-of-cell time of less than twenty-four hours per week; and
(13) (14) Solitary confinement means the status of confinement of an
inmate in an individual cell having solid, soundproof doors and which deprives
the inmate of all visual and auditory contact with other persons.
Sec. 133. Section 83-171, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-171 There is hereby created a Department of Correctional Services which
shall:
(1) Maintain and administer facilities required for the custody, control,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the
department and for the safekeeping of such other persons as may be remanded to
the department in accordance with law;
(2) Develop policies and programs for the correctional treatment and
rehabilitation of persons committed to the department;
(3) Supervise parolees who have been committed to the department; and
(4) Administer parole services in the facilities and in the community;
and .
(5) Maintain all records and files associated with the Board of Parole,
-56-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
including relating to individuals subject to lifetime community supervision
under section 83-174.03. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the
department from maintaining daily records and files associated with the Board
of Pardons.
Sec. 134. Section 83-171.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-171.01 The department and the Division of Parole Supervision shall
establish performance metrics for corrections and parole staff. Such metrics
shall measure staff efficacy in providing rehabilitative and reentry services
to committed offenders and parolees. Such metrics shall:
(1) Reflect a balanced approach that considers both compliance and
enforcement measures as well as outcomes related to rehabilitation,
reintegration, and public safety;
(2) Include indicators of progress for committed offenders and parolees,
such as successful completion of treatment programs, educational attainment,
employment status, and compliance with conditions of supervision;
(3) Emphasize the importance of providing supportive services, fostering
positive relationships with committed offenders and parolees, and promoting
successful community reentry; and
(4) Be aligned with best practices, stakeholder input, and the evolving
goals and priorities of the criminal justice system.
Sec. 135. Section 83-173, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-173 The Director of Correctional Services shall:
(1) Supervise and be responsible for the administration of the Department
of Correctional Services;
(2) Establish, consolidate, or abolish any administrative subdivision
within the department and appoint and remove for cause the heads thereof and
delegate appropriate powers and duties to them;
(3) Establish and administer policies and programs for the operation of
the facilities in the department and for the custody, control, safety,
correction, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the department;
(4) Appoint and remove the chief executive officer of each facility and
delegate appropriate powers and duties to him or her;
(5) Appoint and remove employees of the department and delegate
appropriate powers and duties to them;
(6) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the management,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of persons committed to the
department, the administration of facilities, and the conduct of officers and
employees under his or her jurisdiction;
(7) Designate the place of confinement of persons committed to the
department subject to section 83-176;
(8) Establish and administer policies that ensure that complete and up-to-
date electronic records are maintained for each person committed to the
department and which also ensure privacy protections. Electronic records shall
include programming recommendations, program completions, time spent in housing
other than general population, and medical records, including mental and
behavioral health records;
(9) Collect, develop, and maintain statistical information concerning
persons committed to the department, sentencing practices, and correctional
treatment as may be useful in penological research or in the development of
treatment programs;
(10) Provide training programs designed to equip employees for duty in the
facilities and related services of the department and to raise and maintain the
educational standards, level of performance, and safety of such employees;
(11) Notify law enforcement agencies of upcoming furloughs as required by
section 83-173.01;
(12) Issue or authorize the issuance of a warrant for the arrest of any
person committed to the department who has escaped from the custody of the
department; and
(13) Supervise and be responsible for administration of parole services in
the community, including administration of the Community Work Release and
Reentry Centers Act;
(14) Establish and maintain policies, standards, and procedures for the
field parole service and the community supervision of sex offenders pursuant to
section 83-174.03;
(15) Divide the state into parole districts and appoint district parole
officers and such other employees as may be required to carry out adequate
parole supervision of all parolees, prescribe their powers and duties, and
obtain division offices for staff in each district as may be necessary;
(16) Cooperate with the Board of Parole, the courts, the Community
Corrections Division of the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice, and all other agencies, public and private, which are concerned with
the treatment or welfare of persons on parole;
(17) Provide the Board of Parole and district judges with any record of a
parolee that the board or such judges may require;
(18) Make recommendations to the Board of Parole or district judge in
cases of violation of the conditions of parole, issue warrants for the arrest
of parole violators when so instructed by the board or district judge, and upon
instruction of the board, issue certificates of parole and of parole revocation
to the facilities and certificates of discharge from parole to parolees;
(19) Organize and conduct training programs for the district parole
officers and other employees;
-57-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(20) Use the funds provided under section 83-1,107.02 to augment
operational or personnel costs associated with the development, implementation,
and evaluation of enhanced parole-based programs and purchase services to
provide such programs aimed at enhancing adult parolee supervision in the
community and treatment needs of parolees. Such enhanced parole-based programs
include, but are not limited to, specialized units of supervision, related
equipment purchases and training, and programs that address a parolee's
vocational, educational, mental health, behavioral, or substance abuse
treatment needs, including evidence-based peer and family support programs;
(21) Ensure that any risk or needs assessment instrument utilized by the
department be periodically validated;
(22) Each January 1, report to the Governor and electronically to the
Clerk of the Legislature the number of parole revocations and the number of
technical violations of parole;
(23) Take all actions necessary to assist the board in carrying out its
duties under section 83-962 during a correctional system overcrowding
emergency;
(24) Administer the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision; and
(25) (13) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper
in carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 136. Section 83-174.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.03 (1) Any individual who, on or after July 14, 2006, (a) is
convicted of or completes a term of incarceration for a registrable offense
under section 29-4003 and has a previous conviction for a registrable offense
under such section, (b) is convicted of sexual assault of a child in the first
degree pursuant to section 28-319.01, or (c) is convicted of or completes a
term of incarceration for an aggravated offense as defined in section
29-4001.01, shall, upon completion of his or her term of incarceration or
release from civil commitment, be supervised in the community by the department
Division of Parole Supervision for the remainder of his or her life.
(2) Notice shall be provided to the department division by an agency or
political subdivision which has custody of an individual required to be
supervised in the community pursuant to subsection (1) of this section at least
sixty days prior to the release of such individual from custody.
(3) Individuals required to be supervised in the community pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section shall undergo a risk assessment and evaluation
by the department division to determine the conditions of community supervision
to be imposed to best protect the public from the risk that the individual will
reoffend.
(4) Conditions of community supervision imposed on an individual by the
department division may include the following:
(a) Drug and alcohol testing if the conviction resulting in the imposition
of community supervision involved the use of drugs or alcohol;
(b) Restrictions on employment and leisure activities necessary to
minimize interaction with potential victims;
(c) Requirements to report regularly to the individual's community
supervision officer;
(d) Requirements to reside at a specified location and notify the
individual's community supervision officer of any change in address or
employment;
(e) A requirement to allow the department division access to medical
records from the individual's current and former providers of treatment;
(f) A requirement that the individual submit himself or herself to
available medical, psychological, psychiatric, or other treatment, including,
but not limited to, polygraph examinations; or
(g) Any other conditions designed to minimize the risk of recidivism,
including, but not limited to, the use of electronic monitoring, which are not
unduly restrictive.
Sec. 137. Section 83-174.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.04 An individual who violates one or more of the conditions of
community supervision established for him or her pursuant to section 83-174.03
shall undergo a review by the department Division of Parole Supervision to
evaluate the risk posed to the public by the violation in question. The
department division may take any of the following actions in response to a
violation of conditions of community supervision:
(1) Revise or impose additional conditions of community supervision in
order to minimize the risk to the public from the continued presence of the
individual in the community;
(2) Forward to the Attorney General or the county attorney in the county
where the individual resides a request to initiate a criminal prosecution for
failure to comply with the terms of community supervision; or
(3) Forward to the county attorney or Attorney General a recommendation
that civil commitment proceedings be instituted with respect to the individual.
Sec. 138. Section 83-174.05, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-174.05 Failure to comply with the conditions of community supervision
imposed by the department Division of Parole Supervision is a Class IV felony
for the first offense and a Class III felony for any subsequent offense.
Sec. 139. Section 83-192, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-192 (1) The Board of Parole shall:
-58-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(a) Determine the time of release on parole of committed offenders
eligible for such release;
(b) Fix the conditions of parole, revoke parole, issue or authorize the
issuance of warrants for the arrest of parole violators, and impose other
sanctions short of revocation for violation of conditions of parole;
(c) Determine the time of mandatory discharge from parole;
(d) Visit and inspect any facility, state or local, for the detention of
persons charged with or convicted of an offense and for the safekeeping of such
other persons as may be remanded to such facility in accordance with law;
(e) Implement Within two years after July 1, 2006, implement the
utilization of a validated risk and needs assessment in coordination with the
Department of Correctional Services and the Division of Parole Supervision. The
assessment shall be prepared and completed by the department or the division
for use by the board in determining release on parole;
(f) Review the record of every parole-eligible committed offender annually
when he or she is within three years of his or her earliest parole eligibility
date.
The review schedule shall be based on court-imposed sentences or statutory
minimum sentences, whichever are greater. The board is not required to review
the record of a committed offender when the committed offender's parole
eligibility date is within one month of his or her mandatory discharge date.
Nothing in such schedule shall prohibit the board from reviewing a committed
offender's case at any time;
(g) Appoint and remove all employees of the board as prescribed by the
State Personnel System and delegate appropriate powers and duties to them;
(h) Carry out its duties under section 83-962 during a correctional system
overcrowding emergency;
(i) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations; and
(j) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in
carrying out its responsibilities under the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections
Act.
(2) The chairperson of the board shall:
(a) Supervise the administration and operation of the board;
(b) Serve in an advisory capacity to the director in administering parole
services within any facility;
(c) Interpret the parole program to the public with a view toward
developing a broad base of public support;
(d) Conduct research for the purpose of evaluating and improving the
effectiveness of the parole system;
(e) Recommend parole legislation to the Governor;
(f) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the administration and
operation of the board;
(g) Take all actions necessary to assist the board in carrying out its
duties under section 83-962 during a correctional system overcrowding
emergency; and
(h) Exercise all other powers and perform all other duties necessary and
proper in carrying out his or her responsibilities as chairperson.
(3) This section does not prohibit a committed offender from requesting
that the board review his or her record. The board is not required to review a
committed offender's record more than once a year, except as otherwise required
by statute, including section 83-962.
Sec. 140. Section 83-1,100, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,100 (1) There is hereby created the Division of Parole Supervision
within the department. The employees of the division shall consist of the
Director of Supervision and Services, the field parole service officers, and
all other division staff. The division shall be responsible for the following:
(a) The administration of parole services in the community, including
administration of the Community Work Release and Reentry Centers Act;
(b) The maintenance of all records and files associated with the Board of
Parole;
(c) The daily supervision and training of staff members of the division,
including training regarding evidence-based practices in supervision pursuant
to section 83-1,100.02; and
(d) The assessment, evaluation, and supervision of individuals who are
subject to parole supervision, including lifetime community supervision
pursuant to section 83-174.03.
(2) Parole officers shall be compensated with salaries substantially equal
to other state employees who have similar responsibilities, including employees
of the Office of Probation Administration. This section subsection shall apply
only to field parole service officers and support staff and shall not apply to
the director Director of Supervision and Services or any other management-level
position.
(3) This section does not prohibit the division from maintaining daily
records and files associated with the Board of Pardons.
Sec. 141. Section 83-1,100.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,100.02 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Levels of supervision means the determination of the following for
each person on parole:
(i) Supervision contact requirements, including the frequency, location,
methods, and nature of contact with the parole officer;
(ii) Substance abuse testing requirements and frequency;
-59-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(iii) Contact restrictions;
(iv) Curfew restrictions;
(v) Access to available programs and treatment, with priority given to
moderate-risk and high-risk parolees; and
(vi) Severity of graduated responses to violations of supervision
conditions;
(b) Responsivity factors means characteristics of a parolee that affect
the parolee's ability to respond favorably or unfavorably to any treatment
goals; and
(c) Risk and needs assessment means an actuarial tool that has been
validated in Nebraska to determine the likelihood of the parolee engaging in
future criminal behavior.
(2) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall establish an
evidence-based process that utilizes a risk and needs assessment to measure
criminal risk factors, specific individual needs, and responsivity factors.
(3) The risk and needs assessment shall be performed at the commencement
of the parole term and every six months thereafter by department division staff
trained and certified in the use of the risk and needs assessment.
(4) The validity of the risk and needs assessment shall be tested at least
every five years.
(5) Based on the results of the risk and needs assessment, the department
division shall target parolee criminal risk and need factors by focusing
sanction, program, and treatment resources on moderate-risk and high-risk
parolees.
(6) The department division shall provide training to its parole officers
on (a) use of a risk and needs assessment, (b) risk-based supervision
strategies, (c) relationship skills, (d) cognitive behavioral interventions,
(e) community-based resources, (f) criminal risk factors, (g) targeting
criminal risk factors to reduce recidivism, (h) proper use of a matrix of
administrative sanctions, custodial sanctions, and rewards developed pursuant
to section 83-1,119, and (i) addressing responsivity factors. Each parole
officer shall complete the training requirements set forth in this subsection
within one year after his or her hire date or September 1, 2024, whichever is
later.
(7) The department division shall provide training for chief parole
officers to become trainers so as to ensure long-term and self-sufficient
training capacity in the state.
Sec. 142. Section 83-1,103, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,103 The field parole service, consisting of district parole officers
working under the direction of the director Director of Supervision and
Services or district judge, shall be responsible for the investigation,
supervision, and assistance of parolees, probationers, or individuals subject
to community supervision under section 83-174.03. The field parole service
shall be sufficient in size to assure that no district parole officer carries a
case load larger than is compatible with adequate parole investigation or
supervision.
Sec. 143. Section 83-1,103.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,103.01 A parole officer assigned by the director Director of
Supervision and Services to supervise individuals subject to lifetime community
supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03 shall:
(1) Make investigations, prior to an individual subject to community
supervision being released from incarceration, in cooperation with
institutional caseworkers at prisons, mental health facilities, and county
jails, to determine the community supervision conditions necessary to protect
the public and make reasonable advance preparation for release into the
community;
(2) Assist individuals subject to community supervision to comply with the
conditions of supervision and to make a successful adjustment in the community;
(3) Supervise individuals subject to community supervision by keeping
informed of their conduct and condition;
(4) Make reports as required by the director Director of Supervision and
Services to determine the effectiveness of community supervision in protecting
the public or the progress of an individual subject to community supervision;
(5) Cooperate with social welfare agencies and treatment providers to
ensure that individuals subject to community supervision receive any necessary
services or treatment;
(6) Inform the director Director of Supervision and Services when, in the
opinion of the community supervision officer, an individual is in violation of
the conditions of his or her community supervision, and whenever necessary
exercise the power of arrest as provided in section 83-173 83-1,102;
(7) Conduct periodic reviews of the conditions of community supervision
imposed on an individual as required by the director Director of Supervision
and Services; and
(8) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in
carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 144. Section 83-1,103.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,103.02 (1) Prior to the release from incarceration of an individual
subject to lifetime community supervision pursuant to section 83-174.03, the
department Division of Parole Supervision shall:
(a) Notify the individual in writing that he or she is subject to
-60-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
community supervision upon completion of his or her criminal sentence;
(b) Inform the individual subject to community supervision of the process
by which conditions of community supervision are determined and his or her
right to submit relevant information to the department division for
consideration when establishing the conditions of supervision;
(c) Determine the individual's risk of recidivism if released into the
community, utilizing a validated risk assessment tool;
(d) After considering the information required in subdivision (e) of this
subsection, determine the conditions of supervision which will most effectively
minimize the risk of the individual committing another sex offense. The
conditions shall be the least restrictive conditions available, in terms of the
effect on the individual's personal freedom, which minimize the risk of
recidivism and are compatible with public safety; and
(e) In determining the conditions of supervision to be imposed, the
department division shall consider the following:
(i) A report prepared by the institutional caseworkers relating to the
individual's personality, social history, and adjustment to authority and
including any recommendations which the staff of the facility may make;
(ii) All official reports of the individual's prior criminal record,
including reports and records of earlier probation and parole experiences;
(iii) The presentence investigation report;
(iv) The reports of any physical, mental, and psychiatric examinations of
the individual;
(v) Any relevant information which may be submitted by the individual, his
or her attorney, the victim of the crime, or other persons; and
(vi) Such other relevant information concerning the individual as may be
reasonably available.
(2) Upon completion of the risk assessment and the determination of the
conditions of community supervision and no later than thirty days prior to the
completion of the individual's criminal sentence, the department division shall
issue a certificate of community supervision to the individual containing the
conditions of community supervision he or she will be required to comply with
upon the completion of his or her criminal sentence. The director Director of
Supervision and Services shall include with the certificate written information
on how to appeal the determination of the conditions of community supervision.
Sec. 145. Section 83-1,103.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,103.03 (1) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall review
the conditions of community supervision imposed on an individual pursuant to
section 83-174.03 on an annual basis and shall provide the individual the
opportunity to submit written materials to the department division for
consideration during such review.
(2) If the department division determines, after reviewing the
individual's conduct while under supervision and any other relevant facts, that
one or more of the conditions of community supervision imposed upon the
individual is no longer necessary to reduce the risk of the individual
reoffending or is no longer the least restrictive condition compatible with
public safety, the department division shall revise the conditions of community
supervision so that the individual's freedom is not unnecessarily restricted.
Sec. 146. Section 83-1,103.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,103.04 (1) Whenever a determination or revision of the conditions of
community supervision is made by the department Division of Parole Supervision,
the individual subject to the conditions shall be entitled to an appeal. The
appeal shall be heard by the district court in the county where the individual
resides. The individual shall be informed of his or her right to request
counsel, and if counsel is requested the court shall determine if the
individual is indigent. If the court finds the individual to be indigent, it
shall appoint counsel from the public defender's office to represent the
individual during the appeal.
(2) In an appeal contesting the determination or revision of the
conditions of community supervision, the burden of proof shall be on the
individual subject to community supervision to show by clear and convincing
evidence (a) that the conditions in question will not reduce the risk of the
individual reoffending or otherwise protect the public or (b) that the
condition is overly restrictive of the individual's freedom and a less
restrictive condition is available which is equally or more effective in
reducing the risk of the individual reoffending.
Sec. 147. Section 83-1,104, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,104 A district parole officer shall:
(1) Make investigations, prior to a committed offender's release on
parole, in cooperation with institutional caseworkers and the Board of Parole
to determine the adequacy of parole plans and make reasonable advance
preparation for release on parole;
(2) Assist a committed offender who requests assistance prior to release
or a parolee to comply with the conditions of parole and to make a successful
adjustment in the community, including facilitating the transitional needs of
housing and employment, access to and participation in job training services in
the community, access to mental health services, assisting with applications
for health care coverage or ensuring that the committed offender or parolee
knows how to apply for and obtain health care coverage, and assisting with
enrollment in the medical assistance program established pursuant to the
-61-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Medical Assistance Act, if eligible, to ensure that the committed offender or
parolee has access to such program close to the time of release or soon
thereafter;
(3) Supervise parolees by keeping informed of their conduct and condition,
utilizing global positioning systems and other monitoring technology as needed
during the period of supervision;
(4) Make such reports as required by the director Director of Supervision
and Services or district judge to determine the effectiveness of the parole
system or the progress of an individual parolee;
(5) Cooperate with social welfare agencies;
(6) Observe the work of any parole officer under his or her supervision
from time to time;
(7) Inform the director Director of Supervision and Services when, in his
or her opinion, any eligible parolee's conduct and attitude warrant his or her
discharge from active supervision, or when any parolee's violation of the
conditions of parole is of sufficient seriousness to require action by the
Board of Parole or district judge and whenever necessary exercise the power of
arrest as provided in section 83-1,119;
(8) Delegate in his or her discretion any of the above responsibilities to
a parole officer under his or her supervision; and
(9) Exercise all powers and perform all duties necessary and proper in
carrying out his or her responsibilities.
Sec. 148. Section 83-1,107, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,107 (1)(a) Within sixty days after initial classification and
assignment of any offender committed to the department, all available
information regarding such committed offender shall be reviewed and a committed
offender department-approved personalized program plan document shall be drawn
up. The document shall specifically describe the department-approved
personalized program plan and the specific goals the department expects the
committed offender to achieve. The document shall also contain a realistic
schedule for completion of the department-approved personalized program plan.
The department-approved personalized program plan shall be developed with the
active participation of the committed offender. The department shall provide
programs to allow compliance by the committed offender with the department-
approved personalized program plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education, including teaching such classes by
qualified offenders;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs; and
(v) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the department.
(b) A modification in the department-approved personalized program plan
may be made to account for the increased or decreased abilities of the
committed offender or the availability of any program. Any modification shall
be made only after notice is given to the committed offender. The department
may not impose disciplinary action upon any committed offender solely because
of the committed offender's failure to comply with the department-approved
personalized program plan, but such failure may be considered by the board in
its deliberations on whether or not to grant parole to a committed offender.
(2)(a) The department shall reduce the term of a committed offender by six
months for each year of the offender's term and pro rata for any part thereof
which is less than a year.
(b) In addition to reductions granted in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section, the department shall reduce the term of a committed offender by three
days on the first day of each month following a twelve-month period of
incarceration within the department during which the offender has not been
found guilty of (i) a Class I or Class II offense or (ii) more than three Class
III offenses under the department's disciplinary code. Reductions earned under
this subdivision shall not be subject to forfeit or withholding by the
department.
(c) The total reductions under this subsection shall be credited from the
date of sentence, which shall include any term of confinement prior to sentence
and commitment as provided pursuant to section 83-1,106, and shall be deducted
from the maximum term, to determine the date when discharge from the custody of
the state becomes mandatory.
(3) While the offender is in the custody of the department, reductions of
terms granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be forfeited,
withheld, and restored by the chief executive officer of the facility with the
approval of the director after the offender has been notified regarding the
charges of misconduct.
(4) The department, in consultation with the board, shall ensure that a
release or reentry plan is complete or near completion when the offender has
served at least eighty percent of his or her sentence. For purposes of this
subsection, release or reentry plan means a comprehensive and individualized
strategic plan to ensure an individual's safe and effective transition or
reentry into the community to which he or she resides with the primary goal of
reducing recidivism. At a minimum, the release or reentry plan shall include,
but not be limited to, consideration of the individual's housing needs, medical
or mental health care needs, and transportation and job needs and shall address
an individual's barriers to successful release or reentry in order to prevent
-62-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
recidivism. The release or reentry plan does not include an individual's
programming needs included in the individual's personalized program plan for
use inside the prison. However, the department shall include in the release or
reentry plan information regarding the individual's progress on the
individual's personalized program plan for use inside the prison.
(5)(a) The department shall make treatment programming available to
committed offenders as provided in section 83-1,110.01 and shall include
continuing participation in such programming as part of each offender's
department-approved personalized program plan developed under subsection (1) of
this section.
(b) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be provided with
the community standard of mental health care. The mental health care shall
utilize evidence-based therapy models that include an evaluation component to
track the effectiveness of interventions.
(c) Any committed offender with a mental illness shall be evaluated before
release to ensure that adequate monitoring and treatment of the committed
offender will take place or, if appropriate, that a commitment proceeding under
the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act
will take place.
(6)(a) Within thirty days after any committed offender has been paroled,
all available information regarding such parolee shall be reviewed and a case
plan document shall be drawn up and approved by the department Division of
Parole Supervision. The document shall specifically describe the approved case
plan and the specific goals the department division expects the parolee to
achieve. The document shall also contain a realistic schedule for completion of
the approved case plan. The approved case plan shall be developed with the
active participation of the parolee. During the term of parole, the parolee
shall comply with the approved case plan and the department division shall
provide programs to allow compliance by the parolee with the approved case
plan.
Programming may include, but is not limited to:
(i) Academic and vocational education;
(ii) Substance abuse treatment;
(iii) Mental health and psychiatric treatment, including criminal
personality programming;
(iv) Constructive, meaningful work programs;
(v) Community service programs; and
(vi) Any other program deemed necessary and appropriate by the department
division.
(b) A modification in the approved case plan may be made to account for
the increased or decreased abilities of the parolee or the availability of any
program. Any modification shall be made only after notice is given to the
parolee. Intentional failure to comply with the approved case plan by any
parolee as scheduled for any year, or pro rata part thereof, shall cause
disciplinary action to be taken by the department division resulting in the
forfeiture of up to a maximum of three months' good time for the scheduled
year.
(7) While the offender is in the custody of the board, reductions of terms
granted pursuant to subdivision (2)(a) of this section may be forfeited,
withheld, and restored by the director upon the recommendation of the board
after the offender has been notified regarding the charges of misconduct or
breach of the conditions of parole.
(8) Good time or other reductions of sentence granted under the provisions
of any law prior to July 1, 1996, may be forfeited, withheld, or restored in
accordance with the terms of the Nebraska Treatment and Corrections Act.
(9) Pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the probation
administrator and the director, an individualized post-release supervision plan
shall be collaboratively prepared by the Office of Probation Administration and
the department and provided to the court to prepare individuals under custody
of the department for post-release supervision. All records created during the
period of incarceration shall be shared with the Office of Probation
Administration and considered in preparation of the post-release supervision
plan.
Sec. 149. Section 83-1,107.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,107.01 (1) Unless otherwise provided by this section, whenever an
adult offender is paroled, the board shall require a parolee to pay a monthly
parole programming fee.
(2) Parolees under the supervision of the department Division of Parole
Supervision shall pay a monthly parole programming fee of twenty-five dollars,
not later than the tenth day of each month, beginning the second month of
parole supervision and continuing for the duration of the parole.
(3) The board shall waive payment of the monthly parole programming fee in
whole or in part if after a hearing a determination is made that such payment
would constitute an undue hardship on the parolee due to limited income,
employment or school status, or physical or mental handicap. Such waiver shall
be in effect only during the period of time that the parolee is unable to pay
his or her monthly parole programming fee.
(4) When monthly parole programming fees are waived, in whole or in part,
the parole officer, pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the board, may
contract with the parolee to perform approved community service at the rate of
five dollars per hour in lieu of payment of monthly parole programming fees. A
parolee may be required to pay a participation fee in order to take advantage
-63-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
of community service programs. A parolee may not accumulate more than three
months' advance credit for community service. The use of community service
alternatives does not preclude the imposition of other intermediate measures.
(5) The department, division with the approval of the Board of Parole,
shall implement sanctions if a parolee defaults in the payment of monthly
parole programming fees or any installment thereof as established by subsection
(2) of this section, except that parole shall not be revoked nor shall the
parolee be imprisoned for such nonpayment if the parolee is financially unable
to make the payment.
(6) If the board determines that the default in payment described in
subsection (5) of this section was not attributable to a deliberate refusal to
obey the order of the board or to failure on the parolee's part to make a good
faith effort to obtain the funds required for payment, the board may allow the
parolee additional time for payment, reduce the amount of each installment, or
revoke the fees or the unpaid portion in whole or in part.
(7) No parolee shall be required to pay more than one monthly parole
programming fee per month.
(8) The imposition of monthly parole programming fees in this section
shall be considered separate and apart from specific service delivery fees.
(9) Any adult offender received for supervision pursuant to section
29-2637 or the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall be
assessed a monthly parole programming fee during the period of time the
offender is actively supervised by Nebraska parole authorities.
(10) A parolee shall pay the fees described in this section to the
department division. The department division shall remit all fees to the State
Treasurer for credit to the Parole Program Cash Fund.
(11) The board and the department division shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 150. Section 83-1,107.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,107.02 The Parole Program Cash Fund is created. All funds collected
pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the fund. The fund shall be utilized by the department Division of
Parole Supervision for the purposes stated in subdivision (20) (8) of section
83-173 83-1,102. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 151. Section 83-1,109, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,109 The chief executive officer of a facility shall regularly report
all good time and all forfeitures, withholdings, and restorations of good time
to the director. On the basis of such report, the director shall inform the
board and the Director of Supervision and Services of all committed offenders
who are expected to become eligible for release on parole within the next three
months.
Sec. 152. Section 83-1,118, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,118 (1) If, in the opinion of the board, upon receipt of information
from the director Director of Supervision and Services, a parolee has shown
suitable compliance with his or her parole programming plan, the board may
reduce the level of supervision for a parolee that is commensurate with the
best interests of the parolee and is compatible with the protection of the
public.
(2) The board shall discharge a parolee from parole when the time served
in the custody of the department and the time served on parole equal the
maximum term less good time.
(3) The department shall discharge a committed offender from the custody
of the department when the time served in the facility equals the maximum term
less good time.
(4) Upon completion of the lawful requirements of the sentence, the
department shall provide the parolee or committed offender with a written
notice regarding his or her civil rights. The notice shall inform the parolee
or committed offender that voting rights are restored upon completion of the
sentence. The notice shall also include information on restoring other civil
rights through the pardon process, including application to and hearing by the
Board of Pardons.
(5) The Board of Parole may discharge a parolee from parole when such
parolee is under the supervision of another state's correctional institution
and such offender has reached the expiration date of his or her Nebraska parole
term.
Sec. 153. Section 83-1,119, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,119 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Absconding parole supervision means a parolee has purposely avoided
supervision for a period of at least two weeks and reasonable efforts by a
parole officer and staff to locate the parolee in person have proven
unsuccessful;
(b) Administrative sanction means additional parole requirements imposed
upon a parolee by his or her parole officer, with the full knowledge and
consent of the parolee, designed to hold the parolee accountable for substance
abuse or technical violations of conditions of parole, including, but not
limited to:
(i) Counseling or reprimand by the department Division of Parole
-64-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
Supervision;
(ii) Increased supervision contact requirements;
(iii) Increased substance abuse testing;
(iv) Referral for substance abuse or mental health evaluation or other
specialized assessment, counseling, or treatment;
(v) Imposition of a designated curfew for a period to be determined by the
department division; and
(vi) Travel restrictions to stay within his or her county of residence or
employment unless otherwise permitted by the department division;
(c) Contract facility means a county jail that contracts with the
department to house parolees or other offenders under the jurisdiction of the
department;
(d) Substance abuse violation means a parolee's activities or behaviors
associated with the use of chemical substances or related treatment services
resulting in a violation of an original condition of parole, including:
(i) Positive breath test for the consumption of alcohol if the parolee is
required to refrain from alcohol consumption;
(ii) Positive urinalysis for the illegal use of drugs;
(iii) Failure to report for alcohol testing or drug testing; and
(iv) Failure to appear for or complete substance abuse or mental health
treatment evaluations or inpatient or outpatient treatment; and
(e) Technical violation means a parolee's activities or behaviors which
create the opportunity for re-offending or diminish the effectiveness of parole
supervision resulting in a violation of an original condition of parole and
includes:
(i) Moving traffic violations;
(ii) Failure to report to his or her parole officer;
(iii) Leaving the state without the permission of the Board of Parole;
(iv) Failure to work regularly or attend training or school;
(v) Failure to notify his or her parole officer of change of address or
employment;
(vi) Frequenting places where controlled substances are illegally sold,
used, distributed, or administered; and
(vii) Failure to pay fines, court costs, restitution, or any fees imposed
pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 as directed.
Technical violation does not include absconding parole supervision.
(2) The department division shall develop a matrix of rewards for
compliance and positive behaviors and graduated administrative sanctions and
custodial sanctions for use in responding to and deterring substance abuse
violations and technical violations. A custodial sanction of thirty days in a
correctional facility or a contract facility shall be designated as the most
severe response to a violation in lieu of revocation.
(3) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has committed or is about to commit a substance abuse violation or
technical violation while on parole, but that the parolee will not attempt to
leave the jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in danger, the
parole officer shall either:
(a) Impose one or more administrative sanctions based upon the parolee's
risk level, the severity of the violation, and the parolee's response to the
violation. If administrative sanctions are to be imposed, the parolee shall
acknowledge in writing the nature of the violation and agree upon the
administrative sanction. The parolee has the right to decline to acknowledge
the violation. If he or she declines to acknowledge the violation, the parole
officer shall take action pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of this section. A
copy of the report shall be submitted to the Board of Parole; or
(b) Submit a written report to the Board of Parole, outlining the nature
of the parole violation, and request the imposition of a custodial sanction of
up to thirty days in a correctional facility or a contract facility. On the
basis of the report and such further investigation as the board may deem
appropriate, the board shall determine whether and how the parolee violated the
conditions of parole and may:
(i) Dismiss the charge of violation; or
(ii) If the board finds a violation justifying a custodial sanction, issue
a warrant if necessary and impose a custodial sanction of up to thirty days in
a correctional facility or a contract facility.
(4) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole by a
violation other than a substance abuse violation or a technical violation and
the parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that the parolee will not
attempt to leave the jurisdiction and will not place lives or property in
danger, the parole officer shall submit a written report to the Board of Parole
which may, on the basis of such report and such further investigation as it may
deem appropriate:
(a) Dismiss the charge of violation;
(b) Determine whether the parolee violated the conditions of his or her
parole;
(c) Impose a custodial sanction of up to thirty days in a correctional
facility or a contract facility;
(d) Revoke his or her parole in accordance with the Nebraska Treatment and
Corrections Act; or
(e) Issue a warrant for the arrest of the parolee.
(5) Whenever a parole officer has reasonable cause to believe that a
parolee has violated or is about to violate a condition of parole and that the
-65-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
parolee will attempt to leave the jurisdiction or will place lives or property
in danger, the parole officer shall arrest the parolee without a warrant and
call on any peace officer to assist him or her in doing so.
(6) Whenever a parolee is arrested with or without a warrant, he or she
shall be detained in a local jail or other detention facility operated by the
department Department of Correctional Services pending completion of review of
parole proceedings by the Board of Parole. Immediately after such arrest and
detention, the parole officer shall notify the Board of Parole and submit a
written report of the reason for such arrest. A complete investigation shall be
made by the department Division of Parole Supervision and submitted to the
board. After prompt consideration of such written report, the board shall order
the parolee's release from detention or continued confinement to await a final
decision on imposition of a custodial sanction or the revocation of parole.
(7) The Board of Parole shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
necessary to carry out this section.
Sec. 154. Section 83-1,122.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,122.02 (1) The department Division of Parole Supervision shall create
a pilot program to establish a technical parole violation residential housing
program. The purpose of the program is to provide accountability and intensive
support for individuals on parole who commit technical violations, without
revoking them fully back to prison.
(2) The program shall provide a structured environment for selected
individuals on parole who have committed technical violations. The program
shall be based upon a therapeutic community model. Participants in the program
shall, at a minimum, be required to take part in counseling, educational, and
other programs as the department Division of Parole Supervision deems
appropriate, to provide community service, and to submit to drug and alcohol
screening.
(3) An individual on parole shall not be placed in the pilot program until
the department Division of Parole Supervision has determined the individual is
a suitable candidate in accordance with policies and guidelines developed by
the division.
(4) On or before June 1, 2024, the Division of Parole Supervision shall
electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature
regarding the pilot program. The report shall evaluate effects of the pilot
program on recidivism and make recommendations regarding expansion of or
changes to the program.
(4) (5) For purposes of this section, technical violation has the same
meaning as in section 83-1,119.
Sec. 155. Section 83-1,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,125 (1) If a warrant or detainer is placed against a committed
offender by a court, parole agency, or other authority of this or any other
jurisdiction, the director Director of Supervision and Services shall inquire
before such offender becomes eligible for parole whether the authority
concerned intends to execute or withdraw the warrant or detainer when the
offender is released.
(2) If the authority notifies the director Director of Supervision and
Services that it intends to execute the warrant or detainer when the offender
is released, the director Director of Supervision and Services shall advise the
authority concerned of the sentence under which the offender is held, the time
of parole eligibility, any decision of the board relating to the offender, and
the nature of the offender's adjustment during imprisonment and shall give
reasonable notice to such authority of the offender's release date.
(3) The board may parole an offender who is eligible for release to a
warrant or detainer. If an offender is paroled to such a warrant or detainer,
the board may provide, as a condition of release, that if the charge or charges
on which the warrant or detainer is based are dismissed, or are satisfied after
conviction and sentence, prior to the expiration of the offender's parole term,
the authority to whose warrant or detainer the offender is released shall
return the offender to serve the remainder of the parole term or such part as
the board may determine.
(4) If a person paroled to a warrant or detainer is thereafter sentenced
and placed on probation, or released on parole in another jurisdiction, prior
to the expiration of the parole term less good time in this state, the board
may permit the person to serve the remainder of the parole term or such part as
the board may determine concurrently with the person's new probation or parole
term. Such concurrent terms may be served in either of the two jurisdictions,
and supervision shall be administered in accordance with the Interstate Compact
for Adult Offender Supervision.
Sec. 156. Section 83-1,125.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,125.01 (1) The Board of Parole and the department Division of Parole
Supervision may maintain an individual file for each person who is under the
jurisdiction of the Board of Parole. Such file may be maintained electronically
and shall include, when available and appropriate, the following information on
such person:
(a) Admission summary;
(b) Presentence investigation report;
(c) Classification reports and recommendations;
(d) Official records of conviction and commitment along with any earlier
criminal records;
-66-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
(e) Progress reports and admission-orientation reports;
(f) Reports of any disciplinary infractions and their disposition;
(g) Risk and needs assessments;
(h) Parole plan and parole placement and investigation worksheets;
(i) Decision guideline scores;
(j) Parole case plan;
(k) Parole progress reports and contact notes;
(l) Arrest and violation reports, including disposition;
(m) Parole proceedings orders and notices;
(n) Other documents related to parole supervision;
(o) Correspondence; and
(p) Other pertinent data concerning his or her background, conduct,
associations, and family relationships.
(2) Any decision concerning release on or revocation of parole or
imposition of sanctions shall be made only after the individual file has been
reviewed. The contents of the individual file shall be confidential unless
disclosed in connection with a public hearing and shall not be subject to
public inspection except by court order for good cause shown. The contents of
the file shall not be accessible to any person under the jurisdiction of the
Board of Parole. A person under the jurisdiction of the board may obtain access
to his or her medical records by request to the provider pursuant to sections
71-8401 to 71-8407 notwithstanding the fact that such medical records may be a
part of his or her parole file. The board and the department Division of Parole
Supervision have the authority to withhold decision guideline scores, risk and
needs assessment scores, and mental health and psychological records of a
person under the jurisdiction of the board when appropriate.
(3) Nothing in this section limits in any manner the authority of the
Public Counsel to inspect and examine the records and documents of the board
and the department Division of Parole Supervision pursuant to sections 81-8,240
to 81-8,254, except that the Public Counsel's access to the medical or mental
health records of a person under the jurisdiction of the board shall be subject
to his or her consent. The office of Public Counsel shall not disclose the
medical or mental health records of a person under the jurisdiction of the
board to anyone else, including any other person under the jurisdiction of the
board, except as authorized by law.
(4) For any person under the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole, the
board shall provide such person's (a) name, (b) parole officer, and (c)
conditions of parole to the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice which shall provide access to such information to law enforcement
agencies through the state's criminal justice information system.
Sec. 157. Section 83-962, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
83-962 (1) A correctional system overcrowding emergency shall exist
whenever the director certifies that the department's inmate population is over
one hundred forty percent of operational design capacity. The director shall so
certify within thirty days after the date on which the population first exceeds
one hundred forty percent of operational design capacity.
(2) During a correctional system overcrowding emergency, the board shall
immediately consider or reconsider committed offenders eligible for parole who
have not been released on parole.
(3) Upon such consideration or reconsideration, and for all other
consideration of committed offenders eligible for parole while the correctional
system overcrowding emergency is in effect, the board shall order the release
of each committed offender unless it is of the opinion that such release should
be deferred because:
(a) The board has determined that it is more likely than not that the
committed offender will not conform to the conditions of parole; or
(b) The board has determined that the committed offender's continued
correctional treatment, medical care, or vocational or other training in the
facility will substantially enhance the offender's capacity to lead a law-
abiding life when released at a later date. release of the committed offender
would have a very significant and quantifiable effect on institutional
discipline; or
(c) The board has determined that there is a very substantial risk that
the committed offender will commit a violent act against a person.
(4) In making the determination regarding the risk that a committed
offender will not conform to the conditions of parole, the board shall take
into account the factors set forth in subsection (2) of section 83-1,114 and
shall comply with the requirements of subsection (3) of section 83-1,114 and
section 83-196.01.
(5) The board shall continue granting parole to offenders under this
section until the director certifies that the population is at operational
capacity. The director shall so certify within thirty days after the date on
which the population first reaches operational capacity.
Sec. 158. Sections 50 and 161 of this act become operative October 1,
2025. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18,
19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38,
39, 43, 44, 45, 46, 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, 56, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 62, 63, 64, 65,
66, 67, 68, 69, 70, 71, 72, 73, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 79, 80, 81, 82, 83, 84, 85,
86, 87, 88, 89, 90, 91, 92, 93, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, 101, 102, 103,
104, 105, 106, 107, 108, 109, 110, 111, 112, 113, 114, 115, 116, 117, 118, 119,
120, 121, 122, 123, 124, 125, 126, 127, 128, 129, 130, 131, 132, 133, 134, 135,
136, 137, 138, 139, 140, 141, 142, 143, 144, 145, 146, 147, 148, 149, 150, 151,
-67-

LB150 LB150
2025 2025
152, 153, 154, 155, 156, 157, 160, and 162 of this act become operative three
calendar months after the adjournment of this legislative session. The other
sections of this act become operative on their effective date with the
emergency clause.
Sec. 159. Original sections 43-1401 and 43-1414, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, and sections 29-4803, 29-4807, and 43-1411, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 160. Original sections 18-1724, 20-113, 20-132, 20-134, 20-139,
20-317, 20-318, 20-320, 20-321, 20-322, 20-325, 23-2525, 23-2531, 23-2541,
25-1030.01, 25-1056, 28-519, 29-401, 47-624, 47-624.01, 47-627, 47-629, 47-903,
47-908, 47-919, 48-215, 48-628.13, 48-1101, 48-1104, 48-1105, 48-1106, 48-1107,
48-1108, 48-1111, 48-1113, 48-1115, 48-1117, 48-1119, 48-1122, 48-1124,
48-1125, 49-801, 51-211, 58-216, 58-808, 58-809, 58-810, 68-1605, 69-2403,
69-2409.01, 69-2410, 69-2420, 71-904, 71-915, 71-922, 71-924, 71-941, 71-951,
71-952, 71-954, 71-1208, 75-325, 76-1495, 81-885.24, 81-1401, 83-170, 83-171,
83-171.01, 83-173, 83-174.03, 83-174.04, 83-174.05, 83-192, 83-1,100,
83-1,100.02, 83-1,103, 83-1,103.01, 83-1,103.02, 83-1,103.03, 83-1,103.04,
83-1,104, 83-1,107, 83-1,107.01, 83-1,107.02, 83-1,109, 83-1,118, 83-1,119,
83-1,122.02, 83-1,125, 83-1,125.01, and 83-962, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, sections 25-1645, 27-413, 28-105, 28-316.01, 28-318, 28-322, 29-1912,
29-1918, 29-2221, 29-2246, 29-2252, 29-2261, 29-2935, 29-4003, 29-4019, 32-221,
32-230, 39-210, 45-1303, 47-1102, 47-1103, 47-1104, 47-1105, 47-1106, 47-1107,
47-1108, 47-1109, 47-1110, 47-1111, 47-1113, 47-1114, 47-1115, 47-1116,
47-1117, 47-1119, 71-901, 71-903, 71-919, 71-920, 71-926, 71-939, 71-958,
71-961, 71-1203, 71-1204, 71-1206, 71-1223, 71-3426, and 71-3430, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 2, Legislative Bill 80, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025, are repealed.
Sec. 161. Original section 93, Legislative Bill 474, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025, is repealed.
Sec. 162. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 69-2409,
69-2411, 69-2412, 69-2413, 69-2414, 69-2415, 69-2416, 69-2417, 69-2418,
69-2419, 69-2423, 83-1,101, and 83-1,102, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 163. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed
and approved according to law.
-68-